
 
 
 
 Produced by Greg Weeks, Stephen Blundell and the Online
 Distributed Proofreading Team at http://www.pgdp.net
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 YOUTH
 
 _by_ ISAAC ASIMOV
 
 
     Red and Slim found the two strange little animals the morning after
     they heard the thunder sounds. They knew that they could never show
     their new pets to their parents.
 
 
 [Illustration]
 
 
 There was a spatter of pebbles against the window and the youngster
 stirred in his sleep. Another, and he was awake.
 
 He sat up stiffly in bed. Seconds passed while he interpreted his
 strange surroundings. He wasn't in his own home, of course. This was out
 in the country. It was colder than it should be and there was green at
 the window.
 
 "Slim!"
 
 The call was a hoarse, urgent whisper, and the youngster bounded to the
 open window.
 
 Slim wasn't his real name, but the new friend he had met the day before
 had needed only one look at his slight figure to say, "You're Slim." He
 added, "I'm Red."
 
 Red wasn't his real name, either, but its appropriateness was obvious.
 They were friends instantly with the quick unquestioning friendship of
 young ones not yet quite in adolescence, before even the first stains of
 adulthood began to make their appearance.
 
 Slim cried, "Hi, Red!" and waved cheerfully, still blinking the sleep
 out of himself.
 
 Red kept to his croaking whisper, "Quiet! You want to wake somebody?"
 
 Slim noticed all at once that the sun scarcely topped the low hills in
 the east, that the shadows were long and soft, and that the grass was
 wet.
 
 Slim said, more softly, "What's the matter?"
 
 Red only waved for him to come out.
 
 Slim dressed quickly, gladly confining his morning wash to the momentary
 sprinkle of a little lukewarm water. He let the air dry the exposed
 portions of his body as he ran out, while bare skin grew wet against the
 dewy grass.
 
 Red said, "You've got to be quiet. If Mom wakes up or Dad or your Dad or
 even any of the hands then it'll be 'Come on in or you'll catch your
 death of cold.'"
 
 He mimicked voice and tone faithfully, so that Slim laughed and thought
 that there had never been so funny a fellow as Red.
 
 Slim said, eagerly, "Do you come out here every day like this, Red? Real
 early? It's like the whole world is just yours, isn't it, Red? No one
 else around and all like that." He felt proud at being allowed entrance
 into this private world.
 
 Red stared at him sidelong. He said carelessly, "I've been up for hours.
 Didn't you hear it last night?"
 
 "Hear what?"
 
 "Thunder."
 
 "Was there a thunderstorm?" Slim never slept through a thunderstorm.
 
 "I guess not. But there was thunder. I heard it, and then I went to the
 window and it wasn't raining. It was all stars and the sky was just
 getting sort of almost gray. You know what I mean?"
 
 Slim had never seen it so, but he nodded.
 
 "So I just thought I'd go out," said Red.
 
 They walked along the grassy side of the concrete road that split the
 panorama right down the middle all the way down to where it vanished
 among the hills. It was so old that Red's father couldn't tell Red when
 it had been built. It didn't have a crack or a rough spot in it.
 
 Red said, "Can you keep a secret?"
 
 "Sure, Red. What kind of a secret?"
 
 "Just a secret. Maybe I'll tell you and maybe I won't. I don't know
 yet." Red broke a long, supple stem from a fern they passed,
 methodically stripped it of its leaflets and swung what was left
 whip-fashion. For a moment, he was on a wild charger, which reared and
 champed under his iron control. Then he got tired, tossed the whip aside
 and stowed the charger away in a corner of his imagination for future
 use.
 
 He said, "There'll be a circus around."
 
 Slim said, "That's no secret. I knew that. My Dad told me even before we
 came here--"
 
 "That's not the secret. Fine secret! Ever see a circus?"
 
 "Oh, sure. You bet."
 
 "Like it?"
 
 "Say, there isn't anything I like better."
 
 Red was watching out of the corner of his eyes again. "Ever think you
 would like to be with a circus? I mean, for good?"
 
 Slim considered, "I guess not. I think I'll be an astronomer like my
 Dad. I think he wants me to be."
 
 "Huh! Astronomer!" said Red.
 
 Slim felt the doors of the new, private world closing on him and
 astronomy became a thing of dead stars and black, empty space.
 
 He said, placatingly, "A circus _would_ be more fun."
 
 "You're just saying that."
 
 "No, I'm not. I mean it."
 
 Red grew argumentative. "Suppose you had a chance to join the circus
 right now. What would you do?"
 
 "I--I--"
 
 "See!" Red affected scornful laughter.
 
 Slim was stung. "I'd join up."
 
 "Go on."
 
 "Try me."
 
 Red whirled at him, strange and intense. "You meant that? You want to go
 in with me?"
 
 [Illustration]
 
 "What do you mean?" Slim stepped back a bit, surprised by the unexpected
 challenge.
 
 "I got something that can get us into the circus. Maybe someday we can
 even have a circus of our own. We could be the biggest circus-fellows in
 the world. That's if you want to go in with me. Otherwise--Well, I guess
 I can do it on my own. I just thought: Let's give good old Slim a
 chance."
 
 The world was strange and glamorous, and Slim said, "Sure thing, Red.
 I'm in! What is it, huh, Red? Tell me what it is."
 
 "Figure it out. What's the most important thing in circuses?"
 
 Slim thought desperately. He wanted to give the right answer. Finally,
 he said, "Acrobats?"
 
 "Holy Smokes! I wouldn't go five steps to look at acrobats."
 
 "I don't know then."
 
 "Animals, that's what! What's the best side-show? Where are the biggest
 crowds? Even in the main rings the best acts are animal acts." There was
 no doubt in Red's voice.
 
 "Do you think so?"
 
 "Everyone thinks so. You ask anyone. Anyway, I found animals this
 morning. Two of them."
 
 "And you've got them?"
 
 "Sure. That's the secret. Are you telling?"
 
 "Of course not."
 
 "Okay. I've got them in the barn. Do you want to see them?"
 
 They were almost at the barn; its huge open door black. Too black. They
 had been heading there all the time. Slim stopped in his tracks.
 
 He tried to make his words casual. "Are they big?"
 
 "Would I fool with them if they were big? They can't hurt you. They're
 only about so long. I've got them in a cage."
 
 They were in the barn now and Slim saw the large cage suspended from a
 hook in the roof. It was covered with stiff canvas.
 
 Red said, "We used to have some bird there or something. Anyway, they
 can't get away from there. Come on, let's go up to the loft."
 
 They clambered up the wooden stairs and Red hooked the cage toward them.
 
 Slim pointed and said, "There's sort of a hole in the canvas."
 
 Red frowned. "How'd that get there?" He lifted the canvas, looked in,
 and said, with relief, "They're still there."
 
 "The canvas appeared to be burned," worried Slim.
 
 "You want to look, or don't you?"
 
 Slim nodded slowly. He wasn't sure he wanted to, after all. They might
 be--
 
 But the canvas had been jerked off and there they were. Two of them, the
 way Red said. They were small, and sort of disgusting-looking. The
 animals moved quickly as the canvas lifted and were on the side toward
 the youngsters. Red poked a cautious finger at them.
 
 "Watch out," said Slim, in agony.
 
 "They don't hurt you," said Red. "Ever see anything like them?"
 
 "No."
 
 "Can't you see how a circus would jump at a chance to have these?"
 
 "Maybe they're too small for a circus."
 
 Red looked annoyed. He let go the cage which swung back and forth
 pendulum-fashion. "You're just trying to back out, aren't you?"
 
 "No, I'm not. It's just--"
 
 "They're not too small, don't worry. Right now, I've only got one
 worry."
 
 "What's that?"
 
 "Well, I've got to keep them till the circus comes, don't I? I've got
 to figure out what to feed them meanwhile."
 
 The cage swung and the little trapped creatures clung to its bars,
 gesturing at the youngsters with queer, quick motions--almost as though
 they were intelligent.
 
 
 II
 
 The Astronomer entered the dining room with decorum. He felt very much
 the guest.
 
 He said, "Where are the youngsters? My son isn't in his room."
 
 The Industrialist smiled. "They've been out for hours. However,
 breakfast was forced into them among the women some time ago, so there
 is nothing to worry about. Youth, Doctor, youth!"
 
 "Youth!" The word seemed to depress the Astronomer.
 
 They ate breakfast in silence. The Industrialist said once, "You really
 think they'll come. The day looks so--_normal_."
 
 The Astronomer said, "They'll come."
 
 That was all.
 
 Afterward the Industrialist said, "You'll pardon me. I can't conceive
 your playing so elaborate a hoax. You really spoke to them?"
 
 "As I speak to you. At least, in a sense. They can project thoughts."
 
 "I gathered that must be so from your letter. How, I wonder."
 
 "I could not say. I asked them and, of course, they were vague. Or
 perhaps it was just that I could not understand. It involves a projector
 for the focussing of thought and, even more than that, conscious
 attention on the part of both projector and receptor. It was quite a
 while before I realized they were trying to think at me. Such
 thought-projectors may be part of the science they will give us."
 
 "Perhaps," said the Industrialist. "Yet think of the changes it would
 bring to society. A thought-projector!"
 
 "Why not? Change would be good for us."
 
 "I don't think so."
 
 "It is only in old age that change is unwelcome," said the Astronomer,
 "and races can be old as well as individuals."
 
 The Industrialist pointed out the window. "You see that road. It was
 built Beforethewars. I don't know exactly when. It is as good now as the
 day it was built. We couldn't possibly duplicate it now. The race was
 young when that was built, eh?"
 
 "Then? Yes! At least they weren't afraid of new things."
 
 "No. I wish they had been. Where is the society of Beforethewars?
 Destroyed, Doctor! What good were youth and new things? We are better
 off now. The world is peaceful and jogs along. The race goes nowhere but
 after all, there is nowhere to go. _They_ proved that. The men who built
 the road. I will speak with your visitors as I agreed, if they come. But
 I think I will only ask them to go."
 
 "The race is not going nowhere," said the Astronomer, earnestly. "It is
 going toward final destruction. My university has a smaller student body
 each year. Fewer books are written. Less work is done. An old man sleeps
 in the sun and his days are peaceful and unchanging, but each day finds
 him nearer death all the same."
 
 "Well, well," said the Industrialist.
 
 "No, don't dismiss it. Listen. Before I wrote you, I investigated your
 position in the planetary economy."
 
 "And you found me solvent?" interrupted the Industrialist, smiling.
 
 "Why, yes. Oh, I see, you are joking. And yet--perhaps the joke is not
 far off. You are less solvent than your father and he was less solvent
 than his father. Perhaps your son will no longer be solvent. It becomes
 too troublesome for the planet to support even the industries that still
 exist, though they are toothpicks to the oak trees of Beforethewars. We
 will be back to village economy and then to what? The caves?"
 
 "And the infusion of fresh technological knowledge will be the changing
 of all that?"
 
 "Not just the new knowledge. Rather the whole effect of change, of a
 broadening of horizons. Look, sir, I chose you to approach in this
 matter not only because you were rich and influential with government
 officials, but because you had an unusual reputation, for these days, of
 daring to break with tradition. Our people will resist change and you
 would know how to handle them, how to see to it that--that--"
 
 "That the youth of the race is revived?"
 
 "Yes."
 
 "With its atomic bombs?"
 
 "The atomic bombs," returned the Astronomer, "need not be the end of
 civilization. These visitors of mine had their atomic bomb, or whatever
 their equivalent was on their own worlds, and survived it, because they
 didn't give up. Don't you see? It wasn't the bomb that defeated us, but
 our own shell shock. This may be the last chance to reverse the
 process."
 
 [Illustration]
 
 "Tell me," said the Industrialist, "what do these friends from space
 want in return?"
 
 The Astronomer hesitated. He said, "I will be truthful with you. They
 come from a denser planet. Ours is richer in the lighter atoms."
 
 "They want magnesium? Aluminum?"
 
 "No, sir. Carbon and hydrogen. They want coal and oil."
 
 "Really?"
 
 The Astronomer said, quickly, "You are going to ask why creatures who
 have mastered space travel, and therefore atomic power, would want coal
 and oil. I can't answer that."
 
 The Industrialist smiled. "But I can. This is the best evidence yet of
 the truth of your story. Superficially, atomic power would seem to
 preclude the use of coal and oil. However, quite apart from the energy
 gained by their combustion they remain, and always will remain, the
 basic raw material for all organic chemistry. Plastics, dyes,
 pharmaceuticals, solvents. Industry could not exist without them, even
 in an atomic age. Still, if coal and oil are the low price for which
 they would sell us the troubles and tortures of racial youth, my answer
 is that the commodity would be dear if offered gratis."
 
 The Astronomer sighed and said, "There are the boys!"
 
 They were visible through the open window, standing together in the
 grassy field and lost in animated conversation. The Industrialist's son
 pointed imperiously and the Astronomer's son nodded and made off at a
 run toward the house.
 
 The Industrialist said, "There is the Youth you speak of. Our race has
 as much of it as it ever had."
 
 "Yes, but we age them quickly and pour them into the mold."
 
 Slim scuttled into the room, the door banging behind him.
 
 The Astronomer said, in mild disapproval, "What's this?"
 
 Slim looked up in surprise and came to a halt. "I beg your pardon. I
 didn't know anyone was here. I am sorry to have interrupted." His
 enunciation was almost painfully precise.
 
 The Industrialist said, "It's all right, youngster."
 
 But the Astronomer said, "Even if you had been entering an empty room,
 son, there would be no cause for slamming a door."
 
 "Nonsense," insisted the Industrialist. "The youngster has done no harm.
 You simply scold him for being young. You, with your views!"
 
 He said to Slim, "Come here, lad."
 
 Slim advanced slowly.
 
 "How do you like the country, eh?"
 
 "Very much, sir, thank you."
 
 "My son has been showing you about the place, has he?"
 
 "Yes, sir. Red--I mean--"
 
 "No, no. Call him Red. I call him that myself. Now tell me, what are you
 two up to, eh?"
 
 Slim looked away. "Why--just exploring, sir."
 
 The Industrialist turned to the Astronomer. "There you are, youthful
 curiosity and adventure-lust. The race has not yet lost it."
 
 Slim said, "Sir?"
 
 "Yes, lad."
 
 The youngster took a long time in getting on with it. He said, "Red sent
 me in for something good to eat, but I don't exactly know what he meant.
 I didn't like to say so."
 
 "Why, just ask cook. She'll have something good for young'uns to eat."
 
 "Oh, no, sir. I mean for animals."
 
 "For animals?"
 
 "Yes, sir. What do animals eat?"
 
 The Astronomer said, "I am afraid my son is city-bred."
 
 "Well," said the Industrialist, "there's no harm in that. What kind of
 an animal, lad?"
 
 "A small one, sir."
 
 "Then try grass or leaves, and if they don't want that, nuts or berries
 would probably do the trick."
 
 "Thank you, sir." Slim ran out again, closing the door gently behind
 him.
 
 The Astronomer said, "Do you suppose they've trapped an animal alive?"
 He was obviously perturbed.
 
 "That's common enough. There's no shooting on my estate and it's tame
 country, full of rodents and small creatures. Red is always coming home
 with pets of one sort or another. They rarely maintain his interest for
 long."
 
 He looked at the wall clock. "Your friends should have been here by now,
 shouldn't they?"
 
 
 III
 
 The swaying had come to a halt and it was dark. The Explorer was not
 comfortable in the alien air. It felt as thick as soup and he had to
 breathe shallowly. Even so--
 
 He reached out in a sudden need for company. The Merchant was warm to
 the touch. His breathing was rough, he moved in an occasional spasm, and
 was obviously asleep. The Explorer hesitated and decided not to wake
 him. It would serve no real purpose.
 
 There would be no rescue, of course. That was the penalty paid for the
 high profits which unrestrained competition could lead to. The Merchant
 who opened a new planet could have a ten year monopoly of its trade,
 which he might hug to himself or, more likely, rent out to all comers at
 a stiff price. It followed that planets were searched for in secrecy
 and, preferably, away from the usual trade routes. In a case such as
 theirs, then, there was little or no chance that another ship would come
 within range of their subetherics except for the most improbable of
 coincidences. Even if they were in their ship, that is, rather than in
 this--this--_cage_.
 
 The Explorer grasped the thick bars. Even if they blasted those away, as
 they could, they would be stuck too high in open air for leaping.
 
 It was too bad. They had landed twice before in the scout-ship. They had
 established contact with the natives who were grotesquely huge, but mild
 and unaggressive. It was obvious that they had once owned a flourishing
 technology, but hadn't faced up to the consequences of such a
 technology. It would have been a wonderful market.
 
 And it was a tremendous world. The Merchant, especially, had been taken
 aback. He had known the figures that expressed the planet's diameter,
 but from a distance of two light-seconds, he had stood at the visi-plate
 and muttered, "Unbelievable!"
 
 "Oh, there are larger worlds," the Explorer said. It wouldn't do for an
 Explorer to be too easily impressed.
 
 "Inhabited?"
 
 "Well, no."
 
 "Why, you could drop your planet into that large ocean and drown it."
 
 The Explorer smiled. It was a gentle dig at his Arcturian homeland,
 which was smaller than most planets. He said, "Not quite."
 
 The Merchant followed along the line of his thoughts. "And the
 inhabitants are large in proportion to their world?" He sounded as
 though the news struck him less favorably now.
 
 "Nearly ten times our height."
 
 "Are you sure they are friendly?"
 
 "That is hard to say. Friendship between alien intelligences is an
 imponderable. They are not dangerous, I think. We've come across other
 groups that could not maintain equilibrium after the atomic war stage
 and you know the results. Introversion. Retreat. Gradual decadence and
 increasing gentleness."
 
 "Even if they are such monsters?"
 
 "The principle remains."
 
 It was about then that the Explorer felt the heavy throbbing of the
 engines.
 
 He frowned and said, "We are descending a bit too quickly."
 
 There had been some speculation on the dangers of landing some hours
 before. The planetary target was a huge one for an oxygen-water world.
 Though it lacked the size of the uninhabitable hydrogen-ammonia planets
 and its low density made its surface gravity fairly normal, its
 gravitational forces fell off but slowly with distance. In short, its
 gravitational potential was high and the ship's Calculator was a
 run-of-the-mill model not designed to plot landing trajectories at that
 potential range. That meant the Pilot would have to use manual controls.
 
 It would have been wiser to install a more high-powered model, but that
 would have meant a trip to some outpost of civilization; lost time;
 perhaps a lost secret. The Merchant demanded an immediate landing.
 
 The Merchant felt it necessary to defend his position now. He said
 angrily to the Explorer, "Don't you think the Pilot knows his job? He
 landed you safely twice before."
 
 Yes, thought the Explorer, in a scout-ship, not in this unmaneuverable
 freighter. Aloud, he said nothing.
 
 He kept his eye on the visi-plate. They were descending too quickly.
 There was no room for doubt. Much too quickly.
 
 The Merchant said, peevishly, "Why do you keep silence?"
 
 "Well, then, if you wish me to speak, I would suggest that you strap on
 your Floater and help me prepare the Ejector."
 
 The Pilot fought a noble fight. He was no beginner. The atmosphere,
 abnormally high and thick in the gravitational potential of this world
 whipped and burned about the ship, but to the very last it looked as
 though he might bring it under control despite that.
 
 He even maintained course, following the extrapolated line to the point
 on the northern continent toward which they were headed. Under other
 circumstances, with a shade more luck, the story would eventually have
 been told and retold as a heroic and masterly reversal of a lost
 situation. But within sight of victory, tired body and tired nerves
 clamped a control bar with a shade too much pressure. The ship, which
 had almost levelled off, dipped down again.
 
 There was no room to retrieve the final error. There was only a mile
 left to fall. The Pilot remained at his post to the actual landing, his
 only thought that of breaking the force of the crash, of maintaining the
 spaceworthiness of the vessel. He did not survive. With the ship bucking
 madly in a soupy atmosphere, few Ejectors could be mobilized and only
 one of them in time.
 
 When afterwards, the Explorer lifted out of unconsciousness and rose
 to his feet, he had the definite feeling that but for himself and
 the Merchant, there were no survivors. And perhaps that was an
 over-calculation. His Floater had burnt out while still sufficiently
 distant from surface to have the fall stun him. The Merchant might have
 had less luck, even, than that.
 
 He was surrounded by a world of thick, ropy stalks of grass, and in the
 distance were trees that reminded him vaguely of similar structures on
 his native Arcturian world except that their lowest branches were high
 above what he would consider normal tree-tops.
 
 He called, his voice sounding basso in the thick air and the Merchant
 answered. The Explorer made his way toward him, thrusting violently at
 the coarse stalks that barred his path.
 
 "Are you hurt?" he asked.
 
 The Merchant grimaced. "I've sprained something. It hurts to walk."
 
 The Explorer probed gently. "I don't think anything is broken. You'll
 have to walk despite the pain."
 
 "Can't we rest first?"
 
 "It's important to try to find the ship. If it is spaceworthy or if it
 can be repaired, we may live. Otherwise, we won't."
 
 "Just a few minutes. Let me catch my breath."
 
 The Explorer was glad enough for those few minutes. The Merchant's eyes
 were already closed. He allowed his to do the same.
 
 He heard the trampling and his eyes snapped open. Never sleep on a
 strange planet, he told himself futilely.
 
 The Merchant was awake too and his steady screaming was a rumble of
 terror.
 
 The Explorer called, "It's only a native of this planet. It won't harm
 you."
 
 But even as he spoke, the giant had swooped down and in a moment they
 were in its grasp being lifted closer to its monstrous ugliness.
 
 The Merchant struggled violently and, of course, quite futilely. "Can't
 you talk to it?" he yelled.
 
 The Explorer could only shake his head. "I can't reach it with the
 Projector. It won't be listening."
 
 "Then blast it. Blast it down."
 
 "We can't do that." The phrase "you fool" had almost been added. The
 Explorer struggled to keep his self-control. They were swallowing space
 as the monster moved purposefully away.
 
 "Why not?" cried the Merchant. "You can reach your blaster. I see it in
 plain sight. Don't be afraid of falling."
 
 "It's simpler than that. If this monster is killed, you'll never trade
 with this planet. You'll never even leave it. You probably won't live
 the day out."
 
 "Why? Why?"
 
 "Because this is one of the young of the species. You should know what
 happens when a trader kills a native young, even accidentally. What's
 more, if this is the target-point, then we are on the estate of a
 powerful native. This might be one of his brood."
 
 That was how they entered their present prison. They had carefully burnt
 away a portion of the thick, stiff covering and it was obvious that the
 height from which they were suspended was a killing one.
 
 Now, once again, the prison-cage shuddered and lifted in an upward arc.
 The Merchant rolled to the lower rim and startled awake. The cover
 lifted and light flooded in. As was the case the time before, there were
 two specimens of the young. They were not very different in appearance
 from adults of the species, reflected the Explorer, though, of course,
 they were considerably smaller.
 
 A handful of reedy green stalks was stuffed between the bars. Its odor
 was not unpleasant but it carried clods of soil at its ends.
 
 The Merchant drew away and said, huskily, "What are they doing?"
 
 The Explorer said, "Trying to feed us, I should judge. At least this
 seems to be the native equivalent of grass."
 
 The cover was replaced and they were set swinging again, alone with
 their fodder.
 
 
 IV
 
 Slim started at the sound of footsteps and brightened when it turned out
 to be only Red.
 
 He said, "No one's around. I had my eye peeled, you bet."
 
 Red said, "Ssh. Look. You take this stuff and stick it in the cage. I've
 got to scoot back to the house."
 
 "What is it?" Slim reached reluctantly.
 
 "Ground meat. Holy Smokes, haven't you ever seen ground meat? That's
 what you should've got when I sent you to the house instead of coming
 back with that stupid grass."
 
 Slim was hurt. "How'd I know they don't eat grass. Besides, ground meat
 doesn't come loose like that. It comes in cellophane and it isn't that
 color."
 
 "Sure--in the city. Out here we grind our own and it's always this color
 till it's cooked."
 
 "You mean it isn't cooked?" Slim drew away quickly.
 
 Red looked disgusted. "Do you think animals eat _cooked_ food. Come on,
 take it. It won't hurt you. I tell you there isn't much time."
 
 "Why? What's doing back at the house?"
 
 "I don't know. Dad and your father are walking around. I think maybe
 they're looking for me. Maybe the cook told them I took the meat.
 Anyway, we don't want them coming here after me."
 
 "Didn't you ask the cook before you took this stuff?"
 
 "Who? That crab? Shouldn't wonder if she only let me have a drink of
 water because Dad makes her. Come on. Take it."
 
 Slim took the large glob of meat though his skin crawled at the touch.
 He turned toward the barn and Red sped away in the direction from which
 he had come.
 
 He slowed when he approached the two adults, took a few deep breaths to
 bring himself back to normal, and then carefully and nonchalantly
 sauntered past. (They were walking in the general direction of the barn,
 he noticed, but not dead on.)
 
 He said, "Hi, Dad. Hello, sir."
 
 The Industrialist said, "Just a moment, Red. I have a question to ask
 you?"
 
 Red turned a carefully blank face to his father. "Yes, Dad?"
 
 "Mother tells me you were out early this morning."
 
 "Not real early, Dad. Just a little before breakfast."
 
 "She said you told her it was because you had been awakened during the
 night and didn't go back to sleep."
 
 Red waited before answering. Should he have told Mom that?
 
 Then he said, "Yes, sir."
 
 "What was it that awakened you?"
 
 Red saw no harm in it. He said, "I don't know, Dad. It sounded like
 thunder, sort of, and like a collision, sort of."
 
 "Could you tell where it came from?"
 
 "It _sounded_ like it was out by the hill." That was truthful, and
 useful as well, since the direction was almost opposite that in which
 the barn lay.
 
 The Industrialist looked at his guest. "I suppose it would do no harm to
 walk toward the hill."
 
 The Astronomer said, "I am ready."
 
 Red watched them walk away and when he turned he saw Slim peering
 cautiously out from among the briars of a hedge.
 
 Red waved at him. "Come on."
 
 Slim stepped out and approached. "Did they say anything about the meat?"
 
 "No. I guess they don't know about that. They went down to the hill."
 
 "What for?"
 
 "Search me. They kept asking about the noise I heard. Listen, did the
 animals eat the meat?"
 
 "Well," said Slim, cautiously, "they were sort of _looking_ at it and
 smelling it or something."
 
 "Okay," Red said, "I guess they'll eat it. Holy Smokes, they've got to
 eat _something_. Let's walk along toward the hill and see what Dad and
 your father are going to do."
 
 "What about the animals?"
 
 "They'll be all right. A fellow can't spend all his time on them. Did
 you give them water?"
 
 "Sure. They drank that."
 
 "See. Come on. We'll look at them after lunch. I tell you what. We'll
 bring them fruit. Anything'll eat fruit."
 
 Together they trotted up the rise, Red, as usual, in the lead.
 
 
 V
 
 The Astronomer said, "You think the noise was their ship landing?"
 
 "Don't you think it could be?"
 
 "If it were, they may all be dead."
 
 "Perhaps not." The Industrialist frowned.
 
 "If they have landed, and are still alive, where are they?"
 
 "Think about that for a while." He was still frowning.
 
 The Astronomer said, "I don't understand you."
 
 "They may not be friendly."
 
 "Oh, no. I've spoken with them. They've--"
 
 "You've spoken with them. Call that reconnaissance. What would their
 next step be? Invasion?"
 
 "But they only have one ship, sir."
 
 "You know that only because they say so. They might have a fleet."
 
 "I've told you about their size. They--"
 
 "Their size would not matter, if they have handweapons that may well be
 superior to our artillery."
 
 "That is not what I meant."
 
 "I had this partly in mind from the first." The Industrialist went on.
 "It is for that reason I agreed to see them after I received your
 letter. Not to agree to an unsettling and impossible trade, but to judge
 their real purposes. I did not count on their evading the meeting."
 
 He sighed. "I suppose it isn't our fault. You are right in one thing, at
 any rate. The world has been at peace too long. We are losing a healthy
 sense of suspicion."
 
 The Astronomer's mild voice rose to an unusual pitch and he said, "I
 _will_ speak. I tell you that there is no reason to suppose they can
 possibly be hostile. They are small, yes, but that is only important
 because it is a reflection of the fact that their native worlds are
 small. Our world has what is for them a normal gravity, but because of
 our much higher gravitational potential, our atmosphere is too dense to
 support them comfortably over sustained periods. For a similar reason
 the use of the world as a base for interstellar travel, except for trade
 in certain items, is uneconomical. And there are important differences
 in chemistry of life due to the basic differences in soils. They
 couldn't eat our food or we theirs."
 
 "Surely all this can be overcome. They can bring their own food, build
 domed stations of lowered air pressure, devise specially designed
 ships."
 
 "They can. And how glibly you can describe feats that are easy to a race
 in its youth. It is simply that they don't have to do any of that. There
 are millions of worlds suitable for them in the Galaxy. They don't need
 this one which isn't."
 
 "How do you know? All this is their information again."
 
 "This I was able to check independently. I am an astronomer, after all."
 
 "That is true. Let me hear what you have to say then, while we walk."
 
 "Then, sir, consider that for a long time our astronomers have believed
 that two general classes of planetary bodies existed. First, the planets
 which formed at distances far enough from their stellar nucleus to
 become cool enough to capture hydrogen. These would be large planets
 rich in hydrogen, ammonia and methane. We have examples of these in the
 giant outer planets. The second class would include those planets formed
 so near the stellar center that the high temperature would make it
 impossible to capture much hydrogen. These would be smaller planets,
 comparatively poorer in hydrogen and richer in oxygen. We know that type
 very well since we live on one. Ours is the only solar system we know in
 detail, however, and it has been reasonable for us to assume that these
 were the _only_ two planetary classes."
 
 "I take it then that there is another."
 
 "Yes. There is a super-dense class, still smaller, poorer in hydrogen,
 than the inner planets of the solar system. The ratio of occurrence of
 hydrogen-ammonia planets and these super-dense water-oxygen worlds of
 theirs over the entire Galaxy--and remember that they have actually
 conducted a survey of significant sample volumes of the Galaxy which we,
 without interstellar travel, cannot do--is about 3 to 1. This leaves
 them seven million super-dense worlds for exploration and colonization."
 
 The Industrialist looked at the blue sky and the green-covered trees
 among which they were making their way. He said, "And worlds like ours?"
 
 The Astronomer said, softly, "Ours is the first solar system they have
 found which contains them. Apparently the development of our solar
 system was unique and did not follow the ordinary rules."
 
 The Industrialist considered that. "What it amounts to is that these
 creatures from space are asteroid-dwellers."
 
 "No, no. The asteroids are something else again. They occur, I was told,
 in one out of eight stellar systems, but they're completely different
 from what we've been discussing."
 
 "And how does your being an astronomer change the fact that you are
 still only quoting their unsupported statements?"
 
 "But they did not restrict themselves to bald items of information. They
 presented me with a theory of stellar evolution which I had to accept
 and which is more nearly valid than anything our own astronomy has ever
 been able to devise, if we except possible lost theories dating from
 Beforethewars. Mind you, their theory had a rigidly mathematical
 development and it predicted just such a Galaxy as they describe. So you
 see, they have all the worlds they wish. They are not land-hungry.
 Certainly not for our land."
 
 "Reason would say so, if what you say is true. But creatures may be
 intelligent and not reasonable. Our forefathers were presumably
 intelligent, yet they were certainly not reasonable. Was it reasonable
 to destroy almost all their tremendous civilization in atomic warfare
 over causes our historians can no longer accurately determine?" The
 Industrialist brooded over it. "From the dropping of the first atom bomb
 over those islands--I forget the ancient name--there was only one end in
 sight, and in plain sight. Yet events were allowed to proceed to that
 end."
 
 He looked up, said briskly, "Well, where are we? I wonder if we are not
 on a fool's errand after all."
 
 But the Astronomer was a little in advance and his voice came thickly.
 "No fool's errand, sir. Look there."
 
 
 VI
 
 Red and Slim had trailed their elders with the experience of youth,
 aided by the absorption and anxiety of their fathers. Their view of the
 final object of the search was somewhat obscured by the underbrush
 behind which they remained.
 
 Red said, "Holy Smokes. Look at that. It's all shiny silver or
 something."
 
 But it was Slim who was really excited. He caught at the other. "I know
 what this is. It's a space-ship. That must be why my father came here.
 He's one of the biggest astronomers in the world and your father would
 have to call him if a space-ship landed on his estate."
 
 "What are you talking about? Dad didn't even know that thing was there.
 He only came here because I told him I heard the thunder from here.
 Besides, there isn't any such thing as a space-ship."
 
 "Sure, there is. Look at it. See those round things. They are ports. And
 you can see the rocket tubes."
 
 "How do you know so much?"
 
 Slim was flushed. He said, "I read about them. My father has books about
 them. Old books. From Beforethewars."
 
 "Huh. Now I know you're making it up. Books from Beforethewars!"
 
 "My father _has_ to have them. He teaches at the University. It's his
 job."
 
 His voice had risen and Red had to pull at him. "You want them to hear
 us?" he whispered indignantly.
 
 "Well, it is, too, a space-ship."
 
 "Look here, Slim, you mean that's a ship from another world."
 
 "It's _got_ to be. Look at my father going round and round it. He
 wouldn't be so interested if it was anything else."
 
 "Other worlds! Where are there other worlds?"
 
 "Everywhere. How about the planets? They're worlds just like ours, some
 of them. And other stars probably have planets. There's probably
 zillions of planets."
 
 Red felt outweighed and outnumbered. He muttered, "You're crazy!"
 
 "All right, then. I'll show you."
 
 "Hey! Where are you going?"
 
 "Down there. I'm going to ask my father. I suppose you'll believe it if
 _he_ tells you. I suppose you'll believe a Professor of Astronomy knows
 what--"
 
 He had scrambled upright.
 
 Red said, "Hey. You don't want them to see us. We're not supposed to be
 here. Do you want them to start asking questions and find out about our
 animals?"
 
 "I don't care. You said I was crazy."
 
 "Snitcher! You promised you wouldn't tell."
 
 "I'm _not_ going to tell. But if they find out themselves, it's your
 fault, for starting an argument and saying I was crazy."
 
 "I take it back, then," grumbled Red.
 
 "Well, all right. You better."
 
 In a way, Slim was disappointed. He wanted to see the space-ship at
 closer quarters. Still, he could not break his vow of secrecy even in
 spirit without at least the excuse of personal insult.
 
 Red said, "It's awfully small for a space-ship."
 
 "Sure, because it's probably a scout-ship."
 
 "I'll bet Dad couldn't even get into the old thing."
 
 So much Slim realized to be true. It was a weak point in his argument
 and he made no answer. His interest was absorbed by the adults.
 
 Red rose to his feet; an elaborate attitude of boredom all about him.
 "Well, I guess we better be going. There's business to do and I can't
 spend all day here looking at some old space-ship or whatever it is.
 We've got to take care of the animals if we're going to be circus-folks.
 That's the first rule with circus-folks. They've got to take care of the
 animals. And," he finished virtuously, "that's what I aim to do,
 anyway."
 
 Slim said, "What for, Red? They've got plenty of meat. Let's watch."
 
 "There's no fun in watching. Besides Dad and your father are going away
 and I guess it's about lunch time."
 
 Red became argumentative. "Look, Slim, we can't start acting suspicious
 or they're going to start investigating. Holy Smokes, don't you ever
 read any detective stories? When you're trying to work a big deal
 without being caught, it's practically the main thing to keep on acting
 just like always. Then they don't suspect anything. That's the first
 law--"
 
 "Oh, all right."
 
 Slim rose resentfully. At the moment, the circus appeared to him a
 rather tawdry and shoddy substitute for the glories of astronomy, and he
 wondered how he had come to fall in with Red's silly scheme.
 
 Down the slope they went, Slim, as usual, in the rear.
 
 
 VII
 
 The Industrialist said, "It's the workmanship that gets me. I never saw
 such construction."
 
 "What good is it now?" said the Astronomer, bitterly. "There's nothing
 left. There'll be no second landing. This ship detected life on our
 planet through accident. Other exploring parties would come no closer
 than necessary to establish the fact that there were no super-dense
 worlds existing in our solar system."
 
 "Well, there's no quarreling with a crash landing."
 
 "The ship hardly seems damaged. If only some had survived, the ship
 might have been repaired."
 
 "If they had survived, there would be no trade in any case. They're too
 different. Too disturbing. In any case--it's over."
 
 They entered the house and the Industrialist greeted his wife calmly.
 "Lunch about ready, dear."
 
 "I'm afraid not. You see--" She looked hesitantly at the Astronomer.
 
 "Is anything wrong?" asked the Industrialist. "Why not tell me? I'm sure
 our guest won't mind a little family discussion."
 
 "Pray don't pay any attention whatever to me," muttered the Astronomer.
 He moved miserably to the other end of the living room.
 
 The woman said, in low, hurried tones, "Really, dear, cook's that upset.
 I've been soothing her for hours and honestly, I don't know why Red
 should have done it."
 
 "Done what?" The Industrialist was more amused than otherwise. It had
 taken the united efforts of himself and his son months to argue his wife
 into using the name "Red" rather than the perfectly ridiculous (viewed
 youngster fashion) name which was his real one.
 
 She said, "He's taken most of the chopped meat."
 
 "He's eaten it?"
 
 "Well, I hope not. It was raw."
 
 "Then what would he want it for?"
 
 "I haven't the slightest idea. I haven't seen him since breakfast.
 Meanwhile cook's just furious. She caught him vanishing out the kitchen
 door and there was the bowl of chopped meat just about empty and she was
 going to use it for lunch. Well, you know cook. She had to change the
 lunch menu and that means she won't be worth living with for a week.
 You'll just have to speak to Red, dear, and make him promise not to do
 things in the kitchen any more. And it wouldn't hurt to have him
 apologize to cook."
 
 "Oh, come. She works for us. If we don't complain about a change in
 lunch menu, why should she?"
 
 "Because she's the one who has double-work made for her, and she's
 talking about quitting. Good cooks aren't easy to get. Do you remember
 the one before her?"
 
 It was a strong argument.
 
 The Industrialist looked about vaguely. He said, "I suppose you're
 right. He isn't here, I suppose. When he comes in, I'll talk to him."
 
 "You'd better start. Here he comes."
 
 Red walked into the house and said cheerfully, "Time for lunch, I
 guess." He looked from one parent to the other in quick speculation at
 their fixed stares and said, "Got to clean up first, though," and made
 for the other door.
 
 The Industrialist said, "One moment, son."
 
 "Sir?"
 
 "Where's your little friend?"
 
 Red said, carelessly, "He's around somewhere. We were just sort of
 walking and I looked around and he wasn't there." This was perfectly
 true, and Red felt on safe ground. "I told him it was lunch time. I
 said, 'I suppose it's about lunch time.' I said, 'We got to be getting
 back to the house.' And he said, 'Yes.' And I just went on and then when
 I was about at the creek I looked around and--"
 
 The Astronomer interrupted the voluble story, looking up from a
 magazine he had been sightlessly rummaging through. "I wouldn't worry
 about my youngster. He is quite self-reliant. Don't wait lunch for him."
 
 "Lunch isn't ready in any case, Doctor." The Industrialist turned once
 more to his son. "And talking about that, son, the reason for it is that
 something happened to the ingredients. Do you have anything to say?"
 
 "Sir?"
 
 "I hate to feel that I have to explain myself more fully. Why did you
 take the chopped meat?"
 
 "The chopped meat?"
 
 "The chopped meat." He waited patiently.
 
 Red said, "Well, I was sort of--"
 
 "Hungry?" prompted his father. "For raw meat?"
 
 "No, sir. I just sort of needed it."
 
 "For what exactly?"
 
 Red looked miserable and remained silent.
 
 The Astronomer broke in again. "If you don't mind my putting in a few
 words--You'll remember that just after breakfast my son came in to ask
 what animals ate."
 
 "Oh, you're right. How stupid of me to forget. Look here, Red, did you
 take it for an animal pet you've got?"
 
 Red recovered indignant breath. He said, "You mean Slim came in here and
 said I had an animal? He came in here and said that? He said I had an
 animal?"
 
 "No, he didn't. He simply asked what animals ate. That's all. Now if he
 promised he wouldn't tell on you, he didn't. It's your own foolishness
 in trying to take something without permission that gave you away. That
 happened to be stealing. Now have you an animal? I ask you a direct
 question."
 
 "Yes, sir." It was a whisper so low as hardly to be heard.
 
 "All right, you'll have to get rid of it. Do you understand?"
 
 Red's mother intervened. "Do you mean to say you're keeping a
 meat-eating animal, Red? It might bite you and give you blood-poison."
 
 "They're only small ones," quavered Red. "They hardly budge if you touch
 them."
 
 "They? How many do you have?"
 
 "Two."
 
 "Where are they?"
 
 The Industrialist touched her arm. "Don't chivvy the child any further,"
 he said, in a low voice. "If he says he'll get rid of them, he will,
 and that's punishment enough."
 
 He dismissed the matter from his mind.
 
 
 VIII
 
 Lunch was half over when Slim dashed into the dining room. For a moment,
 he stood abashed, and then he said in what was almost hysteria, "I've
 got to speak to Red. I've got to say something."
 
 Red looked up in fright, but the Astronomer said, "I don't think, son,
 you're being very polite. You've kept lunch waiting."
 
 "I'm sorry, Father."
 
 "Oh, don't rate the lad," said the Industrialist's wife. "He can speak
 to Red if he wants to, and there was no damage done to the lunch."
 
 "I've got to speak to Red alone," Slim insisted.
 
 "Now that's enough," said the Astronomer with a kind of gentleness that
 was obviously manufactured for the benefit of strangers and which had
 beneath it an easily-recognized edge. "Take your seat."
 
 Slim did so, but he ate only when someone looked directly upon him. Even
 then he was not very successful.
 
 Red caught his eyes. He made soundless words, "Did the animals get
 loose?"
 
 Slim shook his head slightly. He whispered, "No, it's--"
 
 The Astronomer looked at him hard and Slim faltered to a stop.
 
 With lunch over, Red slipped out of the room, with a microscopic motion
 at Slim to follow.
 
 They walked in silence to the creek.
 
 Then Red turned fiercely upon his companion. "Look here, what's the idea
 of telling my Dad we were feeding animals?"
 
 Slim said, "I didn't. I asked what you feed animals. That's not the same
 as saying we were doing it. Besides, it's something else, Red."
 
 But Red had not used up his grievances. "And where did you go anyway? I
 thought you were coming to the house. They acted like it was my fault
 you weren't there."
 
 "But I'm trying to tell you about that, if you'd only shut _up_ a second
 and let me talk. You don't give a fellow a chance."
 
 "Well, go on and tell me if you've got so much to say."
 
 "I'm _trying_ to. I went back to the space-ship. The folks weren't there
 anymore and I wanted to see what it was like."
 
 "It isn't a space-ship," said Red, sullenly. He had nothing to lose.
 
 "It is, too. I looked inside. You could look through the ports and I
 looked inside and they were _dead_." He looked sick. "They were dead."
 
 "_Who_ were dead."
 
 Slim screeched, "Animals! like _our_ animals! Only they _aren't_
 animals. They're people-things from other planets."
 
 For a moment Red might have been turned to stone. It didn't occur to him
 to disbelieve Slim at this point. Slim looked too genuinely the bearer
 of just such tidings. He said, finally, "Oh, my."
 
 "Well, what are we going to do? Golly, will we get a whopping if they
 find out?" He was shivering.
 
 "We better turn them loose," said Red.
 
 "They'll tell on us."
 
 "They can't talk our language. Not if they're from another planet."
 
 "Yes, they can. Because I remember my father talking about some stuff
 like that to my mother when he didn't know I was in the room. He was
 talking about visitors who could talk with the mind. Telepathery or
 something. I thought he was making it up."
 
 "Well, Holy Smokes. I mean--Holy Smokes." Red looked up. "I tell you. My
 Dad said to get rid of them. Let's sort of bury them somewhere or throw
 them in the creek."
 
 "He _told_ you to do that."
 
 "He made me say I had animals and then he said, 'Get rid of them.' I got
 to do what he says. Holy Smokes, he's my Dad."
 
 Some of the panic left Slim's heart. It was a thoroughly legalistic way
 out. "Well, let's do it right now, then, before they find out. Oh,
 golly, if they find out, will we be in trouble!"
 
 They broke into a run toward the barn, unspeakable visions in their
 minds.
 
 
 IX
 
 It was different, looking at them as though they were "people." As
 animals, they had been interesting; as "people," horrible. Their eyes,
 which were neutral little objects before, now seemed to watch them with
 active malevolence.
 
 "They're making noises," said Slim, in a whisper which was barely
 audible.
 
 "I guess they're talking or something," said Red. Funny that those
 noises which they had heard before had not had significance earlier. He
 was making no move toward them. Neither was Slim.
 
 The canvas was off but they were just watching. The ground meat, Slim
 noticed, hadn't been touched.
 
 Slim said, "Aren't you going to do something?"
 
 "Aren't you?"
 
 "You found them."
 
 "It's your turn, now."
 
 "No, it isn't. You found them. It's your fault, the whole thing. I was
 watching."
 
 "You joined in, Slim. You know you did."
 
 "I don't care. You found them and that's what I'll say when they come
 here looking for us."
 
 Red said, "All right for you." But the thought of the consequences
 inspired him anyway, and he reached for the cage door.
 
 Slim said, "Wait!"
 
 Red was glad to. He said, "Now what's biting you?"
 
 "One of them's got something on him that looks like it might be iron or
 something."
 
 "Where?"
 
 "Right there. I saw it before but I thought it was just part of him. But
 if he's 'people,' maybe it's a disintegrator gun."
 
 "What's that?"
 
 "I read about it in the books from Beforethewars. Mostly people with
 space-ships have disintegrator guns. They point them at you and you get
 disintegratored."
 
 "They didn't point it at us till now," pointed out Red with his heart
 not quite in it.
 
 "I don't care. I'm not hanging around here and getting disintegratored.
 I'm getting my father."
 
 "Cowardy-cat. Yellow cowardy-cat."
 
 "I don't care. You can call all the names you want, but if you bother
 them now you'll get disintegratored. You wait and see, and it'll be all
 your fault."
 
 He made for the narrow spiral stairs that led to the main floor of the
 barn, stopped at its head, then backed away.
 
 Red's mother was moving up, panting a little with the exertion and
 smiling a tight smile for the benefit of Slim in his capacity as guest.
 
 "Red! You, Red! Are you up there? Now don't try to hide. I know this is
 where you're keeping them. Cook saw where you ran with the meat."
 
 Red quavered, "Hello, ma!"
 
 "Now show me those nasty animals? I'm going to see to it that you get
 rid of them right away."
 
 It was over! And despite the imminent corporal punishment, Red felt
 something like a load fall from him. At least the decision was out of
 his hands.
 
 "Right there, ma. I didn't do anything to them, ma. I didn't know. They
 just looked like little animals and I thought you'd let me keep them,
 ma. I wouldn't have taken the meat only they wouldn't eat grass or
 leaves and we couldn't find good nuts or berries and cook never lets me
 have anything or I would have asked her and I didn't know it was for
 lunch and--"
 
 He was speaking on the sheer momentum of terror and did not realize that
 his mother did not hear him but, with eyes frozen and popping at the
 cage, was screaming in thin, piercing tones.
 
 
 X
 
 The Astronomer was saying, "A quiet burial is all we can do. There is no
 point in any publicity now," when they heard the screams.
 
 She had not entirely recovered by the time she reached them, running and
 running. It was minutes before her husband could extract sense from her.
 
 She was saying, finally, "I tell you they're in the barn. I don't know
 what they are. No, no--"
 
 She barred the Industrialist's quick movement in that direction. She
 said, "Don't _you_ go. Send one of the hands with a shotgun. I tell you
 I never saw anything like it. Little horrible beasts with--with--I can't
 describe it. To think that Red was touching them and trying to feed
 them. He was _holding_ them, and feeding them meat."
 
 Red began, "I only--"
 
 And Slim said, "It was not--"
 
 The Industrialist said, quickly, "Now you boys have done enough harm
 today. March! Into the house! And not a word; not one word! I'm not
 interested in anything you have to say. After this is all over, I'll
 hear you out and as for you, Red, I'll see that you're properly
 punished."
 
 He turned to his wife. "Now whatever the animals are, we'll have them
 killed." He added quietly once the youngsters were out of hearing,
 "Come, come. The children aren't hurt and, after all, they haven't done
 anything really terrible. They've just found a new pet."
 
 The Astronomer spoke with difficulty. "Pardon me, ma'am, but can you
 describe these animals?"
 
 She shook her head. She was quite beyond words.
 
 "Can you just tell me if they--"
 
 "I'm sorry," said the Industrialist, apologetically, "but I think I had
 better take care of her. Will you excuse me?"
 
 "A moment. Please. One moment. She said she had never seen such animals
 before. Surely it is not usual to find animals that are completely
 unique on an estate such as this."
 
 "I'm sorry. Let's not discuss that now."
 
 "Except that unique animals might have landed during the night."
 
 The Industrialist stepped away from his wife. "What are you implying?"
 
 "I think we had better go to the barn, sir!"
 
 The Industrialist stared a moment, turned and suddenly and quite
 uncharacteristically began running. The Astronomer followed and the
 woman's wail rose unheeded behind them.
 
 
 XI
 
 The Industrialist stared, looked at the Astronomer, turned to stare
 again.
 
 "Those?"
 
 "Those," said the Astronomer. "I have no doubt we appear strange and
 repulsive to them."
 
 "What do they say?"
 
 "Why, that they are uncomfortable and tired and even a little sick, but
 that they are not seriously damaged, and that the youngsters treated
 them well."
 
 "Treated them well! Scooping them up, keeping them in a cage, giving
 them grass and raw meat to eat? Tell me how to speak to them."
 
 "It may take a little time. Think _at_ them. Try to listen. It will come
 to you, but perhaps not right away."
 
 The Industrialist tried. He grimaced with the effort of it, thinking
 over and over again, "The youngsters were ignorant of your identity."
 
 And the thought was suddenly in his mind: "We were quite aware of it and
 because we knew they meant well by us according to their own view of the
 matter, we did not attempt to attack them."
 
 "Attack them?" thought the Industrialist, and said it aloud in his
 concentration.
 
 "Why, yes," came the answering thought. "We are armed."
 
 One of the revolting little creatures in the cage lifted a metal object
 and there was a sudden hole in the top of the cage and another in the
 roof of the barn, each hole rimmed with charred wood.
 
 "We hope," the creatures thought, "it will not be too difficult to make
 repairs."
 
 The Industrialist found it impossible to organize himself to the point
 of directed thought. He turned to the Astronomer. "And with that weapon
 in their possession they let themselves be handled and caged? I don't
 understand it."
 
 But the calm thought came, "We would not harm the young of an
 intelligent species."
 
 
 XII
 
 It was twilight. The Industrialist had entirely missed the evening meal
 and remained unaware of the fact.
 
 He said, "Do you really think the ship will fly?"
 
 "If they say so," said the Astronomer, "I'm sure it will. They'll be
 back, I hope, before too long."
 
 "And when they do," said the Industrialist, energetically, "I will keep
 my part of the agreement. What is more I will move sky and earth to have
 the world accept them. I was entirely wrong, Doctor. Creatures that
 would refuse to harm children, under such provocation as they received,
 are admirable. But you know--I almost hate to say this--"
 
 "Say what?"
 
 "The kids. Yours and mine. I'm almost proud of them. Imagine seizing
 these creatures, feeding them or trying to, and keeping them hidden. The
 amazing gall of it. Red told me it was his idea to get a job in a circus
 on the strength of them. Imagine!"
 
 The Astronomer said, "Youth!"
 
 
 XIII
 
 The Merchant said, "Will we be taking off soon?"
 
 "Half an hour," said the Explorer.
 
 It was going to be a lonely trip back. All the remaining seventeen of
 the crew were dead and their ashes were to be left on a strange planet.
 Back they would go with a limping ship and the burden of the controls
 entirely on himself.
 
 The Merchant said, "It was a good business stroke, not harming the young
 ones. We will get very good terms; _very_ good terms."
 
 The Explorer thought: Business!
 
 The Merchant then said, "They've lined up to see us off. All of them.
 You don't think they're too close, do you? It would be bad to burn any
 of them with the rocket blast at this stage of the game."
 
 "They're safe."
 
 "Horrible-looking things, aren't they?"
 
 "Pleasant enough, inside. Their thoughts are perfectly friendly."
 
 "You wouldn't believe it of them. That immature one, the one that first
 picked us up--"
 
 "They call him Red," provided the Explorer.
 
 "That's a queer name for a monster. Makes me laugh. He actually feels
 _bad_ that we're leaving. Only I can't make out exactly why. The nearest
 I can come to it is something about a lost opportunity with some
 organization or other that I can't quite interpret."
 
 "A circus," said the Explorer, briefly.
 
 "What? Why, the impertinent monstrosity."
 
 "Why not? What would you have done if you had found _him_ wandering on
 _your_ native world; found him sleeping on a field on Earth, red
 tentacles, six legs, pseudopods and all?"
 
 
 XIV
 
 Red watched the ship leave. His red tentacles, which gave him his
 nickname, quivered their regret at lost opportunity to the very last,
 and the eyes at their tips filled with drifting yellowish crystals that
 were the equivalent of Earthly tears.
 
 
 
 
 Transcriber's Note:
 
     This etext was produced from _Space Science Fiction_ May 1952.
     Extensive research did not uncover any evidence that the U.S.
     copyright on this publication was renewed. Minor spelling and
     typographical errors have been corrected without note.
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 Produced by Stephen Hutcheson, Dave Morgan and the Online
 Distributed Proofreading Team at http://www.pgdp.net
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
                          Worlds Within Worlds:
                       The Story of Nuclear Energy
                                 Volume 1
                  Atomic Weights  Energy  Electricity
 
 
                             by Isaac Asimov
 
 
           U. S. Energy Research and Development Administration
                         Office of Public Affairs
                          Washington, D.C. 20545
 
            Library of Congress Catalog Card Number: 75-189477
                                   1972
 
 _Nothing in the history of mankind has opened our eyes to the
 possibilities of science as has the development of atomic power. In the
 last 200 years, people have seen the coming of the steam engine, the
 steamboat, the railroad locomotive, the automobile, the airplane, radio,
 motion pictures, television, the machine age in general. Yet none of it
 seemed quite so fantastic, quite so unbelievable, as what man has done
 since 1939 with the atom ... there seem to be almost no limits to what
 may lie ahead: inexhaustible energy, new worlds, ever-widening knowledge
 of the physical universe._
                                                             Isaac Asimov
 
                 [Illustration: Photograph of night sky]
 
 
 
 
 The U. S. Energy Research and Development Administration publishes a
 series of booklets for the general public.
 
 Please write to the following address for a title list or for
 information on a specific subject:
 
   USERDATechnical Information Center
   P. O. Box 62
   Oak Ridge, Tennessee 37830
 
                       [Illustration: Isaac Asimov]
 
 
 
 
 ISAAC ASIMOV received his academic degrees from Columbia University and
 is Associate Professor of Biochemistry at the Boston University School
 of Medicine. He is a prolific author who has written over 150 books in
 the past 20 years, including about 20 science fiction works, and books
 for children. His many excellent science books for the public cover
 subjects in mathematics, physics, astronomy, chemistry, and biology,
 such as _The Genetic Code_, _Inside the Atom_, _Building Blocks of the
 Universe_, _Understanding Physics_, _The New Intelligent Mans Guide to
 Science_, and _Asimovs Biographical Encyclopedia of Science and
 Technology_.
 
 In 1965 Dr. Asimov received the James T. Grady Award of the American
 Chemical Society for his major contribution in reporting science
 progress to the public.
 
                 [Illustration: Photograph of night sky]
 
 
                                 VOLUME 1
   Introduction                                                          5
   Atomic Weights                                                        6
   Electricity                                                          11
       Units of Electricity                                             11
       Cathode Rays                                                     13
       Radioactivity                                                    17
       The Structure of the Atom                                        25
       Atomic Numbers                                                   30
       Isotopes                                                         35
   Energy                                                               47
       The Law of Conservation of Energy                                47
       Chemical Energy                                                  50
       Electrons and Energy                                             54
       The Energy of the Sun                                            55
       The Energy of Radioactivity                                      57
 
 
                                  VOLUME 2
   Mass and Energy                                                      69
   The Structure of the Nucleus                                         75
       The Proton                                                       75
       The Proton-Electron Theory                                       76
       Protons in Nuclei                                                80
       Nuclear Bombardment                                              82
       Particle Accelerators                                            86
   The Neutron                                                          92
       Nuclear Spin                                                     92
       Discovery of the Neutron                                         95
       The Proton-Neutron Theory                                        98
       The Nuclear Interaction                                         101
       Neutron Bombardment                                             107
 
 
                                  VOLUME 3
   Nuclear Fission                                                     117
       New Elements                                                    117
       The Discovery of Fission                                        122
       The Nuclear Chain Reaction                                      127
       The Nuclear Bomb                                                131
       Nuclear Reactors                                                141
   Nuclear Fusion                                                      147
       The Energy of the Sun                                           147
       Thermonuclear Bombs                                             149
       Controlled Fusion                                               151
   Beyond Fusion                                                       159
       Antimatter                                                      159
       The Unknown                                                     164
   Reading List                                                        166
 
 [Illustration: _A total eclipse of the sun._]
 
 
 
 
                               INTRODUCTION
 
 
 In a way, nuclear energy has been serving man as long as he has existed.
 It has served all of life; it has flooded the earth for billions of
 years. The sun, you see, is a vast nuclear engine, and the warmth and
 light that the sun radiates is the product of nuclear energy.
 
 In order for man to learn to produce and control nuclear energy himself,
 however (something that did not take place until this century), three
 lines of investigationatoms, electricity, and energyhad to develop and
 meet.
 
 We will begin with atoms.
 
 
 
 
                              ATOMIC WEIGHTS
 
 
 As long ago as ancient Greek times, there were men who suspected that
 all matter consisted of tiny particles which were far too small to see.
 Under ordinary circumstances, they could not be divided into anything
 smaller, and they were called atoms from a Greek word meaning
 indivisible.
 
 It was not until 1808, however, that this atomic theory was really put
 on a firm foundation. In that year the English chemist John Dalton
 (1766-1844) published a book in which he discussed atoms in detail.
 Every element, he suggested, was made up of its own type of atoms. The
 atoms of one element were different from the atoms of every other
 element. The chief difference between the various atoms lay in their
 mass, or weight.[1]
 
 Dalton was the first to try to determine what these masses might be. He
 could not work out the actual masses in ounces or grams, for atoms were
 far too tiny to weigh with any of his instruments. He could, however,
 determine their relative weights; that is, how much more massive one
 kind of atom might be than another.
 
 For instance, he found that a quantity of hydrogen gas invariably
 combined with eight times its own mass of oxygen gas to form water. He
 guessed that water consisted of combinations of 1 atom of hydrogen with
 1 atom of oxygen. (A combination of atoms is called a molecule from a
 Greek word meaning a small mass, and so hydrogen and oxygen atoms can
 be said to combine to form a water molecule.)
 
 [Illustration: _John Dalton_]
 
 To account for the difference in the masses of the combining gases,
 Dalton decided that the oxygen atom was eight times as massive as the
 hydrogen atom. If he set the mass of the hydrogen atom at 1 (just for
 convenience) then the mass of the oxygen atom ought to be set at 8.
 These comparative, or relative, numbers were said to be atomic
 weights, so that what Dalton was suggesting was that the atomic weight
 of hydrogen was 1 and the atomic weight of oxygen was 8. By noting the
 quantity of other elements that combined with a fixed mass of oxygen or
 of hydrogen, Dalton could work out the atomic weights of these elements
 as well.
 
 Daltons idea was right, but his details were wrong in some cases. For
 instance, on closer examination it turned out that the water molecule
 was composed of 1 oxygen atom and 2 hydrogen atoms. For this reason, the
 water molecule may be written HO, where H is the chemical symbol for a
 hydrogen atom, and O for an oxygen atom.
 
 It is still a fact that a quantity of hydrogen combines with eight times
 its mass of oxygen, so the single oxygen atom must be eight times as
 massive as the 2 hydrogen atoms taken together. The oxygen atom must
 therefore be sixteen times as massive as a single hydrogen atom. If the
 atomic weight of hydrogen is 1, then the atomic weight of oxygen is 16.
 
 At first it seemed that the atomic weights of the various elements were
 whole numbers and that hydrogen was the lightest one. It made particular
 sense, then, to consider the atomic weight of hydrogen as 1, because
 that made all the other atomic weights as small as possible and
 therefore easy to handle.
 
 The Swedish chemist Jns Jakob Berzelius (1779-1848) continued Daltons
 work and found that elements did not combine in quite such simple
 ratios. A given quantity of hydrogen actually combined with a little bit
 less than eight times its mass of oxygen. Therefore if the atomic weight
 of hydrogen were considered to be 1, the atomic weight of oxygen would
 have to be not 16, but 15.87.
 
 [Illustration: _Jns Jakob Berzelius_]
 
 As it happens, oxygen combines with more elements (and more easily) than
 hydrogen does. The ratio of its atomic weight to that of other elements
 is also more often a whole number. In working out the atomic weight of
 elements it was therefore more convenient to set the atomic weight of
 oxygen at a whole number than that of hydrogen. Berzelius did this, for
 instance, in the table of atomic weights he published in 1828. At first
 he called the atomic weight of oxygen 100. Then he decided to make the
 atomic weights as small as possible, without allowing any atomic weight
 to be less than 1. For that reason, he set the atomic weight of oxygen
 at exactly 16 and in that case, the atomic weight of hydrogen had to be
 placed just a trifle higher than 1. The atomic weight of hydrogen became
 1.008. This system was retained for nearly a century and a half.
 
 Throughout the 19th century, chemists kept on working out atomic weights
 more and more carefully. By the start of the 20th century, most elements
 had their atomic weights worked out to two decimal places, sometimes
 three.
 
 A number of elements had atomic weights that were nearly whole numbers
 on the oxygen = 16 standard. The atomic weight of aluminum was just
 about 27, that of calcium almost 40, that of carbon almost 12, that of
 gold almost 197, and so on.
 
 On the other hand, some elements had atomic weights that were far
 removed from whole numbers. The atomic weight of chlorine was close to
 35.5, that of copper to 63.5, that of iron to 55.8, that of silver to
 107.9, and so on.
 
 Throughout the 19th century, chemists did not know why so many atomic
 weights were whole numbers, while others werent. They simply made their
 measurements and recorded what they found. For an explanation, they had
 to wait for a line of investigation into electricity to come to
 fruition.
 
 
 
 
                               ELECTRICITY
 
 
 Units of Electricity
 
 Through the 18th century, scientists had been fascinated by the
 properties of electricity. Electricity seemed, at the time, to be a very
 fine fluid that could extend through ordinary matter without taking up
 any room.
 
 Electricity did more than radiate through matter, however. It also
 produced important changes in matter. In the first years of the 19th
 century, it was found that a current of electricity could cause
 different atoms or different groups of atoms to move in opposite
 directions through a liquid in which they were dissolved.
 
 The English scientist Michael Faraday (1791-1867) noted in 1832 that a
 given quantity of electricity seemed to liberate the same number of
 atoms of a variety of different elements. In some cases, though, it
 liberated just half the expected number of atoms; or even, in a few
 cases, just a third.
 
 Scientists began to speculate that electricity, like matter, might
 consist of tiny units. When electricity broke up a molecule, perhaps a
 unit of electricity attached itself to each atom. In that case, the same
 quantity of electricity, containing the same number of units, would
 liberate the same number of atoms.
 
 In the case of some elements, each atom could attach 2 units of
 electricity to itself, or perhaps even 3. When that happened a given
 quantity of electricity would liberate only one-half, or only one-third,
 the usual number of atoms. (Thus, 18 units of electricity would liberate
 18 atoms if distributed 1 to an atom; only 9 atoms if distributed 2 to
 an atom; and only 6 atoms if distributed 3 to an atom.)
 
 It was understood at the time that electricity existed in two varieties,
 which were called positive and negative. It appeared that if an atom
 attached a positive unit of electricity to itself it would be pulled in
 one direction through the solution by the voltage. If it attached a
 negative unit of electricity to itself it would be pulled in the other
 direction.
 
 [Illustration: _Michael Faraday_]
 
 The units of electricity were a great deal more difficult to study than
 the atomic units of matter, and throughout the 19th century they
 remained elusive. In 1891, though, the Irish physicist George Johnstone
 Stoney (1826-1911) suggested that the supposed unit of electricity be
 given a name at least. He called the unit an electron.
 
 
 Cathode Rays
 
 An electric current flows through a closed circuit of some conducting
 material, such as metal wires. It starts at one pole of a battery, or of
 some other electricity generating device, and ends at the other. The two
 poles are the positive pole or anode and the negative pole or
 cathode.
 
 If there is a break in the circuit, the current will usually not flow at
 all. If, however, the break is not a large one, and the current is under
 a high driving force (which is called the voltage), then the current
 may leap across the break. If two ends of a wire, making up part of a
 broken circuit, are brought close to each other with nothing but air
 between, a spark may leap across the narrowing gap before they actually
 meet and, while it persists, the current will flow despite the break.
 
 The light of the spark, and the crackling sound it makes, are the
 results of the electric current interacting with molecules of air and
 heating them. Neither the light nor the sound is the electricity itself.
 In order to detect the electricity, the current ought to be forced
 across a gap containing nothing, not even air.
 
 In order to do that, wires would have to be sealed into a glass tube
 from which all (or almost all) the air was withdrawn. This was not easy
 to do and it was not until 1854 that Heinrich Geissler (1814-1879), a
 German glass-blower and inventor, accomplished this feat. The wires
 sealed into such a Geissler tube could be attached to the poles of an
 electric generator, and if enough voltage was built up, the current
 would leap across the vacuum.
 
 [Illustration: _A Geissler tube._ labelled: Current source]
 
 Such experiments were first performed by the German physicist Julius
 Plcker (1801-1868). In 1858 he noticed that when the current flowed
 across the vacuum there was a greenish glow about the wire that was
 attached to the cathode of the generator. Others studied this glow and
 finally the German physicist Eugen Goldstein (1850-1931) decided in 1876
 that there were rays of some sort beginning at the wire attached to the
 negatively charged cathode and ending at the part of the tube opposite
 the cathode. He called them cathode rays.
 
 These cathode rays, it seemed, might well be the electric current
 itself, freed from the metal wires that usually carried it. If so,
 determining the nature of the cathode rays might reveal a great deal
 about the nature of the electric current. Were cathode rays something
 like light and were they made up of tiny waves? Or were they a stream of
 particles possessing mass?
 
 There were physicists on each side of the question. By 1885, however,
 the English physicist William Crookes (1832-1919) showed that cathode
 rays could be made to turn a small wheel when they struck that wheel on
 one side. This seemed to show that the cathode rays possessed mass and
 were a stream of atom-like particles, rather than a beam of mass-less
 light. Furthermore, Crookes showed that the cathode rays could be pushed
 sideways in the presence of a magnet. (This effect, when current flows
 in a wire, is what makes a motor work.) This meant that, unlike either
 light or ordinary atoms, the cathode rays carried an electric charge.
 
 [Illustration: _J. J. Thomson in his laboratory. On his right are early
 X-ray pictures._]
 
 This view of the cathode rays as consisting of a stream of electrically
 charged particles was confirmed by another English physicist, Joseph
 John Thomson (1856-1940). In 1897 he showed that the cathode rays could
 also be made to take a curved path in the presence of electrically
 charged objects. The particles making up the cathode rays were charged
 with negative electricity, judging from the direction in which they were
 made to curve by electrically charged objects.
 
 Thomson had no hesitation in maintaining that these particles carried
 the units of electricity that Faradays work had hinted at. Eventually,
 Stoneys name for the units of electricity was applied to the particles
 that carried those units. The cathode rays, in other words, were
 considered to be made up of streams of electrons and Thomson is usually
 given credit for having discovered the electron.
 
 The extent to which cathode rays curved in the presence of a magnet or
 electrically charged objects depended on the size of the electric charge
 on the electrons and on the mass of the electrons. Ordinary atoms could
 be made to carry an electric charge and by comparing their behavior with
 those of electrons, some of the properties of electrons could be
 determined.
 
 There were, for instance, good reasons to suppose that the electron
 carried a charge of the same size as one that a hydrogen atom could be
 made to carry. The electrons, however, were much easier to pull out of
 their straight-line path than the charged hydrogen atom was. The
 conclusion drawn from this was that the electron had much less mass than
 the hydrogen atom.
 
 Thomson was able to show, indeed, that the electron was much lighter
 than the hydrogen atom, which was the lightest of all the atoms.
 Nowadays we know the relationship quite exactly. We know that it would
 take 1837.11 electrons to possess the mass of a single hydrogen atom.
 The electron is therefore a subatomic particle; the first of this sort
 to be discovered.
 
 In 1897, then, two types of mass-containing particles were known. There
 were the atoms, which made up ordinary matter, and the electrons, which
 made up electric current.
 
 
 Radioactivity
 
 Was there a connection between these two sets of particlesatoms and
 electrons? In 1897, when the electron was discovered, a line of research
 that was to tie the two kinds of particles together had already begun.
 
 In 1895 the German physicist Wilhelm Konrad Roentgen (1845-1923) was
 working with cathode rays. He found that if he made the cathode rays
 strike the glass at the other end of the tube, a kind of radiation was
 produced. This radiation was capable of penetrating glass and other
 matter. Roentgen had no idea as to the nature of the radiation, and so
 called it X rays. This name, containing X for unknown, was
 retained even after physicists worked out the nature of X rays and found
 them to be light-like radiation made up of waves much shorter than those
 of ordinary light.
 
 [Illustration: _Antoine Henri Becquerel._]
 
 At once, physicists became fascinated with X rays and began searching
 for them everywhere. One of those involved in the search was the French
 physicist Antoine Henri Becquerel (1852-1908). A certain compound,
 potassium uranyl sulfate, glowed after being exposed to sunlight and
 Becquerel wondered if this glow, like the glow on the glass in
 Roentgens X-ray tube, contained X rays.
 
                  [Illustration: Roentgens laboratory]
 
 [Illustration: _Wilhelm Roentgen and his laboratory at the University of
 Wrzburg._]
 
 It did, but while investigating the problem in 1896, Becquerel found
 that the compound was giving off invisible penetrating X-ray-like
 radiation continually, whether it was exposed to sunlight or not. The
 radiation was detected because it would fog a photographic plate just as
 light would. Whats more, the radiation would fog the plate, even if the
 plate were wrapped in black paper, so that it could penetrate matter
 just as X rays could.
 
 Others, in addition to Becquerel, were soon investigating the new
 phenomenon. In 1898 the Polish (later French) physicist Marie Sklodowska
 Curie (1867-1934) showed that it was the uranium atom that was the
 source of the radiation, and that any compound containing the uranium
 atom would give off these penetrating rays.
 
 Until then, uranium had not been of much interest to chemists. It was a
 comparatively rare metal that was first discovered in 1789 by the German
 chemist Martin Heinrich Klaproth (1743-1817). It had no particular uses
 and remained an obscure element. As chemists learned to work out the
 atomic weights of the various elements, they found, however, that, of
 the elements then known, uranium had the highest atomic weight of
 all238.
 
 Once uranium was discovered to be an endless source of radiation, it
 gained interest that has risen ever since. Madame Curie gave the name
 radioactivity to this phenomenon of continuously giving off rays.
 Uranium was the first element found to be radioactive.
 
 It did not remain alone, however. It was soon shown that thorium was
 also radioactive. Thorium, which had been discovered in 1829 by
 Berzelius, was made up of atoms that were the second most massive known
 at the time. Thoriums atomic weight is 232.
 
 But what was the mysterious radiation emitted by uranium and thorium?
 
 Almost at once it was learned that whatever the radiation was, it was
 not uniform in properties. In 1899 Becquerel (and others) showed that,
 in the presence of a magnet, some of the radiation swerved in a
 particular direction. Later it was found that a portion of it swerved in
 the opposite direction. Still another part didnt swerve at all but
 moved on in a straight line.
 
 The conclusion was that uranium and thorium gave off three kinds of
 radiation. One carried a positive charge of electricity, one a negative
 charge, and one no charge at all. The New Zealand-born physicist Ernest
 Rutherford (1871-1937) called the first two kinds of radiation alpha
 rays and beta rays, after the first two letters of the Greek
 alphabet. The third was soon called gamma rays after the third letter.
 
 [Illustration: _Ernest Rutherford_]
 
 [Illustration: _Marie Curie and her two daughters, Eve (left) and Irene,
 in 1908._]
 
 [Illustration: _Pierre Curie during a class lecture in 1906, the year of
 his death._]
 
 The gamma rays eventually turned out to be another light-like form of
 radiation, with waves even shorter than those of X rays. The alpha rays
 and beta rays, which carried electric charges, seemed to be streams of
 charged particles (alpha particles and beta particles) just as the
 cathode rays had turned out to be.
 
 In 1900, indeed, Becquerel studied the beta particles and found them to
 be identical in mass and charge with electrons. They _were_ electrons.
 
 By 1906 Rutherford had worked out the nature of the alpha particles.
 They carried a positive electric charge that was twice as great as the
 electrons negative charge. If an electron carried a charge that could
 be symbolized as -, then the charge of the alpha particle was ++.
 Furthermore, the alpha particle was much more massive than the electron.
 It was, indeed, as massive as a helium atom (the second lightest known
 atom) and four times as massive as a hydrogen atom. Nevertheless, the
 alpha particle can penetrate matter in a way in which atoms cannot, so
 that it seems much smaller in diameter than atoms are. The alpha
 particle, despite its mass, is another subatomic particle.
 
 Here, then, is the meeting point of electrons and of atomsthe particles
 of electricity and of matter.
 
 Ever since Dalton had first advanced the atomic theory over a century
 earlier, chemists had assumed that atoms were the fundamental units of
 matter. They had assumed atoms were as small as anything could be and
 that they could not possibly be broken up into anything smaller. The
 discovery of the electron, however, had shown that some particles, at
 least, might be far smaller than any atom. Then, the investigations into
 radioactivity had shown that atoms of uranium and thorium spontaneously
 broke up into smaller particles, including electrons and alpha
 particles.
 
 It would seem, then, that atoms of these elements and, presumably, of
 all elements, were made up of still smaller particles and that among
 these particles were electrons. The atom had a structure and physicists
 became interested in discovering exactly what that structure was.
 
 
 The Structure of the Atom
 
 Since radioactive atoms gave off either positively charged particles or
 negatively charged particles, it seemed reasonable to assume that atoms
 generally were made up of both types of electricity. Furthermore, since
 the atoms in matter generally carried no charge at all, the normal
 neutral atom must be made up of equal quantities of positive charge
 and negative charge.
 
 It turned out that only radioactive atoms, such as those of uranium and
 thorium, gave off positively charged alpha particles. Many atoms,
 however, that were not radioactive, could be made to give off electrons.
 In 1899 Thomson showed that certain perfectly normal metals with no
 trace of radioactivity gave off electrons when exposed to ultraviolet
 light. (This is called the photoelectric effect.)
 
 It was possible to suppose, then, that the main structure of the atom
 was positively charged and generally immovable, and that there were also
 present light electrons, which could easily be detached. Thomson had
 suggested, as early as 1898, that the atom was a ball of matter carrying
 a positive charge and that individual electrons were stuck throughout
 its substance, like raisins in pound cake.
 
 If something like the Thomson view were correct then the number of
 electrons, each with one unit of negative electricity, would depend on
 the total size of the positive charge carried by the atom. If the charge
 were +5, there would have to be 5 electrons present to balance that. The
 total charge would then be 0 and the atom as a whole would be
 electrically neutral.
 
 If, in such a case, an electron were removed, the atomic charge of +5
 would be balanced by only 4 electrons with a total charge of -4. In that
 case, the net charge of the atom as a whole would be +1. On the other
 hand, if an extra electron were forced onto the atom, the charge of +5
 would be balanced by 6 electrons with a total charge of -6, and the net
 charge of the atom as a whole would be -1.
 
 Such electrically charged atoms were called ions and their existence
 had been suspected since Faradays day. Faraday had known that atoms had
 to travel through a solution under the influence of an electric field to
 account for the way in which metals and gases appeared at the cathode
 and anode. It was he who first used the term, ion, from a Greek word
 meaning traveller. The word had been suggested to him by the English
 scholar, William Whewell (1794-1866). In 1884 the Swedish chemist Svante
 August Arrhenius (1859-1927) had first worked out a detailed theory
 based on the suggestion that these ions were atoms or groups of atoms
 that carried an electric charge.
 
 [Illustration: _Svante A. Arrhenius_]
 
 By the close of the 19th century, then, Arrheniuss suggestion seemed
 correct. There were positive ions made up of atoms or groups of atoms,
 from which one or more of the electrons within the atoms had been
 removed. There were negative ions made up of single atoms or of groups
 of atoms, to which one or more extra electrons had been added.
 
                             [Illustration: ]
 
   Neutral atom
     Each unit of positive charge is balanced by a unit of negative
           charge
     In this case, total charge = +2 -2 = 0
   Ionized atom:
     If an electron is removed, the balance is destroyed
     In this case, total charge = +2 -1 = +1
 
 Although Thomsons model of the atom explained the existence of ions and
 the fact that atoms could give off electrons or absorb them, it was not
 satisfactory in all ways. Further investigations yielded results not
 compatible with the raisins-in-the-pound-cake notion.
 
 In 1906 Rutherford began to study what happened when massive subatomic
 particles, such as alpha particles, passed through matter. When alpha
 particles passed through a thin film of gold, for instance, they raced
 through, for the most part, as though nothing were there. The alpha
 particles seemed to push the light electrons aside and to act as though
 the positively charged main body of the atom that Thomson had pictured
 was not solid, but was soft and spongy.
 
 The only trouble was that every once in a while an alpha particle seemed
 to strike something in the gold film and bounce to one side. Sometimes
 it even bounced directly backward. It was as though somewhere in each
 atom there was something at least as massive as the alpha particle.
 
 How large was this massive portion of the atom? It couldnt be very
 large for if it were the alpha particles would hit it frequently.
 Instead, the alpha particles made very few hits. This meant the massive
 portion was very small and that most alpha particles tore through the
 atom without coming anywhere near it.
 
 [Illustration: _Rutherfords alpha particle bombardment apparatus. A
 piece of radium in the lead box (B) emits alpha particles that go
 through the gold foil (F). These particles are scattered at different
 angles onto the fluorescent screen (S), where the flashes caused by each
 impact are seen through the microscope (M). Below, alpha particles are
 shown bouncing off a nucleus in the gold foil._]
 
 [Illustration: ]
 
 By 1911 Rutherford announced his results to the world. He suggested that
 just about all the mass of the atom was concentrated into a very tiny,
 positively charged nucleus at its center. The diameter of the nucleus
 was only about 1/10,000 the diameter of the atom. All the rest of the
 atom was filled with the very light electrons.
 
 [Illustration: _Hans Geiger (left) and Ernest Rutherford at Manchester
 University about 1910._]
 
 According to Rutherfords notion, the atom consisted of a single tiny
 positively charged lead shot at the center of a foam of electrons. It
 was Thomsons notion in reverse. Still, the nucleus carried a positive
 charge of a particular size and was balanced by negatively charged
 electrons. Rutherfords model of the atom explained the existence of
 ions just as easily as Thomsons did and it explained more besides.
 
 For instance, if all the electrons are removed so that only the nucleus
 remains, this nucleus is as massive as an atom but is so tiny in size
 that it can penetrate matter. The alpha particle would be a bare atomic
 nucleus from this point of view.
 
 Rutherfords model of the nuclear atom is still accepted today.
 
 
 Atomic Numbers
 
 Since the atom consisted of a positively charged nucleus at the center,
 and a number of negatively charged electrons outside, the next step was
 to find the exact size of the nuclear charge and the exact number of
 electrons for the different varieties of atoms.
 
 The answer came through a line of research that began with the English
 physicist Charles Glover Barkla (1877-1944). In 1911 he noted that when
 X rays passed through atoms, some were absorbed and some bounced back.
 Those that bounced back had a certain ability to penetrate other matter.
 When the X rays struck atoms of high atomic weight, the X rays that
 bounced back were particularly penetrating. In fact, each different type
 of atom seemed associated with reflected X rays of a particular
 penetrating power, so Barkla called these characteristic X rays.
 
 In 1913 another English physicist, Henry Gwyn-Jeffreys Moseley
 (1887-1915), went into the matter more thoroughly. He measured the exact
 wavelength of the characteristic X rays by reflecting them from certain
 crystals. In crystals, atoms are arranged in regular order and at known
 distances from each other. X rays reflecting from (or more accurately,
 diffracting from) crystals are bent out of their path by the rows of
 atoms. The longer their waves, the more they are bent. From the degree
 of bending the wavelength of the waves can be determined.
 
 [Illustration: _Charles Glover Barkla_]
 
 [Illustration: _Henry Gwyn-Jeffreys Moseley_]
 
 Moseley found that the greater the atomic weight of an atom, the shorter
 the waves of the characteristic X rays associated with it and the more
 penetrating those X rays were. There was such a close connection, in
 fact, that Moseley could arrange the elements in order according to the
 wavelength of the characteristic X rays.
 
 For some 40 years prior to this, the elements had been listed in order
 of atomic weight. This was useful especially since the Russian chemist
 Dmitri I. Mendelev (1834-1907) had arranged them in a periodic table
 based on the atomic weight order in such a way that elements of similar
 properties were grouped together. The elements in this table were
 sometimes numbered consecutively (atomic number) but this was
 inconvenient since, when new elements were discovered, the list of
 atomic numbers might have to be reorganized.
 
 [Illustration: _Dmitri Mendelev and Bohuslav Brauner in Prague in 1900.
 Brauner was a professor of chemistry at the Bohemian University in
 Prague._]
 
 The Danish physicist Niels Bohr (1885-1962) had just advanced a theory
 of atomic structure that made it reasonable to suppose that the
 wavelength of the characteristic X rays depended on the size of the
 nuclear charge of the atoms making up a particular element. Moseley
 therefore suggested that these X rays be used to determine the size of
 the positive charge on its nucleus. The atomic number could then be set
 equal to that charge and be made independent of new discoveries of
 elements.
 
 Hydrogen, for instance, has an atomic number of 1. Its nucleus carries a
 unit positive charge, +1, and the hydrogen atom possesses 1 electron to
 balance this. Helium, with an atomic number of 2, has a nuclear charge
 of +2 and 2 electrons, with a total charge of -2, to balance it. (The
 alpha particle released by radioactive atoms is identical with a helium
 nucleus.)
 
 The atomic number increases as one goes up the line of atoms. Oxygen
 atoms, for instance, have an atomic number of 8 and iron atoms have one
 of 26. At the upper end, thorium is 90 and uranium is 92. Each uranium
 atom has a nucleus bearing a charge of +92 and contains 92 electrons to
 balance this.
 
 Once the notion of the atomic number was worked out, it became possible
 to tell for certain whether any elements remained as yet undiscovered
 and, if so, where in the list they might be.
 
 Thus, when Moseley first presented scientists with the atomic number it
 turned out that there were still 7 elements that were not discovered. At
 least elements with atomic numbers of 43, 61, 72, 75, 85, 87, and 91
 were still not known. By 1945, all seven had been discovered.
 
 It quickly turned out that the atomic number was more fundamental and
 more characteristic of a particular element than was the atomic weight.
 
 [Illustration: _Niels Bohr_]
 
 [Illustration: _Bohrs study._]
 
 Since Daltons time it had been assumed that all the atoms of a
 particular element were of equal atomic weight and that atoms of two
 different elements were always of different atomic weight. The first
 inkling and the first proof that this might not be so came through the
 study of radioactivity.
 
   [Illustration: showing Helium atom, Hydrogen atom; Nucleus, Proton,
                       Neutron, Electron labelled]
 
 
 Isotopes
 
 In 1902 Rutherford and his co-worker Frederick Soddy (1877-1956) showed
 that when uranium atoms gave off alpha particles, a new kind of atom was
 formed that was not uranium at all. It was this new atom that was
 eventually found to give off a beta particle, and then another atom of
 still another element was formed. This work of Rutherford and Soddy
 began a line of investigation that by 1907 had shown that there was a
 whole radioactive chain of elements, each one breaking down to the next
 in line by giving off either an alpha particle or a beta particle, until
 finally a lead atom was formed that was not radioactive.
 
 [Illustration: _Frederick Soddy_]
 
 There was, in short, a radioactive series beginning with uranium
 (atomic number 92) and ending with lead (atomic number 82). The same was
 true of thorium (atomic number 90), which began a series that also ended
 with lead. Still a third element, actinium (atomic number 89) was, at
 that time, the first known member of a series that also ended in lead.
 
 The various atoms formed in these three radioactive series were not all
 different in every way. When the uranium atom gives off an alpha
 particle, it forms an atom originally called uranium X. On close
 investigation, it turned out that this uranium X had the chemical
 properties of thorium. Uranium X, had, however, radioactive properties
 different from ordinary thorium.
 
 Uranium X broke down so rapidly, giving off beta particles as it did
 so, that half of any given quantity would have broken down in 24 days.
 Another way of saying this (which was introduced by Rutherford) was that
 the half-life of uranium X, is 24 days. Ordinary thorium, however,
 gives off alpha particles, not beta particles, and does so at such a
 slow rate, that its half-life is 14 billion years!
 
 Uranium X, and ordinary thorium were in the same place in the list of
 elements by chemical standards, and yet there was clearly something
 different about the two.
 
 Here is another case. In 1913 the British chemist Alexander Fleck
 (1889-    ) studied radium B and radium D, the names given to two
 different kinds of atoms in the uranium radioactive series. He also
 studied thorium B in the thorium radioactive series and actinium B
 in the actinium radioactive series. All four are chemically the same as
 ordinary lead; all four are in the same place in the list of elements.
 Yet each is different from the radioactive standpoint. Though all give
 off beta particles, radium B has a half-life of 27 minutes, radium D one
 of 19 years, thorium B one of 11 hours, and actinium B one of 36
 minutes.
 
 In 1913 Soddy called atoms that were in the same place in the list of
 elements, but which had different radioactive properties, isotopes,
 from Greek words meaning same place.
 
 At first, it seemed that the only difference between isotopes might be
 in their radioactive properties and that only radioactive atoms were
 involved. Quickly that proved not to be so.
 
 It proved that it was possible to have several forms of the same element
 that were all different even though none of them were radioactive. The
 uranium series, the thorium series, and the actinium series all ended in
 lead. In each case the lead formed was stable (not radioactive). Were
 the lead atoms identical in every case? Soddy had worked out the way in
 which atomic weights altered every time an alpha particle or a beta
 particle was given off by an atom. Working through the three radioactive
 series he decided that the lead atoms had different atomic weights in
 each case.
 
 The uranium series ought to end with lead atoms that had an atomic
 weight of 206. The thorium series ought to end in lead atoms with an
 atomic weight of 208 and the actinium series in lead atoms with an
 atomic weight of 207.
 
 If this were so, there would be 3 lead isotopes that would differ not in
 radioactive properties, but in atomic weight. The isotopes could be
 referred to as lead-206, lead-207, and lead-208. If we use the chemical
 symbol for lead (Pb), we could write the isotopes, Pb, Pb, and
 Pb. (We read the symbol Pb as lead-206.) Atomic weight
 measurements made in 1914 by Soddy and others supported that theory.
 
 All 3 lead isotopes had the same atomic number of 82. The atoms of all 3
 isotopes had nuclei with an electric charge of +82 and all 3 had 82
 electrons in the atom to balance that positive nuclear charge. The
 difference was in the mass of the nucleus only.
 
 [Illustration: _Isotopes of two elements._]
 
   Atomic number, 1
     Hydrogen-1: Mass number, 1; 1 Proton, 1 Electron
     Hydrogen-2: Mass number, 2; 1 Proton, 1 Neutron, 1 Electron
   Atomic number, 2
     Helium-3: Mass number, 3; 2 Protons, 1 Neutron, 2 Electrons
     Helium-4: Mass number, 4; 2 Protons, 2 Neutrons, 2 Electrons
 
 But what of ordinary lead that existed in the rocks far removed from any
 radioactive substances and that had presumably been stable through all
 the history of earth? Its atomic weight was 207.2.
 
 Was the stable lead that had no connection with radioactivity made up of
 atoms of still another isotope, one with a fractional atomic weight? Or
 could stable lead be made up of a mixture of isotopes, each of a
 different whole-number atomic weight and was the overall atomic weight a
 fraction only because it was an average?
 
 It was at the moment difficult to tell in the case of lead, but an
 answer came in connection with another element, the rare gas neon
 (atomic symbol Ne), which has an atomic weight of 20.2.
 
 Was that fractional atomic weight something that was possessed by all
 neon atoms without exception or was it the average of some lightweight
 atoms and some heavyweight ones? It would be a matter of crucial
 importance if isotopes of neon could be found, for neon had nothing to
 do with any of the radioactive series. If neon had isotopes then any
 element might have them.
 
 In 1912 Thomson was working on neon. He sent a stream of cathode-ray
 electrons through neon gas. The electrons smashed into the neon atoms
 and knocked an electron off some of them. That left a neon ion carrying
 a single positive chargean ion that could be written Ne.
 
 The neon ions move in the electric field as electrons do, but in the
 opposite direction since they have an opposite charge. In the combined
 presence of a magnet and of an electric field, the neon ions move in a
 curved path. If all the neon ions had the same mass, all would follow
 the same curve. If some were more massive than others, the more massive
 ones would curve less.
 
 The neon ions ended on a photographic plate, which was darkened at the
 point of landing. There were two regions of darkening, because there
 were neon ions of two different masses that curved in two different
 degrees and ended in two different places. Thomson showed, from the
 amount of curving, that there was a neon isotope with an atomic weight
 of 20 and one with an atomic weight of 22Ne and Ne.
 
 Whats more, from the intensity of darkening, it could be seen that
 ordinary neon was made up of atoms that were roughly 90% Ne and 10%
 Ne. The overall atomic weight of neon, 20.2, was the average atomic
 weight of these 2 isotopes.
 
 Thomsons instrument was the first one capable of separating isotopes
 and such instruments came to be called mass spectrometers. The first
 to use the name was the English physicist Francis William Aston
 (1877-1945), who built the first efficient instrument of this type in
 1919.
 
 He used it to study as many elements as he could. He and those who
 followed him located many isotopes and determined the frequency of their
 occurrence with considerable precision. It turned out, for instance,
 that neon is actually 90.9% Ne, and 8.8% Ne. Very small quantities
 of still a third isotope, Ne, are also present, making up 0.3%.
 
 As for ordinary lead in nonradioactive rocks, it is made up of 23.6%
 Pb, 22.6% Pb, and 52.3% Pb. There is still a fourth isotope,
 Pb, which makes up the remaining 1.5% and which is not the product of
 any radioactive series at all.
 
 The isotopes always have atomic weights that are close to, but not
 quite, whole numbers. Any atomic weight of an element that departs
 appreciably from an integer does so only because it is an average of
 different isotopes. For instance, the atomic weight of chlorine
 (chemical symbol Cl) is 35.5, but this is because it is made up of a
 mixture of 2 isotopes. About one quarter of chlorines atoms are Cl
 and about three-quarters are Cl.
 
 [Illustration: _Francis W. Aston_]
 
 [Illustration: _Mass spectrograph as used by Thomson and Aston to
 measure the atomic weight of neon._]
 
 To avoid confusion, the average mass of the isotopes that make up a
 particular element is still called the atomic weight of that element.
 The integer closest to the mass of the individual isotope is spoken of
 as the mass number of that isotope. Thus, chlorine is made up of
 isotopes with mass numbers 35 and 37, but the atomic weight of chlorine
 as it is found in nature is 35.5 (or, to be more accurate, 35.453).
 
 In the same way, ordinary lead is made up of isotopes with mass numbers
 204, 206, 207, and 208, and its atomic weight is 207.19; neon is made up
 of isotopes with mass numbers 20, 21, and 22, and its atomic weight is
 20.183, and so on.
 
 If the atomic weight of some element happens to be very close to a whole
 number to begin with, it may consist of a single kind of atom. For
 instance, the gas fluorine (chemical symbol F) has an atomic weight of
 nearly 19, while that of the metal sodium (chemical symbol Na) is nearly
 23. As it turns out, all the atoms of fluorine are of the single variety
 F, while all the atoms of sodium are Na.
 
 Sometimes the atomic weight of an element, as it occurs in nature, is
 nearly a whole number and yet it is made up of more than 1 isotope. In
 that case, one of the isotopes makes up very nearly all of it, while the
 others are present in such minor quantities that the average is hardly
 affected.
 
 Helium, for instance (atomic symbol He) has an atomic weight of just
 about 4 and, indeed, almost all the atoms making it up are He. However,
 0.0001% of the atoms, or one out of a million, are He. Again, 99.6% of
 all the nitrogen atoms (atomic symbol N) are N, but 0.4% are N.
 Then, 98.9% of all carbon atoms (atomic symbol C) are C, but 1.1% are
 C. It is not surprising that the atomic weights of nitrogen and carbon
 are just about 14 and 12, respectively.
 
 [Illustration: _Harold Urey_]
 
 Even hydrogen does not escape. Its atomic weight is just about 1 and
 most of its atoms are H. The American chemist Harold Clayton Urey
 (1893-    ) detected the existence of a more massive isotope, H. This
 isotope has almost twice the mass of the lighter one. No other isotopes
 of a particular atom differ in mass by so large a factor. For that
 reason H and H differ in ordinary chemical properties more than
 isotopes usually do and Urey therefore gave H the special name of
 deuterium from a Greek word meaning second.
 
 [Illustration: _W. F. Giauque_]
 
 In 1929 the American chemist William Francis Giauque (1895-    ) found
 that oxygen was composed of more than 1 isotope. Its atomic weight had
 been set arbitrarily at 16.0000 so it was a relief that 99.76% of its
 atoms were O. However, 0.20% were O, and 0.04% were O.
 
 As you see, O must have a mass number of slightly less than 16.0000
 and it must be the more massive isotopes O and O that pull the
 average up to 16.0000. Disregarding this, chemists clung to a standard
 atomic weight of 16.000 for oxygen as it appeared in nature, preferring
 not to concern themselves with the separate isotopes.
 
 Physicists, however, felt uneasy at using an average as standard for
 they were more interested in working with individual isotopes. They
 preferred to set O at 16.0000 so that the average atomic weight of
 oxygen was 16.0044 and all other atomic weights rose in proportion.
 Atomic weights determined by this system were physical atomic weights.
 
 Finally, in 1961, a compromise was struck. Chemists and physicists alike
 decided to consider the atomic weight of C as exactly 12 and to use
 that as a standard. By this system, the atomic weight of oxygen became
 15.9994, which is only very slightly less than 16.
 
 The radioactive elements did not escape this new view either. The atomic
 weight of uranium (chemical symbol U) is just about 238 and, indeed,
 most of its atoms are U. In 1935, however, the Canadian-American
 physicist, Arthur Jeffrey Dempster (1886-1950), found that 0.7% of its
 atoms were a lighter isotope, U.
 
 These differed considerably in radioactive properties. The common
 uranium isotope, U, had a half-life of 4500 million years, while U
 had a half-life of only 700 million years. Furthermore U broke down
 in three stages to actinium. It was U, not actinium itself, that was
 the beginning of the actinium radioactive series.
 
 As for thorium (atomic symbol Th) with an atomic weight of 232, it did
 indeed turn out that in the naturally occurring element virtually all
 the atoms were Th.
 
 
 
 
                                  ENERGY
 
 
 The Law of Conservation of Energy
 
 We have now gone as far as we conveniently can in considering the
 intertwining strands of the atom and of electricity. It is time to turn
 to the third strandenergy.
 
 To physicists the concept of work is that of exerting a force on a
 body and making it move through some distance. To lift a weight against
 the pull of gravity is work. To drive a nail into wood against the
 friction of its fibers is work.
 
 Anything capable of performing work is said to possess energy from
 Greek words meaning work within. There are various forms of energy.
 Any moving mass possesses energy by virtue of its motion. That is, a
 moving hammer will drive a nail into wood, while the same hammer held
 motionlessly against the nailhead will not do so. Heat is a form of
 energy, since it will expand steam that will force wheels into motion
 that can then do work. Electricity, magnetism, sound, and light can be
 made to perform work and are forms of energy.
 
 The forms of energy are so many and so various that scientists were
 eager to find some rule that covered them all and would therefore serve
 as a unifying bond. It did not seem impossible that such a rule might
 exist, since one had been found in connection with matter that appeared
 in even greater variety than energy did.
 
 All matter, whatever its form and shape, possessed mass, and in the
 1770s, the French chemist Antoine Laurent Lavoisier (1743-1794)
 discovered that the quantity of mass was constant. If a system of matter
 were isolated and made to undergo complicated chemical reactions,
 everything about it might change, but not its mass. A solid might turn
 into a gas; a single substance might change into two or three different
 substances, but whatever happened, the total mass at the end was exactly
 the same (as nearly as chemists could tell) as at the beginning. None
 was either created or destroyed, however, the nature of the matter might
 change. This was called the law of conservation of mass.
 
 [Illustration: _Lavoisier in his laboratory during his studies on
 respiration. From a sketch made by Madame Lavoisier._]
 
 [Illustration: _Antoine Lavoisier and his wife._]
 
 Naturally, it would occur to scientists to wonder if a similar law might
 hold for energy. The answer wasnt easy to get. It wasnt as simple to
 measure the quantity of energy as it was to measure the quantity of
 mass. Nor was it as simple to pen up a quantity of energy and keep it
 from escaping or from gaining additional quantity from outside, as it
 was in the case of mass.
 
 Beginning in 1840, however, the English physicist James Prescott Joule
 (1818-1889) began a series of experiments in which he made use of every
 form of energy he could think of. In each case he turned it into heat
 and allowed the heat to raise the temperature of a given quantity of
 water. He used the rise in temperature as a measure of the energy. By
 1847 he was convinced that any form of energy could be turned into fixed
 and predictable amounts of heat; that a certain amount of work was
 equivalent to a certain amount of heat.
 
 In that same year, the German physicist Hermann Ludwig Ferdinand von
 Helmholtz (1821-1894) advanced the general notion that a fixed amount of
 energy in one form was equal to the same amount of energy in any other
 form. Energy might change its form over and over, but not change its
 amount. None could either be destroyed or created. This is the law of
 conservation of energy.
 
 
 Chemical Energy
 
 There is energy in a piece of wood. Left quietly to itself, it seems
 completely incapable of bringing about any kind of work. Set it on fire,
 however, and the wood plus the oxygen in the air will give off heat and
 light that are clearly forms of energy. The heat could help boil water
 and run a steam engine.
 
 The amount of energy in burning wood could be measured if it were mixed
 with air and allowed to burn in a closed container that was immersed in
 a known quantity of water. From the rise in temperature of the water,
 the quantity of energy produced could be measured in units called
 calories (from a Latin word for heat). The instrument was therefore
 called a calorimeter.
 
 In the 1860s the French chemist Pierre Eugne Marcelin Berthelot
 (1827-1907) carried through hundreds of such determinations. His work
 and similar work by others made it clear that such chemical energythe
 energy derived from chemical changes in matterfit the law of
 conservation of energy.
 
 Heres how it looked in the last decades of the 19th century.
 
 Molecules are composed of combinations of atoms. Within the molecules,
 the atoms stick together more or less tightly. It takes a certain amount
 of energy to pull a molecule apart into separate atoms against the
 resistance of the forces holding them together.
 
 If, after being pulled apart, the atoms are allowed to come together
 again, they give off energy. The amount of energy they give off in
 coming together is exactly equal to the amount of energy they had to
 gain before they could separate.
 
 This is true of all substances. For instance, hydrogen gas, as it is
 found on earth, is made up of molecules containing 2 hydrogen atoms each
 (H). Add a certain amount of energy and you pull the atoms apart; allow
 the atoms to come back together into paired molecules, and the added
 energy is given back again. The same is true for the oxygen molecule,
 which is made up of 2 oxygen atoms (O) and of the water molecule (HO).
 Always the amount of energy absorbed in one change is given off in the
 opposite change. The amount absorbed and the amount given off are always
 exactly equal.
 
 However, the amount of energy involved differs from molecule to
 molecule. It is quite hard to pull hydrogen molecules apart, and it is
 even harder to pull oxygen molecules apart. You have to supply about 12%
 more energy to pull an oxygen molecule apart than to pull a hydrogen
 molecule apart. Naturally, if you let 2 oxygen atoms come together to
 form an oxygen molecule, you get back 12% more energy than if you allow
 2 hydrogen atoms to come together to form a hydrogen molecule.
 
 It takes a considerably larger amount of energy to pull apart a water
 molecule into separate atoms than to pull apart either hydrogen or
 oxygen molecules. Naturally, that greater energy is also returned once
 the hydrogen and oxygen atoms are allowed to come back together into
 water molecules.
 
 Next, imagine pulling apart hydrogen and oxygen molecules into hydrogen
 and oxygen atoms and then having those atoms come together to form
 _water_ molecules. A certain amount of energy is put into the system to
 break up the hydrogen and oxygen molecules, but then a much greater
 amount of energy is given off when the water molecules form.
 
 It is for that reason that a great deal of energy (mostly in the form of
 heat) is given off if a jet of hydrogen gas and a jet of oxygen gas are
 allowed to mix in such a way as to form water.
 
 Just mixing the hydrogen and oxygen isnt enough. The molecules of
 hydrogen and oxygen must be separated and that takes a little energy.
 The energy in a match flame is enough to raise the temperature of the
 mixture and to make the hydrogen and oxygen molecules move about more
 rapidly and more energetically. This increases the chance that some
 molecules will be broken up into separate atoms (though the actual
 process is rather complicated). An oxygen atom might then strike a
 hydrogen molecule to form water (O + H  HO) and more energy is given
 off than was absorbed from the match flame. The temperature goes up
 still higher so that further breakup among the oxygen and hydrogen
 molecules is encouraged.
 
 [Illustration: _The formation of a sodium chloride molecule._]
 
 This happens over and over again so that in very little time, the
 temperature is very high and the hydrogen and oxygen are combining to
 form water at an enormous rate. If a great deal of hydrogen and oxygen
 are well-mixed to begin with, the rate of reaction is so great that an
 explosion occurs.
 
 Such a situation, in which each reacting bit of the system adds energy
 to the system by its reaction and brings about more reactions like
 itself, is called a chain reaction. Thus, a match flame put to one
 corner of a large sheet of paper will set that corner burning. The heat
 of the burning will ignite a neighboring portion of the sheet and so on
 till the entire sheet is burned. For that matter a single smoldering
 cigarette end can serve to burn down an entire forest in a vastly
 destructive chain reaction.
 
 
 Electrons and Energy
 
 The discovery of the structure of the atom sharpened the understanding
 of chemical energy.
 
 In 1904 the German chemist Richard Abegg (1869-1910) first suggested
 that atoms were held together through the transfer of electrons from one
 atom to another.
 
 To see how this worked, one began by noting that electrons in an atom
 existed in a series of shells. The innermost shell could hold only 2
 electrons, the next 8, the next 18 and so on. It turned out that some
 electron arrangements were more stable than others. If only the
 innermost shell contained electrons and it were filled with the 2
 electrons that were all it could hold, then that was a stable
 arrangement. If an atom contained electrons in more than one shell and
 the outermost shell that held electrons held 8, that was a stable
 arrangement, too.
 
 Thus, the helium atom has 2 electrons only, filling the innermost shell,
 and that is so stable an arrangement that helium undergoes no chemical
 reactions at all. The neon atom has 10 electrons2 in the innermost
 shell, and 8 in the nextand it does not react. The argon atom has 18
 electrons2, 8, and 8and it too is very stable.
 
 But what if an atom did not have its electron shell so neatly filled.
 The sodium atom has 11 electrons2, 8, and 1while the fluorine atom has
 9 electrons2 and 7. If the sodium atom passed one of its electrons to a
 fluorine atom, both would have the stable configuration of neon2 and 8.
 This, therefore, ought to have a great tendency to happen.
 
 If it did happen, though, the sodium atom, minus 1 electron, would have
 a unit positive charge and would be Na, a positively charged ion.
 Fluorine with 1 electron in excess would become F, a negatively charged
 ion. The 2 ions, with opposite charges, would cling together, since
 opposite charges attract, and thus the molecule of sodium fluoride (NaF)
 would be formed.
 
 In 1916 the American chemist Gilbert Newton Lewis (1875-1946) carried
 this notion farther. Atoms could cling together not only as a result of
 the outright transfer of 1 or more electrons, but through sharing pairs
 of electrons. This sharing could only take place if the atoms remained
 close neighbors, and it would take energy to pull them apart and break
 up the shared pool, just as it would take energy to pull 2 ions apart
 against the attraction of opposite charges.
 
 In this way the vague notions of atoms clinging together in molecules
 and being forced apart gave way to a much more precise picture of
 electrons being transferred or shared. The electron shifts could be
 dealt with mathematically by a system that came to be called quantum
 mechanics and chemistry was thus made a more exact science than it had
 ever been before.
 
 
 The Energy of the Sun
 
 The most serious problem raised by the law of conservation of energy
 involved the sun. Until 1847, scientists did not question sunlight. The
 sun radiated vast quantities of energy but that apparently was its
 nature and was no more to be puzzled over than the fact that the earth
 rotated on its axis.
 
 Once Helmholtz had stated that energy could neither be created nor
 destroyed, however, he was bound to ask where the suns energy came
 from. It had, to mans best knowledge, been radiating heat and light,
 with no perceptible change, throughout the history of civilization and,
 from what biologists and geologists could deduce, for countless ages
 earlier. Where, then, did that energy come from?
 
 The sun gave the appearance of being a huge globe of fire. Could it
 actually be thata large heap of burning fuel, turning chemical energy
 into heat and light?
 
 The suns mass was known and its rate of energy production was known.
 Suppose the suns mass were a mixture of hydrogen and oxygen and it were
 burning at a rate sufficient to produce the energy at the rate it was
 giving it off. If that were so, all the hydrogen and oxygen in its mass
 would be consumed in 1500 years. No chemical reaction in the sun could
 account for its having given us heat and light since the days of the
 pyramids, let alone since the days of the dinosaurs.
 
 Was there some source of energy greater than chemical energy? What about
 the energy of motion? Helmholtz suggested that meteors might be falling
 into the sun at a steady rate. The energy of their collisions might then
 be converted into heat and light and this could keep the sun shining for
 as long as the supply of meteors held outeven millions of years.
 
 This, however, would mean that the suns mass would be increasing
 steadily, and so would the force of its gravitational pull. With the
 suns gravitational field increasing steadily, the length of earths
 year would be decreasing at a measurable ratebut it wasnt.
 
 In 1854 Helmholtz came up with something better. He suggested that the
 sun was contracting. Its outermost layers were falling inward, and the
 energy of this fall was converted into heat and light. Whats more, this
 energy would be obtained without any change in the mass of the sun
 whatever.
 
 Helmholtz calculated that the suns contraction over the 6000 years of
 recorded history would have reduced its diameter only 560 milesa change
 that would not have been noticeable to the unaided eye. Since the
 development of the telescope, two and a half centuries earlier, the
 decrease in diameter would have been only 23 miles and that was not
 measurable by the best techniques of Helmholtzs day.
 
 Working backward, however, it seemed that 25 million years ago, the sun
 must have been so large as to fill the earths orbit. Clearly the earth
 could not then have existed. In that case, the maximum age of the earth
 was only 25 million years.
 
 Geologists and biologists found themselves disturbed by this. The slow
 changes in the earths crust and in the evolution of life made it seem
 very likely that the earth must have been in existencewith the sun
 delivering heat and light very much in the present fashionfor many
 hundreds of millions of years.
 
 Yet there seemed absolutely no other way of accounting for the suns
 energy supply. Either the law of conservation of energy was wrong (which
 seemed unlikely), or the painfully collected evidence of geologists and
 biologists was wrong (which seemed unlikely),or there was some source
 of energy greater than any known in the 19th century, whose existence
 had somehow escaped mankind (which also seemed unlikely).
 
 Yet one of those unlikely alternatives would have to be true. And then
 in 1896 came the discovery of radioactivity.
 
 
 The Energy of Radioactivity
 
 It eventually became clear that radioactivity involved the giving off of
 energy. Uranium emitted gamma rays that we now know to be a hundred
 thousand times as energetic as ordinary light rays. Whats more, alpha
 particles were being emitted at velocities of perhaps 30,000 kilometers
 per second, while the lighter beta particles were being shot off at
 velocities of up to 250,000 kilometers per second (about 0.8 times the
 velocity of light).
 
 At first, the total energy given off by radioactive substances seemed so
 small that there was no use worrying about it. The amount of energy
 liberated by a gram of uranium in 1 second of radioactivity was an
 insignificant fraction of the energy released by a burning candle.
 
 In a few years, however, something became apparent. A lump of uranium
 might give off very little energy in a second, but it kept on for second
 after second, day after day, month after month, and year after year with
 no perceptible decrease. The energy released by the uranium over a very
 long time grew to be enormous. It eventually turned out that while the
 rate at which uranium delivered energy did decline, it did so with such
 unbelievable slowness that it took 4.5 billion years (!) for that rate
 to decrease to half what it was to begin with.
 
 If _all_ the energy delivered by a gram of uranium in the course of its
 radioactivity over many billions of years was totalled, it was
 enormously greater than the energy produced by the burning of a candle
 with a mass equal to that of uranium.
 
 Lets put it another way. We might think of a single uranium atom
 breaking down and shooting off an alpha particle. We might also think of
 a single carbon atom combining with 2 oxygen atoms to form carbon
 dioxide. The uranium atom would give off 2,000,000 times as much energy
 in breaking down, as the carbon atom would in combining.
 
 The energy of radioactivity is millions of times as intense as the
 energy released by chemical reactions. The reason mankind had remained
 unaware of radioactivity and very aware of chemical reactions was,
 first, that the most common radioactive processes are so slow that their
 great energies were stretched over such enormous blocks of time as to be
 insignificant on a per second basis.
 
 Secondly, chemical reactions are easily controlled by changing
 quantities, concentrations, temperatures, pressures, states of mixtures,
 and so on, and this makes them easy to take note of and to study. The
 rate of radioactive changes, however, could not apparently be altered.
 The early investigators quickly found that the breakdown of uranium-238,
 for instance, could not be hastened by heat, pressure, changes in
 chemical combination, or, indeed, anything else they could think of. It
 remained incredibly slow.
 
 But despite all this, radioactivity had at last been discovered and the
 intensity of its energies was recognized and pointed out in 1902 by
 Marie Curie and her husband Pierre Curie (1859-1906).
 
 Where, then, did the energy come from? Could it come from the outside?
 Could the radioactive atoms somehow collect energy from their
 surroundings, concentrate it several million-fold, and then let it out
 all at once?
 
 To concentrate energy in this fashion would violate something called
 the second law of thermodynamics. This was first proposed in 1850 by
 the German physicist Rudolf Julius Emmanuel Clausius (1822-1888) and had
 proved so useful that physicists did not like to abandon it unless they
 absolutely had to.
 
 Another possibility was that radioactive atoms were creating energy out
 of nothing. This, of course, violated the law of conservation of energy
 (also called the first law of thermodynamics) and physicists preferred
 not to do that either.
 
 The only thing that seemed to remain was to suppose that somewhere
 within the atom was a source of energy that had never made itself
 evident to humanity until the discovery of radioactivity. Becquerel was
 one of the first to suggest this.
 
 It might have seemed at first that only radioactive elements had this
 supply of energy somewhere within the atom, but in 1903 Rutherford
 suggested that all atoms had a vast energy supply hidden within
 themselves. The supply in uranium and thorium leaked slightly, so to
 speak, and that was all that made them different.
 
 [Illustration: _The room in which the Curies discovered radium. Pierre
 Curies writing is on the blackboard._]
 
 But if a vast supply of energy existed in atoms, it was possible that
 the solution to the puzzle of the suns energy might rest there. As
 early as 1899 the American geologist Thomas Chrowder Chamberlin
 (1843-1928) was already speculating about a possible connection between
 radioactivity and the suns energy.
 
 If it were some variety of this newly discovered source of energy (not
 necessarily ordinary radioactivity, of course) that powered the
 sunmillions of times as intense as chemical energythen the sun might
 be pouring out energy for hundreds of millions of years without
 perceptible physical changejust as uranium would show scarcely any
 change even in so mighty a time span. The sun would not have to be
 contracting; it would not have had to fill the earths orbit 25,000,000
 years ago.
 
 This was all exciting, but in 1900 the structure of the atom had not yet
 been worked out and this new energy was just a vague supposition. No one
 had any idea of what it actually might be or where in the atom it might
 be located. It could only be spoken of as existing within the atom and
 was therefore called atomic energy. Through long habit, it is still
 called that much of the time. And yet atomic energy is not a good
 name. In the first couple of decades of the 20th century, it became
 apparent that ordinary chemical energy involved electron shifts and
 those electrons were certainly components of atoms. This meant that a
 wood fire was a kind of atomic energy.
 
 The electrons, however, existed only in the outer regions of the atom.
 Once Rutherford worked out the theory of the nuclear atom, it became
 apparent that the energy involved in radioactivity and in solar
 radiation had to involve components of the atom that were more massive
 and more energetic than the light electrons. The energy had to come,
 somehow, from the atomic nucleus.
 
 What is involved then in radioactivity and in the sun is nuclear
 energy. That is the proper name for it and in the next section we will
 consider the subsequent history of the nuclear energy that broke upon
 the startled consciousness of scientists as the 20th century opened and
 which, less than half a century later, was to face mankind with untold
 consequences for good and for evil.
 
 
 
 
                                FOOTNOTES
 
 
 [1]Mass is the correct term, but weight, which is a somewhat
     different thing, is so commonly used instead that in this book I
     wont try to make any distinction.
 
 
 
 
                             QUOTATION CREDIT
 
 
   Inside front cover    Copyright  by Abelard-Shuman, Ltd., New York.
                         Reprinted by permission from _Inside the Atom_,
                         Isaac Asimov, 1966.
 
 
 
 
                              PHOTO CREDITS
 
 
   Cover                 The Metropolitan Museum of Art
   Page facing inside    The Horsehead Nebula in Orion. Hale
   cover                 Observatories.
   Authors Photo        Jay K. Klein
   Contents page &       Lick Observatory
   page 4
   Page
   7                     New York Public Library
   9                     From _Discovery of the Elements_, Mary E. Weeks,
                         Chemical Education Publishing Company, 1968.
   12                    Library of Congress
   15                    Sir George Thomson
   18                    Burndy Library
   19                    New York Public Library
   21                    Copyright  1965 by Barbara Lovett Cline,
                         reprinted from her volume _The Questioners:
                         Physicists and the Quantum Theory_ by permission
                         of Thomas Y. Crowell Company, Inc., New York.
   22 & 23               Curie Foundation, Institute of Radium
   26                    Academic Press, Inc.
   29                    Van Nostrand Reinhold Company
   31                    Top, Nobel Institute; bottom, from _Discovery of
                         the Elements_, Mary E. Weeks, Chemical Education
                         Publishing Company, 1968.
   32                    From _Discovery of the Elements_, Mary E. Weeks,
                         Chemical Education Publishing Company, 1968.
   34                    Top, Nobel Institute; bottom, Niels Bohr
                         Institute.
   36, 42, 44, & 45      Nobel Institute
   48                    Academic Press, Inc.
   49                    From _Discovery of the Elements_, Mary E. Weeks,
                         Chemical Education Publishing Company, 1968.
   60                    Curie Foundation, Institute of Radium
 
                        U.S. GOVERNMENT PRINTING OFFICE: 1975640285/13
 
 
 A word about ERDA....
 
 The mission of the U. S. Energy Research & Development Administration
 (ERDA) is to develop all energy sources, to make the Nation basically
 self-sufficient in energy, and to protect public health and welfare and
 the environment. ERDA programs are divided into six major categories:
 
  CONSERVATION OF ENERGYMore efficient use of existing energy sources,
 development of alternate fuels and engines for automobiles to reduce
 dependence on petroleum, and elimination of wasteful habits of energy
 consumption.
 
  FOSSIL ENERGYExpansion of coal production and the development of
 technologies for converting coal to synthetic gas and liquid fuels,
 improvement of oil drilling methods and of techniques for converting
 shale deposits to usable oil.
 
  SOLAR, GEOTHERMAL, AND ADVANCED ENERGY SYSTEMSResearch on solar
 energy to heat, cool, and eventually electrify buildings, on conversion
 of underground heat sources to gas and electricity, and on fusion
 reactors for the generation of electricity.
 
  ENVIRONMENT AND SAFETYInvestigation of health, safety, and
 environmental effects of the development of energy technologies, and
 research on management of wastes from energy production.
 
  NUCLEAR ENERGYExpanding medical, industrial and research applications
 and upgrading reactor technologies for the generation of electricity,
 particularly using the breeder concept.
 
  NATIONAL SECURITYProduction and administration of nuclear materials
 serving both civilian and military needs.
 
 ERDA programs are carried out by contract and cooperation with industry,
 university communities, and other government agencies. For more
 information, write to USERDATechnical Information Center, P. O. Box 62,
 Oak Ridge, Tennessee 37830.
 
     [Illustration: ENERGY RESEARCH & DEVELOPMENT ADMINISTRATION USA]
 
                              United States
              Energy Research and Development Administration
                         Office of Public Affairs
                          Washington, D.C. 20545
 
 
 
 
                           Transcribers Notes
 
 
 --Retained publication information from the printed edition: this eBook
   is public-domain in the country of publication.
 
 --In the text version only, underlined or italicized text is delimited
   by _underscores_.
 
 --Where possible, UTF superscript and subscript numbers are used; some
   e-reader fonts may not support these characters.
 
 --In the text versions only, other superscript text is preceded by caret
   and delimited by ^{brackets}.
 
 --In the text versions only, other subscripted text is preceded by
   underscore and delimited by _{brackets}.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 End of the Project Gutenberg EBook of Worlds Within Worlds: The Story of

 
 
 
 Produced by Stephen Hutcheson, Dave Morgan and the Online
 Distributed Proofreading Team at http://www.pgdp.net
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
                          Worlds Within Worlds:
                       The Story of Nuclear Energy
                                 Volume 2
       Mass and Energy  The Neutron  The Structure of the Nucleus
 
 
                             by Isaac Asimov
 
 
           U. S. Energy Research and Development Administration
                         Office of Public Affairs
                          Washington, D.C. 20545
 
            Library of Congress Catalog Card Number: 75-189477
                                   1972
 
 _Nothing in the history of mankind has opened our eyes to the
 possibilities of science as has the development of atomic power. In the
 last 200 years, people have seen the coming of the steam engine, the
 steamboat, the railroad locomotive, the automobile, the airplane, radio,
 motion pictures, television, the machine age in general. Yet none of it
 seemed quite so fantastic, quite so unbelievable, as what man has done
 since 1939 with the atom ... there seem to be almost no limits to what
 may lie ahead: inexhaustible energy, new worlds, ever-widening knowledge
 of the physical universe._
                                                             Isaac Asimov
 
                 [Illustration: Photograph of night sky]
 
 
 
 
 The U. S. Energy Research and Development Administration publishes a
 series of booklets for the general public.
 
 Please write to the following address for a title list or for
 information on a specific subject:
 
   USERDATechnical Information Center
   P. O. Box 62
   Oak Ridge, Tennessee 37830
 
                       [Illustration: Isaac Asimov]
 
 
 
 
 ISAAC ASIMOV received his academic degrees from Columbia University and
 is Associate Professor of Biochemistry at the Boston University School
 of Medicine. He is a prolific author who has written over 150 books in
 the past 20 years, including about 20 science fiction works, and books
 for children. His many excellent science books for the public cover
 subjects in mathematics, physics, astronomy, chemistry, and biology,
 such as _The Genetic Code_, _Inside the Atom_, _Building Blocks of the
 Universe_, _Understanding Physics_, _The New Intelligent Mans Guide to
 Science_, and _Asimovs Biographical Encyclopedia of Science and
 Technology_.
 
 In 1965 Dr. Asimov received the James T. Grady Award of the American
 Chemical Society for his major contribution in reporting science
 progress to the public.
 
                 [Illustration: Photograph of night sky]
 
 CONTENTS
 
 
                                 VOLUME 1
   Introduction                                                          5
   Atomic Weights                                                        6
   Electricity                                                          11
       Units of Electricity                                             11
       Cathode Rays                                                     13
       Radioactivity                                                    17
       The Structure of the Atom                                        25
       Atomic Numbers                                                   30
       Isotopes                                                         35
   Energy                                                               47
       The Law of Conservation of Energy                                47
       Chemical Energy                                                  50
       Electrons and Energy                                             54
       The Energy of the Sun                                            55
       The Energy of Radioactivity                                      57
 
 
                                  VOLUME 2
   Mass and Energy                                                      69
   The Structure of the Nucleus                                         75
       The Proton                                                       75
       The Proton-Electron Theory                                       76
       Protons in Nuclei                                                80
       Nuclear Bombardment                                              82
       Particle Accelerators                                            86
   The Neutron                                                          92
       Nuclear Spin                                                     92
       Discovery of the Neutron                                         95
       The Proton-Neutron Theory                                        98
       The Nuclear Interaction                                         101
       Neutron Bombardment                                             107
 
 
                                  VOLUME 3
   Nuclear Fission                                                     117
       New Elements                                                    117
       The Discovery of Fission                                        122
       The Nuclear Chain Reaction                                      127
       The Nuclear Bomb                                                131
       Nuclear Reactors                                                141
   Nuclear Fusion                                                      147
       The Energy of the Sun                                           147
       Thermonuclear Bombs                                             149
       Controlled Fusion                                               151
   Beyond Fusion                                                       159
       Antimatter                                                      159
       The Unknown                                                     164
   Reading List                                                        166
 
 [Illustration: _A field-ion microscope view of atoms in a crystal. Each
 tiny white dot is a single atom, and each ring system is a crystal facet
 or plane. The picture is magnified 1,500,000 times._]
 
 
 
 
                             MASS AND ENERGY
 
 
 In 1900 it began to dawn on physicists that there was a vast store of
 energy within the atom; a store no one earlier had imagined existed. The
 sheer size of the energy store in the atommillions of times that known
 to exist in the form of chemical energyseemed unbelievable at first.
 Yet that size quickly came to make sense as a result of a line of
 research that seemed, at the beginning, to have nothing to do with
 energy.
 
 Suppose a ball were thrown forward at a velocity of 20 kilometers per
 hour by a man on top of a flatcar that is moving forward at 20
 kilometers an hour. To someone watching from the roadside the ball would
 appear to be travelling at 40 kilometers an hour. The velocity of the
 thrower is added to the velocity of the ball.
 
 If the ball were thrown forward at 20 kilometers an hour by a man on top
 of a flatcar that is moving backward at 20 kilometers an hour, then the
 ball (to someone watching from the roadside) would seem to be not moving
 at all after it left the hand of the thrower. It would just drop to the
 ground.
 
 There seemed no reason in the 19th century to suppose that light didnt
 behave in the same fashion. It was known to travel at the enormous speed
 of just a trifle under 300,000 kilometers per second, while earth moved
 in its orbit about the sun at a speed of about 30 kilometers per second.
 Surely if a beam of light beginning at some earth-bound source shone in
 the direction of earths travel, it ought to move at a speed of 300,030
 kilometers per second. If it shone in the opposite direction, against
 earths motion, it ought to move at a speed of 299,970 kilometers per
 second.
 
 Could such a small difference in an enormous speed be detected?
 
 [Illustration: _Albert A. Michelson_]
 
 The German-American physicist Albert Abraham Michelson (1852-1931) had
 invented a delicate instrument, the interferometer, that could compare
 the velocities of different beams of light with great precision. In 1887
 he and a co-worker, the American chemist Edward Williams Morley
 (1838-1923), tried to measure the comparative speeds of light, using
 beams headed in different directions. Some of this work was performed at
 the U. S. Naval Academy and some at the Case Institute.
 
 The results of the Michelson-Morley experiment were unexpected. It
 showed no difference in the measured speed of light. No matter what the
 direction of the beamwhether it went in the direction of the earths
 movement, or against it, or at any angle to itthe speed of light always
 appeared to be exactly the same.
 
 To explain this, the German-Swiss-American scientist Albert Einstein
 (1879-1955) advanced his special theory of relativity in 1905.
 According to Einsteins view, speeds could not merely be added. A ball
 thrown forward at 20 kilometers an hour by a man moving at 20 kilometers
 an hour in the same direction would not seem to be going 40 kilometers
 an hour to an observer at the roadside. It would seem to be going very
 slightly less than 40 kilometers an hour; so slightly less that the
 difference couldnt be measured.
 
 However, as speeds grew higher and higher, the discrepancy in the
 addition grew greater and greater (according to a formula Einstein
 derived) until, at velocities of tens of thousands of kilometers per
 hour, that discrepancy could be easily measured. At the speed of light,
 which Einstein showed was a limiting velocity that an observer would
 never reach, the discrepancy became so great that the speed of the light
 source, however great, added or subtracted zero to or from the speed of
 light.
 
 Accompanying this were all sorts of other effects. It could be shown by
 Einsteins reasoning that no object possessing mass could move faster
 than the speed of light. Whats more, as an object moved faster and
 faster, its length in the direction of motion (as measured by a
 stationary observer) grew shorter and shorter, while its mass grew
 greater and greater. At 260,000 kilometers per second, its length in the
 direction of movement was only half what it was at rest, and its mass
 was twice what it was. As the speed of light was approached, its length
 would approach zero in the direction of motion, while its mass would
 approach the infinite.
 
 Could this really be so? Ordinary objects never moved so fast as to make
 their lengths and masses show any measurable change. What about
 subatomic particles, however, which moved at tens of thousands of
 kilometers per second? The German physicist Alfred Heinrich Bucherer
 (1863-1927) reported in 1908 that speeding electrons did gain in mass
 just the amount predicted by Einsteins theory. The increased mass with
 energy has been confirmed with great precision in recent years.
 Einsteins special theory of relativity has met many experimental tests
 exactly ever since and it is generally accepted by physicists today.
 
 Einsteins theory gave rise to something else as well. Einstein deduced
 that mass was a form of energy. He worked out a relationship (the
 mass-energy equivalence) that is expressed as follows:
 
                               _E_ = _mc_
 
 where _E_ represents energy, _m_ is mass, and _c_ is the speed of light.
 
 If mass is measured in grams and the speed of light is measured in
 centimeters per second, then the equation will yield the energy in a
 unit called ergs. It turns out that 1 gram of mass is equal to
 900,000,000,000,000,000,000 (900 billion billion) ergs of energy. The
 erg is a very small unit of energy, but 900 billion billion of them
 mount up.
 
 The energy equivalent of 1 gram of mass (and remember that a gram, in
 ordinary units, is only / of an ounce) would keep a 100-watt light
 bulb burning for 35,000 years.
 
  [Illustration: ENERGY CREATED compared to MATTER (OR MASS) DESTROYED]
 
 It is this vast difference between the tiny quantity of mass and the
 huge amount of energy to which it is equivalent that obscured the
 relationship over the years. When a chemical reaction liberates energy,
 the mass of the materials undergoing the reaction decreases slightlybut
 _very_ slightly.
 
 Suppose, for instance, a gallon of gasoline is burned. The gallon of
 gasoline has a mass of 2800 grams and combines with about 10,000 grams
 of oxygen to form carbon dioxide and water, yielding 1.35 million
 billion ergs. Thats a lot of energy and it will drive an automobile for
 some 25 to 30 kilometers. But by Einsteins equation all that energy is
 equivalent to only a little over a millionth of a gram. You start with
 12,800 grams of reacting materials and you end with 12,800 grams minus a
 millionth of a gram or so that was given off as energy.
 
 No instrument known to the chemists of the 19th century could have
 detected so tiny a loss of mass in such a large total. No wonder, then,
 that from Lavoisier on, scientists thought that the law of conservation
 of mass held exactly.
 
 Radioactive changes gave off much more energy per atom than chemical
 changes did, and the percentage loss in mass was correspondingly
 greater. The loss of mass in radioactive changes was found to match the
 production of energy in just the way Einstein predicted.
 
 It was no longer quite accurate to talk about the conservation of mass
 after 1905 (even though mass was just about conserved in ordinary
 chemical reactions so that the law could continue to be used by chemists
 without trouble). Instead, it is more proper to speak of the
 conservation of energy, and to remember that mass was one form of energy
 and a very concentrated form.
 
 The mass-energy equivalence fully explained why the atom should contain
 so great a store of energy. Indeed, the surprise was that radioactive
 changes gave off as little energy as they did. When a uranium atom broke
 down through a series of steps to a lead atom, it produced a million
 times as much energy as that same atom would release if it were involved
 in even the most violent of chemical changes. Nevertheless, that
 enormous energy change in the radioactive breakdown represented only
 about one-half of 1% of the total energy to which the mass of the
 uranium atom was equivalent.
 
 Once Rutherford worked out the nuclear theory of the atom, it became
 clear from the mass-energy equivalence that the source of the energy of
 radioactivity was likely to be in the atomic nucleus where almost all
 the mass of the atom was to be found.
 
 The attention of physicists therefore turned to the nucleus.
 
 
 
 
                       THE STRUCTURE OF THE NUCLEUS
 
 
 The Proton
 
 As early as 1886 Eugen Goldstein, who was working with cathode rays,
 also studied rays that moved in the opposite direction. Since the
 cathode rays (electrons) were negatively charged, rays moving in the
 opposite direction would have to be positively charged. In 1907 J. J.
 Thomson called them positive rays.
 
 Once Rutherford worked out the nuclear structure of the atom, it seemed
 clear that the positive rays were atomic nuclei from which a number of
 electrons had been knocked away. These nuclei came in different sizes.
 
 Were the nuclei single particlesa different one for every isotope of
 every element? Or were they all built up out of numbers of still smaller
 particles of a very limited number of varieties? Might it be that the
 nuclei owed their positive electrical charge to the fact that they
 contained particles just like the electron, but ones that carried a
 positive charge rather than a negative one?
 
 All attempts to discover this positive electron in the nuclei failed,
 however. The smallest nucleus found was that produced by knocking the
 single electron off a hydrogen atom in one way or another. This hydrogen
 nucleus had a single positive charge, one that was exactly equal in size
 to the negative charge on the electron. The hydrogen nucleus, however,
 was much more massive than an electron. The hydrogen nucleus with its
 single positive charge was approximately 1837 times as massive as the
 electron with its single negative charge.
 
 Was it possible to knock the positive charge loose from the mass of the
 hydrogen nucleus? Nothing physicists did could manage to do that. In
 1914 Rutherford decided the attempt should be given up. He suggested
 that the hydrogen nucleus, for all its high mass, should be considered
 the unit of positive electrical charge, just as the electron was the
 unit of negative electrical charge. He called the hydrogen nucleus a
 proton from the Greek word for first because it was the nucleus of
 the first element.
 
 [Illustration: _One proton balances 1837 electrons._]
 
 Why the proton should be so much more massive than the electron is still
 one of the unanswered mysteries of physics.
 
 
 The Proton-Electron Theory
 
 What about the nuclei of elements other than hydrogen?
 
 All the other elements had nuclei more massive than that of hydrogen and
 the natural first guess was that these were made up of some appropriate
 number of protons closely packed together. The helium nucleus, which had
 a mass four times as great as that of hydrogen, might be made up of 4
 protons; the oxygen nucleus with a mass number of 16 might be made up of
 16 protons and so on.
 
 This guess, however, ran into immediate difficulties. A helium nucleus
 might have a mass number of 4 but it had an electric charge of +2. If it
 were made up of 4 protons, it ought to have an electric charge of +4. In
 the same way, an oxygen nucleus made up of 16 protons ought to have a
 charge of +16, but in actual fact it had one of +8.
 
 Could it be that something was cancelling part of the positive electric
 charge? The only thing that could do so would be a negative electric
 charge[1] and these were to be found only on electrons as far as anyone
 knew in 1914. It seemed reasonable, then, to suppose that a nucleus
 would contain about half as many electrons in addition to the protons.
 The electrons were so light, they wouldnt affect the mass much, and
 they would succeed in cancelling some of the positive charge.
 
 Thus, according to this early theory, _now known to be incorrect_, the
 helium nucleus contained not only 4 protons, but 2 electrons in
 addition. The helium nucleus would then have a mass number of 4 and an
 electric charge (atomic number) of 4 - 2, or 2. This was in accordance
 with observation.
 
 This proton-electron theory of nuclear structure accounted for
 isotopes very nicely. While oxygen-16 had a nucleus made up of 16
 protons and 8 electrons, oxygen-17 had one of 17 protons and 9
 electrons, and oxygen-18 had one of 18 protons and 10 electrons. The
 mass numbers were 16, 17, and 18, respectively, but the atomic number
 was 16 - 8, 17 - 9, and 18 - 10, or 8 in each case.
 
 Again, uranium-238 has a nucleus built up, according to this theory, of
 238 protons and 146 electrons, while uranium-235 has one built up of 235
 protons and 143 electrons. In these cases the atomic number is,
 respectively, 238 - 146 and 235 - 143, or 92 in each case. The nucleus
 of the 2 isotopes is, however, of different structure and it is not
 surprising therefore that the radioactive properties of the
 twoproperties that involve the nucleusshould be different and that the
 half-life of uranium-238 should be six times as long as that of
 uranium-235.
 
 The presence of electrons in the nucleus not only explained the
 existence of isotopes, but seemed justified by two further
 considerations.
 
 First, it is well known that similar charges repel each other and that
 the repulsion is stronger the closer together the similar charges are
 forced. Dozens of positively charged particles squeezed into the tiny
 volume of an atomic nucleus couldnt possibly remain together for more
 than a tiny fraction of a second. Electrical repulsion would send them
 flying apart at once.
 
 On the other hand, opposite charges attract, and a proton and an
 electron would attract each other as strongly as 2 protons (or 2
 electrons) would repel each other. It was thought possible that the
 presence of electrons in a collection of protons might somehow limit the
 repulsive force and stabilize the nucleus.
 
 Second, there are radioactive decays in which beta particles are sent
 flying out of the atom. From the energy involved they could come only
 out of the nucleus. Since beta particles are electrons and since they
 come from the nucleus, it seemed to follow that there must be electrons
 within the nucleus to begin with.
 
 The proton-electron theory of nuclear structure also seemed to account
 neatly for many of the facts of radioactivity.
 
 Why radioactivity at all, for instance? The more complex a nucleus is,
 the more protons must be squeezed together and the harder, it would
 seem, it must be to keep them together. _More and more electrons seemed
 to be required._ Finally, when the total number of protons was 84 or
 more, no amount of electrons seemed sufficient to stabilize the nucleus.
 
 The manner of breakup fits the theory, too. Suppose a nucleus gives off
 an alpha particle. The alpha particle is a helium nucleus made up, by
 this theory, of 4 protons and 2 electrons. If a nucleus loses an alpha
 particle, its mass number should decline by 4 and its atomic number by 4
 - 2, or 2. And, indeed, when uranium-238 (atomic number 92) gives off an
 alpha particle, it becomes thorium-234 (atomic number 90).
 
 Suppose a beta particle is emitted. A beta particle is an electron and
 if a nucleus loses an electron, its mass number is almost unchanged. (An
 electron is so light that in comparison with the nucleus, we can ignore
 its mass.) On the other hand, a unit negative charge is gone. One of the
 protons in the nucleus, which had previously been masked by an electron,
 is now unmasked. Its positive charge is added to the rest and the atomic
 number goes up by one. Thus, thorium-234 (atomic number 90) gives up a
 beta particle and becomes protactinium-234 (atomic number 91).
 
 If a gamma ray is given off, that gamma ray has no charge and the
 equivalent of very little mass. That means that neither the mass number
 nor the atomic number of the nucleus is changed, although its energy
 content is altered.
 
 Even more elaborate changes can be taken into account. In the long run,
 uranium-238, having gone through many changes, becomes lead-206. Those
 changes include the emission of 8 alpha particles and 6 beta particles.
 The 8 alpha particles involve a loss of 8  4, or 32 in mass number,
 while the 6 beta particles contribute nothing in this respect. And,
 indeed, the mass number of uranium-238 declines by 32 in reaching
 lead-206. On the other hand the 8 alpha particles involve a decrease in
 atomic number of 8  2, or 16, while the 6 beta particles involve an
 increase in atomic number of 6  1, or 6. The total change is a decrease
 of 16 - 6, or 10. And indeed, uranium (atomic number 92) changes to lead
 (atomic number 82).
 
 It is useful to go into such detail concerning the proton-electron
 theory of nuclear structure and to describe how attractive it seemed.
 The theory appeared solid and unshakable and, indeed, physicists used it
 with considerable satisfaction for 15 years.
 
 And yet, as we shall see, it was wrong; and that should point a moral.
 Even the best seeming of theories may be wrong in some details and
 require an overhaul.
 
 
 Protons in Nuclei
 
 Let us, nevertheless, go on to describe some of the progress made in the
 1920s in terms of the proton-electron theory that was then accepted.
 
 Since a nucleus is made up of a whole number of protons, its mass ought
 to be a whole number if the mass of a single proton is considered 1.
 (The presence of electrons would add some mass but in order to simplify
 matters, let us ignore that.)
 
 When isotopes were first discovered this indeed seemed to be so.
 However, Aston and his mass spectrometer kept measuring the mass of
 different nuclei more and more closely during the 1920s and found that
 they differed very slightly from whole numbers. Yet a fixed number of
 protons turned out to have different masses if they were first
 considered separately and then as part of a nucleus.
 
 Using modern standards, the mass of a proton is 1.007825. Twelve
 separate protons would have a total mass of twelve times that, or
 12.0939. On the other hand, if the 12 protons are packed together into a
 carbon-12 nucleus, the mass is 12 so that the mass of the individual
 protons is 1.000000 apiece. What happens to this difference of 0.007825
 between the proton in isolation and the proton as part of a carbon-12
 nucleus?
 
 According to Einsteins special theory of relativity, the missing mass
 would have to appear in the form of energy. If 12 hydrogen nuclei
 (protons) plus 6 electrons are packed together to form a carbon nucleus,
 a considerable quantity of energy would have to be given off.
 
 In general, Aston found that as one went on to more and more complicated
 nuclei, a larger fraction of the mass would have to appear as energy
 (though not in a perfectly regular way) until it reached a maximum in
 the neighborhood of iron.
 
 Iron-56, the most common of the iron isotopes, has a mass number of
 55.9349. Each of its 56 protons, therefore, has a mass of 0.9988.
 
 For nuclei more complicated than those of iron, the protons in the
 nucleus begin to grow more massive again. Uranium-238 nuclei, for
 instance, have a mass of 238.0506, so that each of the 238 protons they
 contain has a mass of 1.0002.
 
 By 1927 Aston had made it clear that it is the middle elements in the
 neighborhood of iron that are most closely and economically packed. If a
 very massive nucleus is broken up into somewhat lighter nuclei, the
 proton packing would be tighter and some mass would be converted into
 energy. Similarly, if very light nuclei were joined together into
 somewhat more massive nuclei, some mass would be converted into energy.
 
 This demonstration that energy was released in any shift away from
 either extreme of the list of atoms according to atomic number fits the
 case of radioactivity, where very massive nuclei break down to somewhat
 less massive ones.
 
 Consider that uranium-238 gives up 8 alpha particles and 6 beta
 particles to become lead-206. The uranium-238 nucleus has a mass of
 238.0506; each alpha particle has one of 4.0026 for a total of 32.0208;
 each beta particle has a mass of 0.00154 for a total of 0.00924; and the
 lead-206 nucleus has one of 205.9745.
 
 This means that the uranium-238 nucleus (mass: 238.0506) changes into 8
 alpha particles, 6 beta particles, and a lead-206 nucleus (total mass:
 238.0045). The starting mass is 0.0461 greater than the final mass and
 it is this missing mass that has been converted into energy and is
 responsible for the gamma rays and for the velocity with which alpha
 particles and beta particles are discharged.
 
 
 Nuclear Bombardment
 
 Once scientists realized that there was energy which became available
 when one kind of nucleus was changed into another, an important question
 arose as to whether such a change could be brought about and regulated
 by man and whether this might not be made the source of useful power of
 a kind and amount undreamed of earlier.
 
 Chemical energy was easy to initiate and control, since that involved
 the shifts of electrons on the outskirts of the atoms. Raising the
 temperature of a system, for instance, caused atoms to move more quickly
 and smash against each other harder, and that in itself was sufficient
 to force electrons to shift and to initiate a chemical reaction that
 would not take place at lower temperatures.
 
 To shift the protons within the nucleus (nuclear reactions) and make
 nuclear energy available was a harder problem by far. The particles
 involved were much more massive than electrons and correspondingly
 harder to move. Whats more, they were buried deep within the atom. No
 temperatures available to the physicists of the 1920s could force atoms
 to smash together hard enough to reach and shake the nucleus.
 
 In fact, the only objects that were known to reach the nucleus were
 speeding subatomic particles. As early as 1906, for instance, Rutherford
 had used the speeding alpha particles given off by a radioactive
 substance to bombard matter and to show that sometimes these alpha
 particles were deflected by atomic nuclei. It was, in fact, by such an
 experiment that he first demonstrated the existence of such nuclei.
 
 Rutherford had continued his experiments with bombardment. An alpha
 particle striking a nucleus would knock it free of the atom to which it
 belonged and send it shooting forward (like one billiard ball hitting
 another). The nucleus that shot ahead would strike a film of chemical
 that scintillated (sparkled) under the impact. In a rough way, one could
 tell the kind of nucleus that struck from the nature of the sparkling.
 
 In 1919 Rutherford bombarded nitrogen gas with alpha particles and found
 that he obtained the kind of sparkling he associated with the
 bombardment of hydrogen gas. When he bombarded hydrogen, the alpha
 particles struck hydrogen nuclei (protons) and shot them forward. To get
 hydrogen-sparkling out of the bombardment of nitrogen, Rutherford felt,
 he must have knocked protons out of the nitrogen nuclei. Indeed, as was
 later found, he had converted nitrogen nuclei into oxygen nuclei.
 
 This was the first time in history that the atomic nucleus was altered
 by deliberate human act.
 
 Rutherford continued his experiments and by 1924 had shown that alpha
 particles could be used to knock protons out of the nuclei of almost all
 elements up to potassium (atomic number 19).
 
 There were, however, limitations to the use of natural alpha particles
 as the bombarding agent.
 
 First, the alpha particles used in bombardment were positively charged
 and so were the atomic nuclei. This meant that the alpha particles and
 the atomic nuclei repelled each other and much of the energy of the
 alpha particles was used in overcoming the repulsion. For more and more
 massive nuclei, the positive charge grew higher and the repulsion
 stronger until for elements beyond potassium, no collision could be
 forced, even with the most energetic naturally occurring alpha
 particles.
 
 [Illustration: _Man-made transmutation._]
 
   Nitrogen-14 (7N,7P) + Helium-4 (2N,2P) (Alpha particle)
    Oxygen-17 (9N,8P) + Hydrogen-1 (1P)
   Neutron=N, Proton=P
 
 Second, the alpha particles that are sprayed toward the target cannot be
 aimed directly at the nuclei. An alpha particle strikes a nucleus only
 if, by chance, they come together. The nuclei that serve as their
 targets are so unimaginably small that most of the bombarding particles
 are sure to miss. In Rutherfords first bombardment of nitrogen, it was
 calculated that only 1 alpha particle out of 300,000 managed to strike a
 nitrogen nucleus.
 
 The result of these considerations is clear. There is energy to be
 gained out of nuclear reactions, but there is also energy that must be
 expended to cause these nuclear reactions. In the case of nuclear
 bombardment by subatomic particles (the only way, apparently, in which
 nuclear reactions can be brought about), the energy expended seems to be
 many times the energy to be extracted. This is because so many subatomic
 particles use up their energy in ionizing atoms, knocking electrons
 away, and never initiate nuclear reactions at all.
 
 It was as though the only way you could light a candle would be to
 strike 300,000 matches, one after the other. If that were so, candles
 would be impractical.
 
 In fact, the most dramatic result of alpha particle bombardment had
 nothing to do with energy production, but rather the reverse. New nuclei
 were produced that had _more_ energy than the starting nuclei, so that
 energy was absorbed by the nuclear reaction rather than given off.
 
 This came about first in 1934, when a French husband-and-wife team of
 physicists, Frdric Joliot-Curie (1900-1958) and Irne Joliot-Curie
 (1897-1956) were bombarding aluminum-27 (atomic number 13) with alpha
 particles. The result was to combine part of the alpha particle with the
 aluminum-27 nucleus to form a new nucleus with an atomic number two
 units higher15and a mass number three units higher30.
 
 The element with atomic number 15 is phosphorus so that phosphorus-30
 was formed. The only isotope of phosphorus that occurs in nature,
 however, is phosphorus-31. Phosphorus-30 was the first man-made
 nucleusthe first to be manufactured by nuclear reactions in the
 laboratory.
 
 [Illustration: _Frdric and Irne Joliot-Curie_]
 
 The reason phosphorus-30 did not occur in nature was that its energy
 content was too high to allow it to be stable. Its energy content
 drained away through the emission of particles that allowed the nucleus
 to change over into a stable one, silicon-30 (atomic number 14). This
 was an example of artificial radioactivity.
 
 Since 1934, over a thousand kinds of nuclei that do not occur in nature
 have been formed in the laboratory through various kinds of
 bombardment-induced nuclear reactions. Every single one of them proved
 to be radioactive.
 
 
 Particle Accelerators
 
 Was there nothing that could be done to make nuclear bombardment more
 efficient and increase the chance of obtaining useful energy out of
 nuclear reactions?
 
 In 1928 the Russian-American physicist George Gamow (1904-1968)
 suggested that protons might be used as bombarding agents in place of
 alpha particles. Protons were only one-fourth as massive as alpha
 particles and the collision might be correspondingly less effective; on
 the other hand, protons had only half the positive charge of alpha
 particles and would not be as strongly repelled by the nuclei. Then,
 too, protons were much more easily available than alpha particles. To
 get a supply of protons one only had to ionize the very common hydrogen
 atoms, i.e., get rid of the single electron of the hydrogen atom, and a
 single proton is left.
 
 [Illustration: _Artificial radioactivity._]
 
   Aluminum-27 (14N,13P) + Helium-4 (2N,2P) (Alpha particle)
    (16N,15P)
    N + Phosphorus-30 (Radioactive) (15N,15P)
    Positron + Silicon-30
   Neutron=N, Proton=P
 
 Of course, protons obtained by the ionization of hydrogen atoms have
 very little energy, but could energy be imparted to them? Protons carry
 a positive charge and a force can therefore be exerted upon them by an
 electric or magnetic field. In a device that makes use of such fields,
 protons can be accelerated (made to go faster and faster), and thus gain
 more and more energy. In the end, if enough energy is gained, the proton
 could do more damage than the alpha particle, despite the formers
 smaller mass. Combine that with the smaller repulsion involved and the
 greater ease of obtaining protonsand the weight of convenience and
 usefulness would swing far in the direction of the proton.
 
 Physicists began to try to design particle accelerators and the first
 practical device of this sort was produced in 1929 by the two British
 physicists John Douglas Cockcroft (1897-1967) and Ernest Thomas Sinton
 Walton (1903-    ). Their device, called an electrostatic accelerator,
 produced protons that were sufficiently energetic to initiate nuclear
 reactions. In 1931 they used their accelerated protons to disrupt the
 nucleus of lithium-7. It was the first nuclear reaction to be brought
 about by man-made bombarding particles.
 
 Other types of particle accelerators were also being developed at this
 time. The most famous was the one built in 1930 by the American
 physicist Ernest Orlando Lawrence (1901-1958). In this device a magnet
 was used to make the protons move in gradually expanding circles,
 gaining energy with each lap until they finally moved out beyond the
 influence of the magnet and then hurtled out of the instrument in a
 straight line at maximum energy. This instrument was called a
 cyclotron.
 
 [Illustration: _Inventors of one of the first accelerators, Ernest T. S.
 Walton, left, and John D. Cockcroft, right, with Lord Ernest Rutherford
 at Cambridge University in the early 1930s._]
 
 [Illustration: _The bombardment of lithium-7 with protons was the first
 nuclear reaction caused by man-made particles._]
 
   Lithium-7 (4N,3P) + Hydrogen-1 (Proton)
    Helium-4 (2N,2P) (Alpha particle) + Helium-4 (2N,2P) (Alpha
           particle)
   Neutron=N, Proton=P
 
 The cyclotron was rapidly improved, using larger magnets and
 increasingly sophisticated design. There are now, at this time of
 writing, proton synchrotrons (descendants of that first cyclotron)
 that produce particles with over a million times the energy of those
 produced by Lawrences first cyclotron. Of course, the first cyclotron
 was only a quarter of a meter wide, while the largest today has a
 diameter of some 2000 meters.
 
 As particle accelerators grew larger, more efficient, and more powerful,
 they became ever more useful in studying the structure of the nucleus
 and the nature of the subatomic particles themselves. They did not
 serve, however, to bring the dream of useful nuclear energy any closer.
 Though they brought about the liberation of vastly more nuclear energy
 than Rutherfords initial bombardments could, they also consumed a great
 deal more energy in the process.
 
 It is not surprising that Rutherford, the pioneer in nuclear
 bombardment, was pessimistic. To the end of his days (he died in 1937)
 he maintained that it would be forever impossible to tap the energy of
 the nucleus for use by man. Hopes that nuclear power might some day
 run the worlds industries were, in his view, an idle dream.
 
 [Illustration: _Ernest O. Lawrence holds a model of the first cyclotron
 in 1930, a year after its conception._]
 
 
 
 
                               THE NEUTRON
 
 
 Nuclear Spin
 
 What Rutherford did not (and could not) take into account were the
 consequences of a completely new type of nuclear bombardment involving a
 type of particle unknown in the 1920s (though Rutherford speculated
 about the possibility of its existence).
 
 The beginnings of the new path came about through the reluctant
 realization that there was a flaw in the apparently firmly grounded
 proton-electron picture of nuclear structure.
 
 The flaw involved the nuclear spin. In 1924 the Austrian physicist
 Wolfgang Pauli (1900-1958) worked out a theory that treated protons and
 electrons as though they were spinning on their axes. This spin could be
 in either direction (or, as we would say in earthly terms, from
 west-to-east, or from east-to-west). Quantum theory has shown that a
 natural unit exists for what is called the angular momentum of this
 spin. Measured in terms of this natural unit of spin, the proton and the
 electron have spin . If the particle spun in one direction it was +,
 if in the other it was -.
 
 When subatomic particles came together to form an atomic nucleus, each
 kept its original spin, and the nuclear spin was then equal to the total
 angular momentum of the individual particles that made it up.
 
 For instance, suppose the helium nucleus is made up of 4 protons and 2
 electrons, as was thought in the 1920s. Of the 4 protons, suppose that
 two had a spin of + and two of -. Suppose also that of the 2
 electrons, one had a spin of + and one of -. All the spins would
 cancel each other. The total angular momentum would be zero.
 
 Of course, it is also possible that all 6 particles were spinning in the
 same direction; all + or all -. In that case the nuclear spin would be
 3, either in one direction or the other. If 5 particles were spinning in
 one direction and 1 in the other, then the total spin would be 2, in one
 direction or the other.
 
 [Illustration: _Wolfgang Pauli lecturing in Copenhagen in April 1929._]
 
 In short if you have an even number of particles in a nucleus, each with
 a spin of + or -, then the total spin is either zero or a whole
 number, no matter what combination of positive and negative spins you
 choose. (The total spin is always written as a positive number.)
 
 On the other hand, suppose you have lithium-7, which was thought to be
 made up of 7 protons and 4 electrons. If the 7 protons were all + and
 the 4 electrons were all - in their spins, the nuclear spin would be
 / - / = /.
 
 If you have an odd number of particles in the nucleus, you will find
 that any combination of positive and negative spins will _never_ give
 you either zero or a whole number as a sum. The sum will always include
 a fraction.
 
 Consequently, if one measures the spin of a particular atomic nucleus
 one can tell at once whether that nucleus contains an even number of
 particles or an odd number.
 
 This quickly raised a problem. The nuclear spin of the common isotope,
 nitrogen-14, was measured accurately over and over again and turned out
 to be 1. There seemed no doubt about that and it could therefore be
 concluded that there were an even number of particles in the nitrogen-14
 nucleus.
 
 And yet, by the proton-electron theory of nuclear structure, the
 nitrogen-14 nucleus, with a mass number of 14 and an atomic number of 7,
 had to be made up of 14 protons and 7 electrons for a total of 21
 particles altogetheran odd number.
 
 The nuclear spin of nitrogen-14 indicated even number and the
 proton-electron theory indicated odd number. One or the other had to
 be wrong, but which? The nuclear spin was a matter of actual
 measurement, which could be repeated over and over and on which all
 agreed. The proton-electron theory was only a theory. It was therefore
 the latter that was questioned.
 
 What was to be done?
 
 Suppose it is wrong to count protons and electrons inside the nucleus as
 separate particles. Was it possible that an electron and a proton,
 forced into the close confinement of the atomic nucleus might, by the
 force of mutual attraction, become so intimately connected as to count
 as a single particle. One of the first to suggest this, as far back as
 1920, was Rutherford.
 
 Such a proton-electron combination would be electrically neutral and in
 1921 the American chemist William Draper Harkins (1873-1951) used the
 term neutron as a name for it.
 
 If we look at the nitrogen-14 nucleus in this way then it is made up,
 not of 14 protons and 7 electrons, but of 7 protons and 7
 proton-electron combinations. Instead of a total of 21 particles, there
 would be a total of 14; instead of an odd number, there would be an even
 number. The structure would now account for the nuclear spin.
 
 But could such a revised theory of nuclear structure be made to seem
 plausible? The proton-electron theory seemed to make sense because both
 protons and electrons were known to exist separately and could be
 detected. If an intimate proton-electron combination could also exist,
 ought it not exist (or be made to exist) outside the nucleus and ought
 it not be detected as an isolated particle?
 
 
 Discovery of the Neutron
 
 Throughout the 1920s scientists searched for the neutron but without
 success.
 
 One of the troubles was that the particle was electrically neutral.
 Subatomic particles could be detected in a variety of ways, but every
 single way (right down to the present time) makes use of their electric
 charge. The electric charge of a speeding subatomic particle either
 repels electrons or attracts them. In either case, electrons are knocked
 off atoms that are encountered by the speeding subatomic particle.
 
 The atoms with electrons knocked off are now positively charged ions.
 Droplets of water vapor can form about these ions, or a bubble of gas
 can form, or a spark of light can be seen. The droplets, the bubbles,
 and the light can all be detected one way or another and the path of the
 subatomic particle could be followed by the trail of ions it left
 behind. Gamma rays, though they carry no charge, are a wave form capable
 of ionizing atoms.
 
 All the particles and rays that can leave a detectable track of ions
 behind are called ionizing radiation and these are easy to detect.
 
 The hypothetical proton-electron combination, however, which was neither
 a wave form nor a charged particle was not expected to be able to ionize
 atoms. It would wander among the atoms without either attracting or
 repelling electrons and would therefore leave the atomic structure
 intact. Its pathway could not be followed. In short, then, the neutron
 was, so to speak, invisible, and the search for it seemed a lost cause.
 And until it was found, the proton-electron theory of nuclear structure,
 whatever its obvious deficiencies with respect to nuclear spin, remained
 the only one to work with.
 
 Then came 1930. The German physicist Walther Wilhelm Georg Bothe
 (1891-1957) and a co-worker, H. Becker, were bombarding the light metal,
 beryllium, with alpha particles. Ordinarily, they might expect protons
 to be knocked out of it, but in this case no protons appeared. They
 detected some sort of radiation because something was creating certain
 effects while the alpha particles were bombarding the beryllium but not
 after the bombardment ceased.
 
 [Illustration: _Walther W. G. Bothe_]
 
 To try to determine something about the properties of this radiation,
 Bothe and Becker tried putting objects in the way of the radiation. They
 found the radiation to be remarkably penetrating. It even passed through
 several centimeters of lead. The only form of radiation that was known
 at that time to come out of bombarded matter with the capacity of
 penetrating a thick layer of lead was gamma rays. Bothe and Becker,
 therefore, decided they had produced gamma rays and reported this.
 
 In 1932 the Joliot-Curies repeated the Bothe-Becker work and got the
 same results. However, among the objects they placed in the path of the
 new radiation, they included paraffin, which is made up of the light
 atoms of carbon and hydrogen. To their surprise, protons were knocked
 out of the paraffin.
 
 Gamma rays had never been observed to do this, but the Joliot-Curies
 could not think what else the radiation might be. They simply reported
 that they had discovered gamma rays to be capable of a new kind of
 action.
 
 [Illustration: _James Chadwick_]
 
 Not so the English physicist James Chadwick (1891-    ). In that same
 year he maintained that a gamma ray, which possessed no mass, simply
 lacked the momentum to hurl a proton out of its place in the atom. Even
 an electron was too light to do so. (It would be like trying to knock a
 baseball off the ground and into the air by hitting it with a ping-pong
 ball.)
 
 Any radiation capable of knocking a proton out of an atom had to consist
 of particles that were themselves pretty massive. And if one argued like
 that, then it seemed that the radiation first observed by Bothe and
 Becker had to be the long-sought-for proton-electron combination.
 Chadwick used Harkins term, neutron, for it and made it official. He
 gets the credit for the discovery of the neutron.
 
 Chadwick managed to work out the mass of the neutron from his
 experiments and by 1934 it was quite clear that the neutron was more
 massive than the proton. The best modern data have the mass of the
 proton set at 1.007825, and that of the neutron just a trifle greater at
 1.008665.
 
 The fact that the neutron was just about as massive as the proton was to
 be expected if the neutron were a proton-electron combination. It was
 also not surprising that the isolated neutron eventually breaks up,
 giving up an electron and becoming a proton. Out of any large number of
 neutrons, half have turned into protons in about 12 minutes.
 
 Nevertheless, although in some ways we can explain the neutron by
 speaking of it as though it were a proton-electron combination, it
 really is not. A neutron has a spin of  while a proton-electron
 combination would have a spin of either 0 or 1. The neutron, therefore,
 must be treated as a single uncharged particle.
 
 
 The Proton-Neutron Theory
 
 As soon as the neutron was discovered, the German physicist Werner Karl
 Heisenberg (1901-    ) revived the notion that the nucleus must be made
 up of protons and neutrons, rather than protons and electrons. It was
 very easy to switch from the latter theory to the former, if one simply
 remembered to pair the electrons thought to be in the nucleus with
 protons and give the name neutrons to these combinations.
 
 Thus, the helium-4 nucleus, rather than being made up of 4 protons and 2
 electrons, was made up of 2 protons and 2 proton-electron combinations;
 or 2 protons and 2 neutrons. In the same way the oxygen-16 nucleus
 instead of being made up of 16 protons and 8 electrons, would be made up
 of 8 protons and 8 neutrons.
 
 The proton-neutron theory would account for mass numbers and atomic
 numbers perfectly well. If a nucleus was made up of _x_ protons and _y_
 neutrons, then the atomic number was equal to _x_ and the mass number to
 _x_ + _y_. (It is now possible to define the mass number of a nucleus in
 modern terms. It is the number of protons plus neutrons in the nucleus.)
 
 [Illustration: _Werner Heisenberg_]
 
 The proton-neutron theory of nuclear structure could account for
 isotopes perfectly well, too. Consider the 3 oxygen isotopes, oxygen-16,
 oxygen-17, and oxygen-18. The first would have a nucleus made up of 8
 protons and 8 neutrons; the second, one of 8 protons and 9 neutrons; and
 the third, one of 8 protons and 10 neutrons. In each case the atomic
 number is 8. The mass numbers however would be 16, 17, and 18,
 respectively.
 
 In the same way uranium-238 would have a nucleus built of 92 protons and
 146 neutrons, while uranium-235 would have one of 92 protons and 143
 neutrons.
 
 By the new theory, can we suppose that it is neutrons rather than
 electrons that somehow hold the protons together against their mutual
 repulsion, and that more and more neutrons are required to do this as
 the nucleus grows more massive? At first the number of neutrons required
 is roughly equal to the number of protons. The helium-4 nucleus contains
 2 protons and 2 neutrons, the carbon-12 nucleus contains 6 protons and 6
 neutrons, the oxygen-16 nucleus contains 8 protons and 8 neutrons, and
 so on.
 
 For more complicated nuclei, additional neutrons are needed. In
 vanadium-51, the nucleus contains 23 protons and 28 neutrons, five more
 than an equal amount. In bismuth-209, it is 83 protons and 126 neutrons,
 43 more than an equal amount. For still more massive nuclei containing a
 larger number of protons, no amount of neutrons is sufficient to keep
 the assembly stable. The more massive nuclei are all radioactive.
 
 The manner of radioactive breakdown fits the theory, too. Suppose a
 nucleus gives off an alpha particle. The alpha particle is a helium
 nucleus made up of 2 protons and 2 neutrons. If a nucleus loses an alpha
 particle, its mass number should decline by 4 and its atomic number by
 2, and that is what happens.
 
 Suppose a nucleus gives off a beta particle. For a moment, that might
 seem puzzling. If the nucleus contains only protons and neutrons and no
 electrons, where does the beta particle come from? Suppose we consider
 the neutrons as proton-electron combinations. Within many nuclei, the
 neutrons are quite stable and do not break up as they do in isolation.
 In the case of certain nuclei, however, they do break up.
 
 Thus the thorium-234 nucleus is made up of 90 protons and 144 neutrons.
 One of these neutrons might be viewed as breaking up to liberate an
 electron and leaving behind an unbound proton. If a beta particle leaves
 then, the number of neutrons decreases by one and the number of protons
 increases by one. The thorium-234 nucleus (90 protons, 144 neutrons)
 becomes a protactinium-234 nucleus (91 protons, 143 neutrons).
 
 In short, the proton-neutron theory of nuclear structure could explain
 all the observed facts just as well as the proton-electron theory, and
 could explain the nuclear spins, which the proton-electron theory could
 not. Whats more, the isolated neutron had been discovered.
 
 The proton-neutron theory was therefore accepted and remains accepted to
 this day.
 
 
 The Nuclear Interaction
 
 In one place, and only one, did the proton-neutron theory seem a little
 weaker than the proton-electron theory. The electrons in the nucleus
 were thought to act as a kind of glue holding together the protons.
 
 But the electrons were gone. There were no negative charges at all
 inside the nucleus, only the positive charges of the proton, plus the
 uncharged neutron. As many as 83 positive charges were to be found (in
 the bismuth-209 nucleus) squeezed together and yet not breaking apart.
 
 In the absence of electrons, what kept the protons clinging together?
 
 Was it possible that the electrical repulsion between 2 protons is
 replaced by an attraction if those protons were pushed together closely
 enough? Can there be both an attraction _and_ a repulsion, with the
 former the more important at very short range? If this were so, that
 hypothetical attraction would have to have two properties. First, it
 would have to be extremely strongstrong enough to overcome the
 repulsion of two positive charges at very close quarters. Secondly, it
 would have to be short-range, for no attractive force between protons of
 any kind was ever detected outside the nucleus.
 
 In addition, this short-range attraction would have to involve the
 neutron. The hydrogen-1 nucleus was made up of a single proton, but all
 nuclei containing more than 1 proton had to contain neutrons also to be
 stable, and only certain numbers of neutrons.
 
 Until the discovery of the neutron, only two kinds of forces, or
 interactions, were known in the universe. These were the
 gravitational interaction and the electromagnetic interaction. The
 electromagnetic interaction was much the stronger of the twotrillions
 and trillions and trillions of times as strong as the gravitational
 attraction.
 
 The electromagnetic attraction, however, includes both attraction
 (between opposite electric charges or between opposite magnetic poles)
 and repulsion (between like electric charges or magnetic poles). In
 ordinary bodies, the attractions and repulsions usually cancel each
 other entirely or nearly entirely, leaving very little of one or the
 other to be detected as surplus. The gravitational interaction, however,
 includes only attraction and this increases with mass. By the time you
 have gigantic masses such as the earth or the sun, the gravitational
 interaction between them and other bodies is also gigantic.
 
 Both the gravitational and electromagnetic interactions are long-range.
 The intensity of each interaction declines with distance but only as the
 square of the distance. If the distance between earth and sun were
 doubled, the gravitational interaction would still be one-fourth what it
 is now. If the distance were increased ten times, the interaction would
 still be 1/(10  10) or 1/100 what it is now. It is for this reason that
 gravitational and electromagnetic interactions can make themselves felt
 over millions of miles of space.
 
 But now, with the acceptance of the proton-neutron theory of nuclear
 structure, physicists began to suspect the existence of a third
 interactiona nuclear interactionmuch stronger than the
 electromagnetic interaction, perhaps 130 times as strong. Furthermore,
 the nuclear interaction had to decline very rapidly with distance much
 more rapidly than the electromagnetic interaction did.
 
 In that case, protons in virtual contact, as within the nucleus, would
 attract each other, but if the distance between them was increased
 sufficiently to place one outside the nucleus, the nuclear interaction
 would decrease in intensity to less than the electromagnetic repulsion.
 The proton would now be repelled by the positive charge of the nucleus
 and would go flying away. That is why atomic nuclei have to be so small;
 it is only when they are so tiny that the nuclear interaction can hold
 them together.
 
 In 1932 Heisenberg tried to work out how these interactions might come
 into being. He suggested that attractions and repulsions were the result
 of particles being constantly and rapidly exchanged by the bodies
 experiencing the attractions and repulsions. Under some conditions,
 these exchange particles moving back and forth very rapidly between 2
 bodies might force those bodies apart; under other conditions they might
 pull those bodies together.
 
 In the case of the electromagnetic interaction, the exchange particles
 seemed to be photons, wave packets that made up gamma rays, X rays, or
 even ordinary light (all of which are examples of electromagnetic
 radiation). The gravitational interaction would be the result of
 exchange particles called gravitons. (In 1969, there were reports that
 gravitons had actually been detected.)
 
 Both the photon and the graviton have zero mass and there is a
 connection between that and the fact that electromagnetic interaction
 and gravitational interaction decline only slowly with distance. For a
 nuclear interaction, which declines very rapidly with distance, the
 exchange particle (if any) would have to have mass.
 
 In 1935 the Japanese physicist Hideki Yukawa (1907-    ) worked out in
 considerable detail the theory of such exchange particles in order to
 decide what kind of properties the one involved in the nuclear
 interaction would have. He decided it ought to have a mass about 250
 times that of an electron, which would make it about / as massive as a
 proton. Since this mass is intermediate between that of an electron and
 proton, such particles eventually came to be called mesons from a
 Greek word meaning intermediate.
 
 Once Yukawa published his theory, the search was on for the hypothetical
 mesons. Ideally, if they existed within the nucleus, shooting back and
 forth between protons and neutrons, there ought to be some way of
 knocking them out of the nucleus and studying them in isolation.
 Unfortunately, the bombarding particles at the disposal of physicists in
 the 1930s possessed far too little energy to knock mesons out of nuclei,
 assuming they were there in the first place.
 
 There was one way out. In 1911 the Austrian physicist Victor Francis
 Hess (1883-1964) had discovered that earth was bombarded from every side
 by cosmic rays. These consisted of speeding atomic nuclei (cosmic
 particles) of enormous energiesin some cases, billions of times as
 intense as any energies available through particles produced by mankind.
 If a cosmic particle of sufficient energy struck an atomic nucleus in
 the atmosphere, it might knock mesons out of it.
 
 In 1936 the American physicists Carl David Anderson (1905-    ) and Seth
 Henry Neddermeyer (1907-    ), studying the results of cosmic-particle
 bombardment of matter, detected the existence of particles of
 intermediate mass. This particle turned out to be lighter than Yukawa
 had predicted; it was only about 207 times as massive as an electron.
 Much worse, it lacked other properties that Yukawa had predicted. It did
 not interact with the nucleus in the manner expected.
 
 [Illustration: _Hideki Yukawa_]
 
 [Illustration: _Victor F. Hess_]
 
 [Illustration: _C. D. Anderson_]
 
 In 1947, however, the English physicist Cecil Frank Powell (1903-1969)
 and his co-workers, also studying cosmic-particle bombardment, located
 another intermediate-sized body, which had the right mass and all the
 other appropriate properties to fit Yukawas theories.
 
 Andersons particle was called a mu-meson, soon abbreviated to muon.
 Powells particle was called a pi-meson, soon abbreviated to pion.
 With the discovery of the pion, Yukawas theory was nailed down and any
 lingering doubt as to the validity of the proton-neutron theory
 vanished.
 
 [Illustration: _C. F. Powell_]
 
 (Actually, it turns out that there are two forces. The one with the pion
 as exchange particle is the strong nuclear interaction. Another,
 involved in beta particle emission, for instance, is a weak
 interaction, much weaker than the electromagnetic but stronger than the
 gravitational.)
 
 The working out of the details of the strong nuclear interaction
 explains further the vast energies to be found resulting from nuclear
 reactions. Ordinary chemical reactions, with the electron shifts that
 accompany them, involve the electromagnetic interaction only. Nuclear
 energy, with the shifts of the particles inside the nucleus, involves
 the much stronger nuclear interaction.
 
 
 Neutron Bombardment
 
 As soon as neutrons were discovered, it seemed to physicists that they
 had another possible bombarding particle of extraordinary properties.
 Since the neutron lacked any electric charge, it could not be repelled
 by either electrons on the outside of the atoms or by the nuclei at the
 center. The neutron was completely indifferent to the electromagnetic
 attraction and it just moved along in a straight line. If it happened to
 be headed toward a nucleus it would strike it no matter how heavy a
 charge that nucleus might have and very often it would, as a result,
 induce a nuclear reaction where a proton would not have been able to.
 
 [Illustration: _J. Robert Oppenheimer_]
 
 To be sure, it seemed just at first that there was a disadvantage to the
 neutrons lack of charge. It could not be accelerated directly by any
 device since that always depended on electromagnetic interaction to
 which the neutron was impervious.
 
 There was one way of getting around this and this was explained in 1935
 by the American physicist J. Robert Oppenheimer (1904-1967) and by his
 student Melba Phillips.
 
 Use is made here of the nucleus of the hydrogen-2 (deuterium) nucleus.
 That nucleus, often called a deuteron, is made up of 1 proton plus 1
 neutron and has a mass number of 2 and an atomic number of 1. Since it
 has a unit positive charge, it can be accelerated just as an isolated
 proton can be.
 
 Suppose, then, that a deuteron is accelerated to a high energy and is
 aimed right at a positively charged nucleus. That nucleus repels the
 deuteron, and it particularly repels the proton part. The nuclear
 interaction that holds together a single proton and a single neutron is
 comparatively weak as nuclear interactions go, and the repulsion of the
 nucleus that the deuteron is approaching may force the proton out of the
 deuteron altogether. The proton veers off, but the neutron, unaffected,
 keeps right on going and, with all the energy it had gained as part of
 the deuteron acceleration, smashes into the nucleus.
 
 Within a few months of their discovery, energetic neutrons were being
 used to bring about nuclear reactions.
 
 Actually, though, physicists didnt have to worry about making neutrons
 energetic. This was a hangover from their work with positively charged
 particles such as protons and alpha particles. These charged particles
 had to be energetic to overcome the repulsion of the nucleus and to
 smash into it with enough force to break it up.
 
 Neutrons, however, didnt have to overcome any repulsion. No matter how
 little energy they had, if they were correctly aimed (and some always
 were, through sheer chance) they would approach and strike the nucleus.
 
 In fact, the more slowly they travelled, the longer they would stay in
 the vicinity of a nucleus and the more likely they were to be captured
 by some nearby nucleus through the attraction of the nuclear
 interaction. The influence of the nucleus in capturing the neutron was
 greater the slower the neutron, so that it was almost as though the
 nucleus were larger and easier to hit for a slow neutron than a fast
 one. Eventually, physicists began to speak of nuclear cross sections
 and to say that particular nuclei had a cross section of such and such a
 size for this bombarding particle or that.
 
 The effectiveness of slow neutrons was discovered in 1934 by the
 Italian-American physicist Enrico Fermi (1901-1954).
 
 Of course, there was the difficulty that neutrons couldnt be slowed
 down once they were formed, and as formed they generally had too much
 energy (according to the new way of looking at things). At least they
 couldnt be slowed down by electromagnetic methodsbut there were other
 ways.
 
 A neutron didnt always enter a nucleus that it encountered. Sometimes,
 if it struck the nucleus a hard, glancing blow, it bounced off. If the
 nucleus struck by the neutron is many times as massive as the neutron,
 the neutron bounced off with all its speed practically intact. On the
 other hand, if the neutron hits a nucleus not very much more massive
 than itself, the nucleus rebounds and absorbs some of the energy, so
 that the neutron bounces away with less energy than it had. If the
 neutron rebounds from a number of comparatively light nuclei, it
 eventually loses virtually all its energy and finally moves about quite
 slowly, possessing no more energy than the atoms that surround it.
 
 (You can encounter this situation in ordinary life in the case of
 billiard balls. A billiard ball, colliding with a cannon ball, will just
 bounce, moving just as rapidly afterward as before, though in a
 different direction. If a billiard ball strikes another billiard ball,
 it will set the target ball moving and bounce off itself with less
 speed.)
 
 The energy of the molecules in the atmosphere depends on temperature.
 Neutrons that match that energy and have the ordinary quantity to be
 expected at room temperature are called thermal (from a Greek word
 meaning heat) neutrons. The comparatively light nuclei against which
 the neutrons bounce and slow down are moderators because they moderate
 the neutrons energy.
 
 Fermi and his co-workers were the first to moderate neutrons, produce
 thermal neutrons, and use them, in 1935, to bombard nuclei. He quickly
 noted how large nuclear cross sections became when thermal neutrons were
 the bombarding particles.
 
 It might seem that hope could now rise in connection with the practical
 use of energy derived from nuclear reactions. Neutrons could bring about
 nuclear reactions, even when they themselves possessed very little
 energy, so output might conceivably be more than input for each neutron
 that struck. Furthermore because of the large cross sections involved,
 thermal neutrons missed far less frequently than high-energy charged
 particles did.
 
 But there was a catch. Before neutrons could be used, however low-energy
 and however sure to hit, they had to be produced; and in order to
 produce neutrons they had to be knocked out of nuclei by bombardment
 with high-energy protons or some other such method. The energy formed by
 the neutrons was at first never more than the tiniest fraction of the
 energies that went into forming the neutrons in the first place.
 
 It was as though you could indeed light a candle with a single match,
 but you still had to look through 300,000 useless pieces of wood before
 you found a match. The candle would still be impractical.
 
 Even with the existence of neutron bombardment, involving low energy and
 high cross section, Rutherford could, with justice, feel right down to
 the time of his death that nuclear energy would never be made available
 for practical use.
 
 And yet, among the experiments that Fermi was trying in 1934 was that of
 sending his neutrons crashing into uranium atoms. Rutherford had no way
 of telling (and neither had Fermi) that this, finally, was the route to
 the unimaginable.
 
 
 
 
                                FOOTNOTES
 
 
 [1]The attempt to work out the structure of the nucleus resulted in a
     _false_, but useful, theory that persisted throughout the 1920s. The
     great advances in nuclear science in this decade were made in the
     light of this false theory and, for the sake of historical accuracy,
     they are so presented here. The theory now believed correct will be
     presented shortly, and you will see how matters can be changed from
     the earlier concept to the later one.
 
 
 Quotation Credit
 
   Inside front cover    Copyright  by Abelard-Shuman, Ltd., New York.
                         Reprinted by permission from _Inside the Atom_,
                         Isaac Asimov, 1966.
 
 
 Photo Credits
 
   Cover                 Thorne Films
   Page facing inside    The Horsehead Nebula in Orion, Hale
   front cover           Observatories.
   Authors Photo        Jay K. Klein
   Contents pages        Lick Observatory
   68                    Dr. Erwin W. Mueller, The Pennsylvania State
                         University
   70                    Yerkes Observatory
   86                    From _Discovery of the Elements_, Mary E. Weeks,
                         Chemical Education Publishing Company, 1968.
   89                    The Central Press Photos, Ltd., and Sir John
                         Cockcroft
   91                    Ernest Orlando Lawrence Livermore Laboratory
   93                    Samuel A. Goudsmit
   96 & 97               Nobel Institute
   99                    Copyright  1965 by Barbara Lovett Cline,
                         reprinted from her volume _The Questioners:
                         Physicists and the Quantum Theory_ by permission
                         of Thomas Y. Crowell, Inc., New York.
   105 & 106             Nobel Institute
   107                   Alan W. Richards
 
                       U.S. GOVERNMENT PRINTING OFFICE: 1975640285/14
 
 
 
 
                          A word about ERDA....
 
 
 The mission of the U. S. Energy Research & Development Administration
 (ERDA) is to develop all energy sources, to make the Nation basically
 self-sufficient in energy, and to protect public health and welfare and
 the environment. ERDA programs are divided into six major categories:
 
  CONSERVATION OF ENERGYMore efficient use of existing energy sources,
 development of alternate fuels and engines for automobiles to reduce
 dependence on petroleum, and elimination of wasteful habits of energy
 consumption.
 
  FOSSIL ENERGYExpansion of coal production and the development of
 technologies for converting coal to synthetic gas and liquid fuels,
 improvement of oil drilling methods and of techniques for converting
 shale deposits to usable oil.
 
  SOLAR, GEOTHERMAL, AND ADVANCED ENERGY SYSTEMSResearch on solar
 energy to heat, cool, and eventually electrify buildings, on conversion
 of underground heat sources to gas and electricity, and on fusion
 reactors for the generation of electricity.
 
  ENVIRONMENT AND SAFETYInvestigation of health, safety, and
 environmental effects of the development of energy technologies, and
 research on management of wastes from energy production.
 
  NUCLEAR ENERGYExpanding medical, industrial and research applications
 and upgrading reactor technologies for the generation of electricity,
 particularly using the breeder concept.
 
  NATIONAL SECURITYProduction and administration of nuclear materials
 serving both civilian and military needs.
 
 ERDA programs are carried out by contract and cooperation with industry,
 university communities, and other government agencies. For more
 information, write to USERDATechnical Information Center, P. O. Box 62,
 Oak Ridge, Tennessee 37830.
 
     [Illustration: ENERGY RESEARCH & DEVELOPMENT ADMINISTRATION USA]
 
                              United States
              Energy Research and Development Administration
                         Office of Public Affairs
                          Washington, D.C. 20545
 
 
 
 
                           Transcribers Notes
 
 
 --Retained publication information from the printed edition: this eBook
   is public-domain in the country of publication.
 
 --In the text version only, underlined or italicized text is delimited
   by _underscores_.
 
 --Where possible, UTF superscript and subscript numbers are used; some
   e-reader fonts may not support these characters.
 
 --In the text versions only, other superscript text is preceded by caret
   and delimited by ^{brackets}.
 
 --In the text versions only, other subscripted text is preceded by
   underscore and delimited by _{brackets}.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 End of the Project Gutenberg EBook of Worlds Within Worlds: The Story of

 
 
 
 Produced by Stephen Hutcheson, Dave Morgan and the Online
 Distributed Proofreading Team at http://www.pgdp.net
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
                          Worlds Within Worlds:
                       The Story of Nuclear Energy
                                 Volume 3
             Nuclear Fission  Nuclear Fusion  Beyond Fusion
 
 
                             by Isaac Asimov
 
 
                  United States Atomic Energy Commission
                      Office of Information Services
 
            Library of Congress Catalog Card Number 75-189477
                                   1972
 
 _Nothing in the history of mankind has opened our eyes to the
 possibilities of science as has the development of atomic power. In the
 last 200 years, people have seen the coming of the steam engine, the
 steamboat, the railroad locomotive, the automobile, the airplane, radio,
 motion pictures, television, the machine age in general. Yet none of it
 seemed quite so fantastic, quite so unbelievable, as what man has done
 since 1939 with the atom ... there seem to be almost no limits to what
 may lie ahead: inexhaustible energy, new worlds, ever-widening knowledge
 of the physical universe._
                                                             Isaac Asimov
 
                 [Illustration: Photograph of night sky]
 
 
 
 
 Nuclear energy is playing a vital role in the life of every man, woman,
 and child in the United States today. In the years ahead it will affect
 increasingly all the peoples of the earth. It is essential that all
 Americans gain an understanding of this vital force if they are to
 discharge thoughtfully their responsibilities as citizens and if they
 are to realize fully the myriad benefits that nuclear energy offers
 them.
 
 The United States Atomic Energy Commission provides this booklet to help
 you achieve such understanding.
 
 
 
 
   UNITED STATES ATOMIC ENERGY COMMISSION
 
   Dr. James R. Schlesinger, Chairman
   James T. Ramey
   Dr. Clarence E. Larson
   William O. Doub
   Dr. Dixy Lee Ray
 
                       [Illustration: Isaac Asimov]
 
 
 
 
 ISAAC ASIMOV received his academic degrees from Columbia University and
 is Associate Professor of Biochemistry at the Boston University School
 of Medicine. He is a prolific author who has written over 100 books in
 the past 18 years, including about 20 science fiction works, and books
 for children. His many excellent science books for the public cover
 subjects in mathematics, physics, astronomy, chemistry, and biology,
 such as _The Genetic Code_, _Inside the Atom_, _Building Blocks of the
 Universe_, _Understanding Physics_, _The New Intelligent Mans Guide to
 Science_, and _Asimovs Biographical Encyclopedia of Science and
 Technology_. In 1965 Dr. Asimov received the James T. Grady Award of the
 American Chemical Society for his major contribution in reporting
 science progress to the public.
 
                 [Illustration: Photograph of night sky]
 
 CONTENTS
 
 
                                 VOLUME 1
   Introduction                                                          5
   Atomic Weights                                                        6
   Electricity                                                          11
       Units of Electricity                                             11
       Cathode Rays                                                     13
       Radioactivity                                                    17
       The Structure of the Atom                                        25
       Atomic Numbers                                                   30
       Isotopes                                                         35
   Energy                                                               47
       The Law of Conservation of Energy                                47
       Chemical Energy                                                  50
       Electrons and Energy                                             54
       The Energy of the Sun                                            55
       The Energy of Radioactivity                                      57
 
 
                                  VOLUME 2
   Mass and Energy                                                      69
   The Structure of the Nucleus                                         75
       The Proton                                                       75
       The Proton-Electron Theory                                       76
       Protons in Nuclei                                                80
       Nuclear Bombardment                                              82
       Particle Accelerators                                            86
   The Neutron                                                          92
       Nuclear Spin                                                     92
       Discovery of the Neutron                                         95
       The Proton-Neutron Theory                                        98
       The Nuclear Interaction                                         101
       Neutron Bombardment                                             107
 
 
                                  VOLUME 3
   Nuclear Fission                                                     117
       New Elements                                                    117
       The Discovery of Fission                                        122
       The Nuclear Chain Reaction                                      127
       The Nuclear Bomb                                                131
       Nuclear Reactors                                                141
   Nuclear Fusion                                                      146
       The Energy of the Sun                                           146
       Thermonuclear Bombs                                             148
       Controlled Fusion                                               150
   Beyond Fusion                                                       158
       Antimatter                                                      158
       The Unknown                                                     163
   Reading List                                                        165
 
 [Illustration: _Enrico Fermi (left) and Niels Bohr discuss physics as
 they stroll along the Appian Way outside Rome in 1931._]
 
 
 
 
                             NUCLEAR FISSION
 
 
 New Elements
 
 In 1934 Enrico Fermi began his first experiments involving the
 bombardment of uranium with neutronsexperiments that were to change the
 face of the world.
 
 Fermi had found that slow neutrons, which had very little energy, were
 easily absorbed by atomic nucleimore easily than fast neutrons were
 absorbed, and certainly more easily than charged particles were.
 
 Often what happened was that the neutron was simply absorbed by the
 nucleus. Since the neutron has a mass number of 1 and an atomic number
 of 0 (because it is uncharged), a nucleus that absorbs a neutron remains
 an isotope of the same element, but increases its mass number.
 
 For instance, suppose that neutrons are used to bombard hydrogen-1,
 which then captures one of the neutrons. From a single proton, it will
 become a proton plus a neutron; from hydrogen-1, it will become
 hydrogen-2. A new nucleus formed in this way will be at a higher energy
 and that energy is emitted in the form of a gamma ray.
 
 Sometimes the more massive isotope that is formed through neutron
 absorption is stable, as hydrogen-2 is. Sometimes it is not, but is
 radioactive instead. Because it has added a neutron, it has too many
 neutrons for stability. The best way of adjusting the matter is to emit
 a beta particle (electron). This converts one of the neutrons into a
 proton. The mass number stays the same but the atomic number increases
 by one.
 
 The element rhodium, for example, which has an atomic number of 45, has
 only 1 stable isotope, with a mass number of 103. If rhodium-103 (45
 protons, 58 neutrons) absorbs a neutron, it becomes rhodium-104 (45
 protons, 59 neutrons), which is not stable. Rhodium-104 emits a beta
 particle, changing a neutron to a proton so that the nuclear combination
 becomes 46 protons and 58 neutrons. This is palladium-104, which is
 stable.
 
 [Illustration: _Fermis laboratory in Rome in 1930._]
 
 As another example, indium-115 (49 protons, 66 neutrons) absorbs a
 neutron and becomes indium-116 (49 protons, 67 neutrons), which gives
 off a beta particle and becomes tin-116 (50 protons, 66 neutrons), which
 is stable.
 
 There are over 100 isotopes that will absorb neutrons and end by
 becoming an isotope of an element one higher in the atomic number scale.
 Fermi observed a number of these cases.
 
 Having done so, he was bound to ask what would happen if uranium were
 bombarded with neutrons. Would its isotopes also be raised in atomic
 numberin this case from 92 to 93? If that were so it would be very
 exciting, for uranium had the highest atomic number in the entire scale.
 Nobody had ever discovered any sample of element number 93, but perhaps
 it could be formed in the laboratory.
 
 In 1934, therefore, Fermi bombarded uranium with neutrons in the hope of
 obtaining atoms of element 93. Neutrons were absorbed and whatever was
 formed did give off beta particles, so element 93 should be there.
 However, four different kinds of beta particles (different in their
 energy content) were given off and the matter grew very confusing. Fermi
 could not definitely identify the presence of atoms of element 93 and
 neither could anyone else for several years. Other things turned up,
 however, which were even more significant.
 
 Before going on to these other things, however, it should be mentioned
 that undoubtedly element 93 was formed even though Fermi couldnt
 clearly demonstrate the fact. In 1939 the American physicists Edwin
 Mattison McMillan (1907-    ) and Philip Hauge Abelson (1913-    ),
 after bombarding uranium atoms with slow neutrons, were able to identify
 element 93. Since uranium had originally been named for the planet,
 Uranus, the new element beyond uranium was eventually named for the
 planet Neptune, which lay beyond Uranus. Element 93 is therefore called
 neptunium.
 
 [Illustration: _Lise Meitner_]
 
 [Illustration: _Emilio Segr_]
 
 [Illustration: _Edwin M. McMillan_]
 
 [Illustration: _Otto R. Frisch_]
 
 [Illustration: _Glenn T. Seaborg_]
 
 [Illustration: _Philip H. Abelson_]
 
 What happened was exactly what was expected. Uranium-238 (92 protons,
 146 neutrons) added a neutron to become uranium-239 (92 protons, 147
 neutrons), which emitted a beta particle to become neptunium-239 (93
 protons, 146 neutrons).
 
 In fact, neptunium-239 also emitted a beta particle so it ought to
 become an isotope of an element even higher in the atomic number scale.
 This one, element 94, was named plutonium after Pluto, the planet
 beyond Neptune. The isotope, plutonium-239, formed from neptunium-239,
 was only feebly radioactive, however, and it was not clearly identified
 until 1941.
 
 The actual discovery of the element plutonium came the year before,
 however, when neptunium-238 was formed. It emitted a beta particle and
 became plutonium-238, an isotope that was radioactive enough to be
 easily detected and identified by Glenn Theodore Seaborg (1912-    ),
 and his co-workers, who completed McMillans experiments when he was
 called away to other defense research.
 
 Neptunium and plutonium were the first transuranium elements to be
 produced in the laboratory, but they werent the last. Over the next 30
 years, isotopes were formed that contained more and more protons in the
 nucleus and therefore had higher and higher atomic numbers. At the
 moment of writing, isotopes of every element up to and including element
 105 have been formed.
 
 A number of these new elements have been named for some of the
 scientists important in the history of nuclear research. Element 96 is
 curium, named for Pierre and Marie Curie; element 99 is einsteinium
 for Albert Einstein; and element 100 is fermium for Enrico Fermi.
 
 Element 101 is mendelevium for the Russian chemist Dmitri Mendelev,
 who early in 1869 was the first to arrange the elements in a reasonable
 and useful order. Element 103 is lawrencium for Ernest O. Lawrence.
 Rutherfordium for Ernest Rutherford has been proposed for element 104.
 
 And hahnium for Otto Hahn (1879-1968), a German physical chemist whose
 contribution we will come to shortly, has been proposed for element 105.
 
 Neptunium, however, was not the first new element to be created in the
 laboratory. In the early 1930s, there were still 2 elements with fairly
 low atomic numbers that had never been discovered. These were the
 elements with atomic numbers 43 and 61.
 
 In 1937, though, molybdenum (atomic number 42) had been bombarded with
 neutrons in Lawrences laboratory in the United States. It might contain
 small quantities of element 43 as a result. The Italian physicist Emilio
 Segr (1905-    ), who had worked with Fermi, obtained a sample of the
 bombarded molybdenum and indeed obtained indications of the presence of
 element 43. It was the first new element to be manufactured by
 artificial means and was called technetium from the Greek word for
 artificial.
 
 The technetium isotope that was formed was radioactive. Indeed, all the
 technetium isotopes are radioactive. Element 61, discovered in 1945 and
 named promethium, also has no stable isotopes. Technetium and
 promethium are the only elements with atomic numbers less than 84 that
 do not have even a single stable isotope.
 
 
 The Discovery of Fission
 
 But let us get back to the bombardment of uranium with neutrons research
 that Fermi had begun. After he had reported his work, other physicists
 repeated it and also got a variety of beta particles and were also
 unable to decide what was going on.
 
 [Illustration: _Lise Meitner and Otto Hahn in their laboratory in the
 1930s._]
 
 One way to tackle the problem was to add to the system some stable
 element that was chemically similar to the tiny traces of radioactive
 isotopes that might be produced through the bombardment of uranium.
 Afterwards the stable element could probably be separated out of the
 mixture and the trace of radioactivity would, it was hoped, be carried
 along with it. The stable element would be a carrier.
 
 Among those working on the problem were Otto Hahn and his Austrian
 co-worker, the physicist Lise Meitner (1878-1968). Among the potential
 carriers they added to the system was the element, barium, which has an
 atomic number of 56. They found that a considerable quantity of the
 radioactivity did indeed accompany the barium when they separated that
 element out of the system.
 
 A natural conclusion was that the isotopes producing the radioactivity
 belonged to an element that was chemically very similar to barium.
 Suspicion fell at once on radium (atomic number 88), which was very like
 barium indeed as far as chemical properties were concerned.
 
 Lise Meitner, who was Jewish, found it difficult to work in Germany,
 however, for it was then under the rule of the strongly anti-Semitic
 Nazi regime. In March 1938 Germany occupied Austria, which became part
 of the German realm. Meitner was no longer protected by her Austrian
 citizenship and had to flee the country and go to Stockholm, Sweden.
 Hahn remained in Germany and continued working on the problem with the
 German physical chemist Fritz Strassman (1902-    ).
 
 Although the supposed radium, which possessed the radioactivity, was
 very like barium in chemical properties, the two were not entirely
 identical. There were ways of separating them, and Hahn and Strassman
 busied themselves in trying to accomplish this in order to isolate the
 radioactive isotopes, concentrate them, and study them in detail. Over
 and over again, however, they failed to separate the barium and the
 supposed radium.
 
 Slowly, it began to seem to Hahn that the failure to separate the barium
 and the radioactivity meant that the isotopes to which the radioactivity
 belonged had to be so much like barium as to be nothing else _but_
 barium. He hesitated to say so, however, because it seemed unbelievable.
 
 If the radioactive isotopes included radium, that was conceivable.
 Radium had an atomic number of 88, only four less than uraniums 92. You
 could imagine that a neutron being absorbed by a uranium nucleus might
 make the latter so unstable as to cause it to emit 2 alpha particles and
 become radium. Barium, however, had an atomic number of 56, only a
 little over half that of uranium. How could a uranium nucleus be made to
 turn into a barium nucleus unless it more or less broke in half? Nothing
 like that had ever been observed before and Hahn hesitated to suggest
 it.
 
 While he was nerving himself to do so, however, Lise Meitner, in
 Stockholm, receiving reports of what was being done in Hahns laboratory
 and thinking about it, decided that unheard-of or not, there was only
 one explanation. The uranium nucleus _was_ breaking in half.
 
 Actually, when one stopped to think of it (after getting over the
 initial shock) it wasnt so unbelievable at that. The nuclear force is
 so short-range, it barely reaches from end to end of a large nucleus
 like that of uranium. Left to itself, it holds together most of the
 time, but with the added energy of an entering neutron, we might imagine
 shock waves going through it and turning the nucleus into something like
 a quivering drop of liquid. Sometimes the uranium nucleus recovers,
 keeps the neutron, and then goes on to beta-particle emission. And
 sometimes the nucleus stretches to the point where the nuclear force
 doesnt quite hold it together. It becomes a dumbbell shape and then the
 electromagnetic repulsion of the two halves (both positively charged)
 breaks it apart altogether.
 
 It doesnt break into equal halves. Nor does it always break at exactly
 the same place, so that there were a number of different fragments
 possible (which was why there was so much confusion). Still, one of the
 more common ways in which it might break would be into barium and
 krypton. (Their respective atomic numbers, 56 and 36, would add up to
 92.)
 
 Meitner and her nephew, Otto Robert Frisch (1904-    ), who was in
 Copenhagen, Denmark, prepared a paper suggesting that this was what was
 happening. It was published in January 1939. Frisch passed it on to the
 Danish physicist Niels Bohr (1885-1962) with whom he was working. The
 American biologist William Archibald Arnold (1904-    ), who was also
 working in Copenhagen at the time, suggested that the splitting of the
 uranium nucleus into halves be called fission, the term used for the
 division-in-two of living cells. The name stuck.
 
 In January 1939, just about the time Meitner and Frischs paper was
 published, Bohr had arrived in the United States to attend a conference
 of physicists. He carried the news of fission with him. The other
 physicists attending the conference heard the news and in a high state
 of excitement at once set about studying the problem. Within a matter of
 weeks, the fact of uranium fission was confirmed over and over.
 
 One striking fact about uranium fission was the large amount of energy
 it released. In general, when a very massive nucleus is converted to a
 less massive one, energy is released because of the change in the mass
 defect, as Aston had shown in the 1920s. When the uranium nucleus breaks
 down through the ordinary radioactive processes to become a less massive
 lead nucleus, energy is given off accordingly. When, however, it breaks
 in two to become the much less massive nuclei of barium and krypton (or
 others in that neighborhood) much more energy is given off.
 
 It quickly turned out that uranium fission gave off something like ten
 times as much nuclear energy per nucleus than did any other nuclear
 reaction known at the time.
 
 Even so, the quantity of energy released by uranium fission was only a
 tiny fraction of the energy that went into the preparation of the
 neutrons used to bring about the fission, if each neutron that struck a
 uranium atom brought about a single fission of that 1 atom.
 
 Under those conditions, Rutherfords suspicion that mankind would never
 be able to tap nuclear energy probably still remained true. (He had been
 dead for 2 years at the time of the discovery of fission.)
 
 However, those were not the conditions.
 
 
 The Nuclear Chain Reaction
 
 Earlier in this history, we discussed chain reactions involving chemical
 energy. A small bit of energy can ignite a chemical reaction that would
 produce more than enough energy to ignite a neighboring section of the
 system, which would in turn produce still moreand so on, and so on. In
 this way the flame of a single match could start a fire in a leaf that
 would burn down an entire forest, and the energy given off by the
 burning forest would be enormously higher than the initial energy of the
 match flame.
 
 Might there not be such a thing as a nuclear chain reaction? Could one
 initiate a nuclear reaction that would produce something that would
 initiate more of the same that would produce something that would
 initiate still more of the same and so on?
 
 In that case, a nuclear reaction, once started, would continue of its
 own accord, and in return for the trifling investment that would serve
 to start ita single neutron, perhapsa vast amount of breakdowns would
 result with the delivery of a vast amount of energy. Even if it were
 necessary to expend quite a bit of energy to produce the 1 neutron that
 would start the chain reaction, one would end with an enormous profit.
 
 Whats more, since the nuclear reaction would spread from nucleus to
 nucleus with millionths-of-a-second intervals, there would be, in a very
 brief time, so many nuclei breaking down that there would be a vast
 explosion. The explosion was sure to be millions of times as powerful as
 ordinary chemical explosions involving the same quantity of exploding
 material, since the latter used only the electromagnetic interaction,
 while the former used the much stronger nuclear interaction.
 
 The first to think seriously of such a nuclear chain reaction was the
 Hungarian physicist Leo Szilard (1898-1964). He was working in Germany
 in 1933 when Adolf Hitler came to power and, since he was Jewish, he
 felt it would be wise to leave Germany. He went to Great Britain and
 there, in 1934, he considered certain new types of nuclear reactions
 that had been discovered.
 
 In these, it sometimes happened that a fast neutron might strike a
 nucleus with sufficient energy to cause it to emit 2 neutrons. In that
 way the nucleus, absorbing 1 neutron and emitting 2, would become a
 lighter isotope of the same element.
 
 But what would happen if each of the 2 neutrons that emerged from the
 original target nucleus struck new nuclei and forced the emission of a
 pair of neutrons from each. There would now be a total of 4 neutrons
 flying about and if each struck new nuclei there would next be 8
 neutrons and so on. From the initial investment of a single neutron
 there might soon be countless billions initiating nuclear reactions.
 
 Szilard, fearing the inevitability of war and fearing further that the
 brutal leaders of Germany might seek and use such a nuclear chain
 reaction as a weapon in warfare, secretly applied for a patent on a
 device intending to make use of such a nuclear chain reaction. He hoped
 to turn it over to the British Government, which might then use its
 possession as a way of restraining the Nazis and keeping the peace.
 
 However, it wouldnt have worked. It took the impact of a very energetic
 neutron to bring about the emission of 2 neutrons. The neutrons that
 then emerged from the nucleus simply didnt have enough energy to keep
 things going. (It was like trying to make wet wood catch fire.)
 
 But what about uranium fission? Uranium fission was initiated by slow
 neutrons. What if uranium fission also produced neutrons as well as
 being initiated by a neutron? Would not the neutrons produced serve to
 initiate new fissions that would produce new neutrons and so on
 endlessly?
 
 It seemed very likely that fission produced neutrons and indeed, Fermi,
 at the conference where fission was first discussed, suggested it at
 once. Massive nuclei possessed more neutrons per proton than less
 massive ones did. If a massive nucleus was broken up into 2 considerably
 less massive ones, there would be a surplus of neutrons. Suppose, for
 instance, uranium-238 broke down into barium-138 and krypton-86.
 Barium-138 contains 82 neutrons and krypton-86 50 neutrons for a total
 of 132. The uranium-238 nucleus, however, contains 146 neutrons.
 
 The uranium fission process was studied at once to see if neutrons were
 actually given off and a number of different physicists, including
 Szilard, found that they were.
 
 Now Szilard was faced with a nuclear chain reaction he was certain would
 work. Only slow neutrons were involved and the individual nuclear
 breakdowns were far more energetic than anything else that had yet been
 discovered. If a chain reaction could be started in a sizable piece of
 uranium, unimaginable quantities of energy would be produced. Just 1
 gram of uranium, undergoing complete fission, would deliver the energy
 derived from the total burning of 3 tons of coal and would deliver that
 energy in a tiny fraction of a second.
 
 Szilard, who had come to the United States in 1937, clearly visualized
 the tremendous explosive force of something that would have to be called
 a nuclear bomb. Szilard dreaded the possibility that Hitler might
 obtain the use of such a bomb through the agency of Germanys nuclear
 scientists.
 
 Partly through Szilards efforts, physicists in the United States and in
 other Western nations opposed to Hitler began a program of voluntary
 secrecy in 1940, to avoid passing along any hints to Germany. Whats
 more, Szilard enlisted the services of two other Hungarian refugees, the
 physicists Eugene Paul Wigner (1902-    ) and Edward Teller (1908-    )
 and all approached Einstein, who had also fled Germany and come to
 America.
 
 [Illustration: _Leo Szilard_]
 
 [Illustration: _Eugene P. Wigner_]
 
 Einstein was the most prestigious scientist then living and it was
 thought a letter from him to the President of the United States would be
 most persuasive. Einstein signed such a letter, which explained the
 possibility of a nuclear bomb and urged that the United States not allow
 a potential enemy to come into possession of it first.
 
 Largely as a result of this letter, a huge research team was put
 together in the United States, to which other Western nations also
 contributed, with but one aimto develop the nuclear bomb.
 
 
 The Nuclear Bomb
 
 Although the theory of the nuclear bomb seemed clear and simple, a great
 many practical difficulties stood in the way. In the first place, if
 only uranium atoms underwent fission a supply of uranium had at least to
 be obtained in pure form, for if the neutrons struck nuclei of elements
 other than uranium, they would simply be absorbed and removed from the
 system, ending the possibility of a chain reaction. This alone was a
 heavy task, since there had been so little use for uranium in quantity
 that there was almost no supply in existence and no experience in how to
 purify it.
 
 Secondly, the supply of uranium might have to be a large one, for
 neutrons didnt necessarily enter the first uranium atom they
 approached. They moved about here and there, making glancing collisions,
 and travelling quite a distance, perhaps, before striking head-on and
 entering a nucleus. If in that time they had passed outside the lump of
 uranium, they were useless.
 
 [Illustration: Franklin D. Roosevelt]
 
   Albert Einstein
   Old Grove Rd.
   Nassau Point
   Peconic, Long Island
 
   August 2nd, 1939
 
   F.D. Roosevelt,
   President of the United States,
   White House
   Washington, D.C.
 
 Sir:
 
 Some recent work by E. Fermi and L. Szilard, which has been communicated
 to me in manuscript, leads me to expect that the element uranium may be
 turned into a new and important source of energy in the immediate
 future. Certain aspects of the situation which has arisen seem to call
 for watchfulness and, if necessary, quick action on the part of the
 Administration. I believe therefore that it is my duty to bring to your
 attention the following facts and recommendations:
 
 In the course of the last four months it has been made probablethrough
 the work of Joliot in France as well as Fermi and Szilard in
 Americathat it may become possible to set up a nuclear chain reaction
 in a large mass of uranium, by which vast amounts of power and large
 quantities of new radium-like elements would be generated. Now it
 appears almost certain that this could be achieved in the immediate
 future.
 
 This new phenomenon would also lead to the construction of bombs, and it
 is conceivablethough much less certainthat extremely powerful bombs of
 a new type may thus be constructed. A single bomb of this type, carried
 by boat and exploded in a port, might very well destroy the whole port
 together with some of the surrounding territory. However, such bombs
 might very well prove to be too heavy for transportation by air.
 
 [Illustration: _Albert Einstein_]
 
   The United States has only very poor ores of uranium in moderate
   quantities. There is some good ore in Canada and the former
   Czechoslovakia, while the most important source of uranium is Belgian
   Congo.
 
   In view of this situation you may think it desirable to have some
   permanent contact maintained between the Administration and the group
   of physicists working on chain reactions in America. One possible way
   of achieving this might be for you to entrust with this task a person
   who has your confidence and who could perhaps serve in an inofficial
   capacity. His task might comprise the following:
 
   a) to approach Government Departments, keep them informed of the
   further development, and put forward recommendations for Government
   action, giving particular attention to the problem of securing a
   supply of uranium ore for the United States;
 
   b) to speed up the experimental work, which is at present being
   carried on within the limits of the budgets of University
   laboratories, by providing funds, if such funds be required, through
   his contacts with private persons who are willing to make
   contributions for this cause, and perhaps also by obtaining the
   co-operation of industrial laboratories which have the necessary
   equipment.
 
   I understand that Germany has actually stopped the sale of uranium
   from the Czechoslovakian mines which she has taken over. That she
   should have taken such early action might perhaps be understood on the
   ground that the son of the German Under-Secretary of State, von
   Weizscker, is attached to the Kaiser-Wilhelm-Institut in Berlin where
   some of the American work on uranium is now being repeated.
 
   Yours very truly,
 
                         [Illustration: /signed/]
 
 (Albert Einstein)
 
 As the quantity of uranium within which the fission chain reaction was
 initiated grew larger, more and more of the neutrons produced found a
 mark and the fission reaction would die out more and more slowly.
 Finally, at some particular sizethe critical sizethe fission
 reaction did not die at all, but maintained itself, with enough of the
 neutrons produced finding their mark to keep the nuclear reaction
 proceeding at a steady rate. At any greater size the nuclear reaction
 would accelerate and there would be an explosion.
 
 It wasnt even necessary to send neutrons into the uranium to start the
 process. In 1941 the Russian physicist Georgii Nikolaevich Flerov
 (1913-    ) found that every once in a while a uranium atom would
 undergo fission without the introduction of a neutron. Occasionally the
 random quivering of a nucleus would bring about a shape that the nuclear
 interaction could not bring back to normal and the nucleus would then
 break apart. In a gram of ordinary uranium, there is a nucleus
 undergoing such spontaneous fission every 2 minutes on the average.
 Therefore, enough uranium need only be brought together to surpass
 critical size and it will explode within seconds, for the first nucleus
 that undergoes spontaneous fission will start the chain reaction.
 
 First estimates made it seem that the quantity of uranium needed to
 reach critical size was extraordinarily great. Fully 99.3% of the metal
 is uranium-238, however, and, as soon as fission was discovered, Bohr
 pointed out that there were theoretical reasons for supposing that it
 was the uranium-235 isotope (making up only 0.7% of the whole) that was
 the one undergoing fission. Investigation proved him right. Indeed, the
 uranium-238 nucleus tended to absorb slow neutrons without fission, and
 to go on to beta-particle production that formed isotopes of neptunium
 and plutonium. In this way uranium-238 actually interfered with the
 chain reaction.
 
 In any quantity of uranium, the more uranium-235 present and the less
 uranium-238, the more easily the chain reaction would proceed and the
 lower the critical size needed. Vast efforts were therefore made to
 separate the 2 isotopes and prepare uranium with a higher than normal
 concentration of uranium-235 (enriched uranium).
 
 Of course, there was no great desire for a fearful explosion to get out
 of hand while the chain reaction was being studied. Before any bomb
 could be constructed, the mechanism of the chain reaction would have to
 be studied. Could a chain reaction capable of producing energy (for
 useful purposes as well as for bombs) be established? To test this, a
 quantity of uranium was gathered in the hope that a _controlled_ chain
 reaction of uranium fission could be established. For that purpose,
 control rods of a substance that would easily absorb neutrons and slow
 the chain reaction were used. The metal, cadmium, served admirably for
 this purpose.
 
 Then, too, the neutrons released by fission were pretty energetic. They
 tended to travel too far too soon and get outside the lump of uranium
 too easily. To produce a chain reaction that could be studied with some
 safety, the presence of a moderator was needed. This was a supply of
 small nuclei that did not absorb neutrons readily, but absorbed some of
 the energy of collision and slowed down any neutron that struck it.
 Nuclei such as hydrogen-2, beryllium-9, or carbon-12 were useful
 moderators. When the neutrons produced by fission were slowed, they
 travelled a smaller distance before being absorbed in their turn and the
 critical size would again be reduced.
 
 Toward the end of 1942 the initial stage of the project reached a
 climax. Blocks of graphite containing uranium metal and uranium oxide
 were piled up in huge quantities (enriched uranium was not yet
 available) in order to approach critical size. This took place under the
 stands of a football stadium at the University of Chicago, with Enrico
 Fermi (who had come to the United States in 1938) in charge.[1]
 
 The large structure was called an atomic pile at first because of the
 blocks of graphite being piled up. The proper name for such a device,
 and the one that was eventually adopted, was, however, nuclear
 reactor.
 
 On December 2, 1942, calculations showed that the nuclear reactor was
 large enough to have reached critical size. The only thing preventing
 the chain reaction from sustaining itself was the cadmium rods that were
 inserted here and there in the pile and that were soaking up neutrons.
 
 [Illustration: _Cutaway model of the West Stands of Stagg Field showing
 the first pile in the squash court beneath it._]
 
 [Illustration: _The exterior of the building._]
 
 [Illustration: _Graphite layers form the base of the pile, left. On the
 right is the seventh layer of graphite and edges of the sixth layer
 containing 3-inch pseudospheres of black uranium oxide. Beginning with
 layer 6, alternate courses of graphite containing uranium metal and/or
 uranium oxide fuel were separated by layers of solid graphite blocks._]
 
 [Illustration: _Tenth layer of graphite blocks containing pseudospheres
 of black and brown uranium oxide. The brown briquets, slightly richer in
 uranium, were concentrated in the central area. On the right is the
 nineteenth layer of graphite covering layer 18 containing slugs of
 uranium oxide._]
 
 One by one the cadmium rods were pulled out. The number of uranium atoms
 undergoing fission each second rose and, finally, at 3:45 p.m., the
 uranium fission became self-sustaining. It kept going on its own (with
 the cadmium rods ready to be pushed in if it looked as though it were
 getting out of handsomething calculations showed was not likely).
 
 News of this success was announced to Washington by a cautious telephone
 call from Arthur Holly Compton (1892-1962) to James Bryant Conant
 (1893-    ). The Italian navigator has landed in the new world, said
 Compton. Conant asked, How were the natives?, and the answer was,
 Very friendly.
 
 This was the day and moment when the world entered the nuclear age.
 For the first time, mankind had constructed a device in which the
 nuclear energy being given off was greater than the energy poured in.
 Mankind had tapped the reservoirs of nuclear energy and could put it to
 use. Had Rutherford lived but 6 more years, he would have seen how wrong
 he was to think it could never be done.
 
 The people of earth remained unaware of what had taken place in Chicago
 and physicists continued to work toward the development of the nuclear
 bomb.
 
 Enriched uranium was successfully prepared. Critical sizes were brought
 low enough to make a nuclear bomb small enough to be carried by plane to
 some target. Suppose one had 2 slabs of enriched uranium, each below
 critical size, but which were above critical size if combined. And
 suppose an explosive device were added that, at some desired moment,
 could be set off in such a way that it would drive 1 slab of enriched
 uranium against the other. There would be an instant explosion of
 devastating power. Or suppose the enriched uranium were arranged in
 loosely packed pieces to begin with so that the flying neutrons were in
 open air too often to maintain the chain reaction. A properly arranged
 explosion might compress the uranium into a dense ball. Neutron
 absorption would become more efficient and again, an explosion would
 follow.
 
 [Illustration: _Nuclear Fission of Uranium: A neutron hits the nucleus
 of an atom of uranium. The neutron splits the nucleus into two parts and
 creates huge amounts of energy in the form of heat. At the same time
 other neutrons are released from the splitting nucleus and these
 continue the fission process in a chain reaction._]
 
 On July 16, 1945, a device that would result in a nuclear explosion was
 set up near Alamogordo, New Mexico, with nervous physicists watching
 from a safe distance. It worked perfectly; the explosion was tremendous.
 
 By that time Nazi Germany had been defeated, but Japan was still
 fighting. Two more devices were prepared. After a warning, one was
 exploded over the Japanese city of Hiroshima on August 6, 1945, and the
 other over Nagasaki 2 days later. The Japanese government surrendered
 and World War II came to an end.
 
 It was with the blast over Hiroshima that the world came to know it was
 in the nuclear age and that the ferocious weapon of the nuclear bomb
 existed. (The popular name for it at the time was atomic bomb or
 A-bomb.)
 
 During the war, German scientists may have been trying to develop a
 nuclear bomb, but, if so, they had not yet succeeded at the time Germany
 met its final defeat. Soviet physicists, under Igor Vasilievich
 Kurchatov (1903-1960), were also working on the problem. The dislocation
 of the war, which inflicted much more damage on the Soviet Union than on
 the United States, kept the Soviet effort from succeeding while it was
 on. However, since the Soviets were among the victors, they were able to
 continue after the war.
 
 In 1949 the Soviets exploded their first nuclear bomb. In 1952 the
 British did the same; in 1960, the French; and in 1964, the Chinese.
 
 Although many nuclear bombs have been exploded for test purposes, the
 two over Hiroshima and Nagasaki have been the only ones used in time of
 war.
 
 Nor need nuclear bombs be considered as having destructive potential
 only. There is the possibility that, with proper precautions, they might
 be used to make excavations, blast out harbors or canals, break up
 underground rock formations to recover oil or other resources, and in
 other ways do the work of chemical explosives with far greater speed and
 economy. It has even been suggested that a series of nuclear bomb
 explosions might be used to hurl space vehicles forward in voyages away
 from earth.
 
 
 Nuclear Reactors
 
 The development of the nuclear chain reaction was not in the direction
 of bombs only. Nuclear reactors designed for the controlled production
 of useful energy multiplied in number and in efficiency since Fermis
 first pile. Many nations now possess them, and they are used for a
 variety of purposes.[2]
 
 [Illustration: _The USS_ Nautilus, _the worlds first nuclear powered
 submarine, in New York harbor_.]
 
 In 1954 the first nuclear submarine the USS _Nautilus_ was launched by
 the United States. Its power was obtained entirely from a nuclear
 reactor, and it was not necessary for it to rise to the surface at short
 intervals in order to recharge its batteries. Nuclear submarines have
 crossed the Arctic Ocean under the ice cover, and have circumnavigated
 the globe without surfacing.
 
 In 1959 both the Soviet Union and the United States launched
 nuclear-powered surface vessels. The Soviet ship was the icebreaker,
 _Lenin_, and the American ship was a merchant vessel, the NS _Savannah_.
 
 In the 1950s nuclear reactors were also used as the source of power for
 the production of electricity for civilian use. The Soviet Union built a
 small station of this sort in 1954, which had a capacity of 5,000
 kilowatts. The British built one of 92,000 kilowatt capacity, which they
 called Calder Hall. The first American nuclear reactor for civilian use
 began operation at Shippingport, Pennsylvania, in 1958. It was the first
 really full-scale civilian nuclear power plant in the world.
 
 The world appeared to have far greater sources of energy than had been
 expected. The fossil fuelscoal, oil and natural gaswere being used
 at such a rate that many speculated that the gas and oil would be gone
 in decades and the coal in centuries. Was it possible that uranium might
 now serve as a new source that would last indefinitely?
 
 It was rather disappointing that it was uranium-235 which underwent
 fission, because that isotope made up only 0.7% of the uranium that
 existed. If uranium-235 were all we had and all we ever could have, the
 energy supply of the world would still be rather too limited.
 
 There were other possible nuclear fuels, however. There was
 plutonium-239, which would also fission under neutron bombardment. It
 had an ordinary half-life (for a radioactive change in which it gave off
 alpha particles) of 24,300 years, which is long enough to make it easy
 to handle.
 
 But how can plutonium-239 be formed in sufficient quantities to be
 useful? After all, it doesnt occur in nature. Surprisingly, that turned
 out to be easy. Uranium-238 atoms will absorb many of the neutrons that
 are constantly leaking out of the reactor and will become first
 neptunium-239 and then plutonium-239. The plutonium, being a different
 element from the uranium, can be separated from uranium and obtained in
 useful quantities.
 
 Such a device is called a breeder reactor because it breeds fuel.
 Indeed, it can be so designed to produce more plutonium-239 than the
 uranium-235 it uses up, so that you actually end up with more nuclear
 fuel than you started with. In this way, all the uranium on earth (and
 not just uranium-235) can be considered potential nuclear fuel.
 
 [Illustration: _The Shippingport Atomic Power Station, the first
 full-scale, nuclear-electric station built exclusively for civilian
 needs, provides electricity for the homes and factories of the greater
 Pittsburgh area. The pressurized-water reactor, which now has a
 90,000-net-electrical-kilowatt capacity, began commercial operation in
 1957. The reactor is in the large building in the center._]
 
 [Illustration: _The lights of downtown Pittsburgh._]
 
 The first breeder reactor was completed at Arco, Idaho, in August 1951,
 and on December 20 produced the very first electricity on earth to come
 from nuclear power. Nevertheless, breeder reactors for commercial use
 are still a matter for the future.[3]
 
 Another isotope capable of fissioning under neutron bombardment is
 uranium-233. It does not occur in nature, but was formed in the
 laboratory by Seaborg and others in 1942. It has a half-life of 162,000
 years. It can be formed from naturally occurring thorium-232.
 Thorium-232 will absorb a neutron to become thorium-233. Then 2 beta
 particles are given off so that the thorium-233 becomes first
 protactinium-233 and then uranium-233.
 
 If a thorium shell surrounds a nuclear reactor, fissionable uranium-233
 is formed within it and is easily separated from the thorium. In this
 way, thorium is also added to the list of earths potential nuclear
 fuels.[4]
 
 If all the uranium and thorium in the earths crust (including the thin
 scattering of those elements through granite, for instance) were
 available for use, we might get up to 100 times as much energy from it
 as from all the coal and oil on the planet. Unfortunately, it is very
 unlikely that we will ever be able to make use of all the uranium and
 thorium. It is widely and thinly spread through the crustal rocks and
 much of it could not be extracted without using up more energy than
 would be supplied by it once isolated.
 
 Another problem rests with the nature of the fission reaction. When the
 uranium-235 nucleus (or plutonium-239 or uranium-233) undergoes fission,
 it breaks up into any of a large number of middle-sized nuclei that are
 radioactivemuch more intensely radioactive than the original fuel. (It
 was from among these fission products that isotopes of element 61 were
 first obtained in 1945. Coming from the nuclear fire, it reminded its
 discoverers of Prometheus, who stole fire from the sun in the Greek
 myths, and so it was called promethium.)
 
 The fission products still contain energy and some of them can be used
 in lightweight nuclear batteries. Such nuclear batteries were first
 built in 1954. Some batteries, using plutonium-238 rather than fission
 products, have been put to use in powering artificial satellites over
 long periods.
 
 Unfortunately, only a small proportion of the fission products can be
 put to profitable use. Most must be disposed of. They are dangerous
 because the radiations they give off are deadly and cannot be detected
 by the ordinary senses. They are very difficult to dispose of safely,
 and they must not be allowed to get into the environment, especially
 since some of them remain dangerous for decades or even centuries.
 
 [Illustration: _The Experimental Breeder Reactor No. 2 building complex
 in Idaho. The reactor is in the dome-shaped structure._]
 
 
 
 
                              NUCLEAR FUSION
 
 
 The Energy of the Sun
 
 As it happens, though, nuclear fission is not the only route to useful
 nuclear energy.
 
 Astons studies in the 1920s had shown that it was the middle-sized
 nuclei that were most tightly packed. Energy would be given off if
 middle-sized nuclei were produced from either extreme. Not only would
 energy be formed by the breakup of particularly massive nuclei through
 fission, but also through the combination of small nuclei to form larger
 ones (nuclear fusion).
 
 In fact, from Astons studies it could be seen that, mass for mass,
 nuclear fusion would produce far more energy than nuclear fission. This
 was particularly true in the conversion of hydrogen to helium; that is,
 the conversion of the individual protons of 4 separate hydrogen nuclei
 into the 2-proton2-neutron structure of the helium nucleus. A gram of
 hydrogen, undergoing fusion to helium, would deliver some fifteen times
 as much energy as a gram of uranium undergoing fission.
 
 As early as 1920, the English astronomer Arthur Stanley Eddington
 (1882-1944) had speculated that the suns energy might be derived from
 the interaction of subatomic particles. Some sort of nuclear reaction
 seemed, by then, to be the most reasonable way of accounting for the
 vast energies constantly being produced by the sun.
 
 The speculation became more plausible with each year. Eddington himself
 studied the structure of stars, and by 1926 had produced convincing
 theoretical reasons for supposing that the center of the sun was at
 enormous densities and temperatures. A temperature of some 15,000,000 to
 20,000,000C seemed to characterize the suns center.
 
 At such temperatures, atoms could not exist in earthly fashion. Held
 together by the suns strong gravitational field, they collided with
 such energy that all or almost all their electrons were stripped off,
 and little more than bare nuclei were left. These bare nuclei could
 approach each other much more closely than whole atoms could (which was
 why the center of the sun was so much more dense than earthly matter
 could be). The bare nuclei, smashing together at central-sun
 temperatures, could cling together and form more complex nuclei. Nuclear
 reactions brought about by such intense heat (millions of degrees) are
 called thermonuclear reactions.
 
 As the 1920s progressed further studies of the chemical structure of the
 sun showed it to be even richer in hydrogen than had been thought. In
 1929 the American astronomer Henry Norris Russell (1877-1957) reported
 evidence that the sun was 60% hydrogen in volume. (Even this was too
 conservative; 80% is considered more nearly correct now.) If the suns
 energy were based on nuclear reactions at all, then it had to be the
 result of hydrogen fusion. Nothing else was present in sufficient
 quantity to be useful as a fuel.
 
 More and more was learned about the exact manner in which nuclei
 interacted and about the quantity of energy given off in particular
 nuclear reactions. It became possible to calculate what might be going
 on inside the sun by considering the densities and temperatures present,
 the kind and number of different nuclei available, and the quantity of
 energy that must be produced. In 1938 the German-American physicist Hans
 Albrecht Bethe (1906-    ) and the German astronomer Carl Friedrich von
 Weizscker (1912-    ) independently worked out the possible reactions,
 and hydrogen fusion was shown to be a thoroughly practical way of
 keeping the sun going.
 
 Thanks to the high rate of energy production by thermonuclear reactions
 and to the vast quantity of hydrogen in the sun, not only has it been
 possible for the sun to have been radiating energy for the last
 5,000,000,000 years or so, but it will continue to radiate energy in the
 present fashion for at least 5,000,000,000 years into the future.
 
 [Illustration: _Hans Bethe_]
 
 Even so, the sheer quantity of what is going on in the sun is staggering
 in earthly terms. In the sun 650,000,000 tons of hydrogen are converted
 into helium every second, and in the process each second sees the
 disappearance of 4,600,000 tons of mass.
 
 
 Thermonuclear Bombs
 
 Could thermonuclear reactions be made to take place on earth? The
 conditions that exist in the center of the sun would be extremely
 difficult to duplicate on the earth, so there was a natural search for
 any kind of nuclear fusion that would produce similar energies to those
 going on in the sun but which would be easier to bring about.
 
 There are 3 hydrogen isotopes known to exist. Ordinary hydrogen is
 almost entirely hydrogen-1, with a nucleus made up of a single proton.
 Small quantities of hydrogen-2 (deuterium) with a nucleus made up of a
 proton plus a neutron also exist and such atoms are perfectly stable.
 
 In 1934 Rutherford, along with the Australian physicist Marcus Laurence
 Elwin Oliphant (1901-    ) and the Austrian chemist Paul Harteck
 (1902-    ) sent hydrogen-2 nuclei flying into hydrogen-2 targets and
 formed hydrogen-3 (also called tritium from the Greek word for
 third) with a nucleus made up of a proton plus 2 neutrons. Hydrogen-3
 is mildly radioactive.
 
 Hydrogen-2 fuses to helium more easily than hydrogen-1 does and, all
 things being equal, hydrogen-2 will do so at lower temperatures than
 hydrogen-1. Hydrogen-3 requires lower temperatures still. But even for
 hydrogen-3 it still takes millions of degrees.
 
 Hydrogen-3, although the easiest to be forced to undergo fusion, exists
 only in tiny quantities.
 
 Hydrogen-2, therefore, is the one to pin hopes on especially in
 conjunction with hydrogen-3. Only 1 atom out of every 6000 hydrogen
 atoms is hydrogen-2, but that is enough. There exists a vast ocean on
 earth that is made up almost entirely of water molecules and in each
 water molecule 2 hydrogen atoms are present. Even if only 1 in 6000 of
 these hydrogen atoms is deuterium that still means there are about
 35,000 billion tons of deuterium in the ocean.
 
 Whats more, it isnt necessary to dig for that deuterium or to drill
 for it. If ocean water is allowed to run through separation plants, the
 deuterium can be extracted without very much trouble. In fact, for the
 energy you could get out of it, deuterium from the oceans, extracted by
 present methods and without allowing for future improvement, would be
 only one-hundredth as expensive as coal.
 
 The deuterium in the worlds ocean, if allowed to undergo fusion little
 by little, would supply mankind with enough energy to keep us going at
 the present rate for 500,000,000,000 years. To be sure, to make
 deuterium fusion practical, it may be necessary to make use of rarer
 substances such as the light metal lithium. This will place a sharper
 limit on the energy supply but even if we are careful, fusion would
 probably supply mankind with energy for as long as mankind will exist.
 
 Then, too, there would seem to be no danger of hydrogen fusion plants
 running out of control. Only small quantities of deuterium would be in
 the process of fusion at any one time. If anything at all went wrong,
 the deuterium supply could be automatically cut off and the fusion
 process, with so little involved, would then stop instantly. Moreover,
 there would be less reason to worry about atomic wastes, for the most
 dangerous productshydrogen-3 and neutronscould be easily taken care
 of.
 
 It seems ideal, but there is a catch. However clear the theory, before a
 fusion power station can be established some practical method must be
 found to start the fusion process, which means finding some way for
 attaining temperatures in the millions of degrees.
 
 One method for obtaining the necessary temperature was known by 1945. An
 exploding fission bomb would do it. If, somehow, the necessary
 hydrogen-2 was combined with a fission bomb, the explosion would set off
 a fusion reaction that would greatly multiply the energy released. You
 would have in effect a thermonuclear bomb. (To the general public,
 this was commonly known as a hydrogen bomb or an H-bomb.)
 
 In 1952 the first fusion device was exploded by the United States in the
 Marshall Islands. Within months, the Soviet Union had exploded one of
 its own and in time thermonuclear bombs thousands of times as powerful
 as the first fission bomb over Hiroshima were built and exploded.
 
 All thermonuclear bombs have been exploded only for test purposes. Even
 testing seems to be dangerous, however, at least if it is carried on in
 the open atmosphere. The radioactivity liberated spreads over the world
 and may do slow but cumulative damage.
 
 
 Controlled Fusion
 
 However effective a fusion bomb may be in liberating vast quantities of
 energy, it is not what one has in mind when speaking of a fusion power
 station. The energy of a fusion bomb is released all at once and its
 only function is that of utter destruction. What is wanted is the
 production of fusion energy at a low and steady ratea rate that is
 under the control of human operators.
 
 The sun, for instance, is a vast fusion furnace 866,000 miles across,
 but it is a controlled oneeven though that control is exerted by the
 impersonal laws of nature. It releases energy at a very steady and very
 slow rate. (The rate is not slow in human terms, of course, but stars
 sometimes do release their energy in a much more cataclysmic fashion.
 The result is a supernova in which for a short time a single star will
 increase its radiation to as much as a trillion times its normal level.)
 
 The sun (or any star) going at its normal rate is controlled and steady
 in its output because of the advantage of huge mass. An enormous mass,
 composed mainly of hydrogen, compresses itself, through its equally
 enormous gravitational field, into huge densities and temperatures at
 its center, thus igniting the fusion reactionwhile the same
 gravitational field keeps the sun together against its tendency to
 expand.
 
 There is, as far as scientists know, no conceivable way of concentrating
 a high gravitational field in the absence of the required mass, and the
 creation of controlled fusion on earth must therefore be done without
 the aid of gravity. Without a huge gravitational force we cannot
 simultaneously bring about sun-center densities and sun-center
 temperatures; one or the other must go.
 
 On the whole, it would take much less energy to aim at the temperatures
 than at the densities and would be much more feasible. For this reason,
 physicists have been attempting, all through the nuclear age, to heat
 thin wisps of hydrogen to enormous temperature. Since the gas is thin,
 the nuclei are farther apart and collide with each other far fewer times
 per second. To achieve fusion ignition, therefore, temperatures must be
 considerably higher than those at the center of the sun. In 1944 Fermi
 calculated that it might take a temperature of 50,000,000 to ignite a
 hydrogen-3 fusion with hydrogen-2 under earthly conditions, and
 400,000,000 to ignite hydrogen-2 fusion alone. To ignite hydrogen-1
 fusion, which is what goes on in the sun (at a mere 15,000,000),
 physicists would have to raise their sights to beyond the billion-degree
 mark.
 
 [Illustration: _A supernova photographed on March 10, 1935._]
 
 [Illustration: _The same star on May 6._]
 
 This would make it seem almost essential to use hydrogen-3 in one
 fashion or another. Even if it cant be prepared in quantity to begin
 with, it might be formed by neutron bombardment of lithium, with the
 neutrons being formed by the fusion reaction. In this way, you would
 start with lithium and hydrogen-2 plus a little hydrogen-3. The
 hydrogen-3 is formed as fast as it is used up. Although in the end
 hydrogen is converted to helium in a controlled fusion reaction as in
 the sun, the individual steps in the reaction under human control are
 quite different from those in the sun.
 
 Still, even the temperatures required for hydrogen-3 represent an
 enormous problem, particularly since the temperature must not only be
 reached, but must be held for a period of time. (You can pass a piece of
 paper rapidly through a candle flame without lighting it. It must be
 held in the flame for a short period to give it a chance to heat and
 ignite.)
 
 The English physicist John David Lawson (1923-    ) worked out the
 requirements in 1957. The time depended on the density of the gas. The
 denser the gas, the shorter the period over which the temperature had to
 be maintained. If the gas is about one hundred-thousand times as dense
 as air, the proper temperature must be held, under the most favorable
 conditions, for about one thousandth of a second.
 
 There are a number of different ways in which a quantity of hydrogen can
 be heated to very high temperaturesthrough electric currents, through
 magnetic fields, through laser beams and so on. As the temperature goes
 up into the tens of thousands of degrees, the hydrogen atoms (or any
 atoms) are broken up into free electrons and bare nuclei. Such a mixture
 of charged particles is called a plasma. Ever since physicists have
 begun to try to work with very hot gases, with fusion energy in mind,
 they have had to study the properties of such plasma, and a whole new
 science of plasma physics has come into existence.
 
 But if you do heat a gas to very high temperatures, it will tend to
 expand and thin out to uselessness. How can such a super-hot gas be
 confined in a fixed volume without an enormous gravitational field to
 hold it together?
 
 An obvious answer would be to place it in a container, but no ordinary
 container of matter will serve to hold the hot gas. You may think this
 is because the temperature of the gas will simply melt or vaporize
 whatever matter encloses it. This is not so. Although the gas is at a
 very high temperature, it is so thin that it has very little total heat.
 It does not have enough heat to melt the solid walls of a container.
 What happens instead is that the hot plasma cools down the moment it
 touches the solid walls and the entire attempt to heat it is ruined.
 
 Whats more, if you try to invest the enormous energies required to keep
 the plasma hot despite the cooling effect of the container walls, then
 the walls will gradually heat and melt. Nor must one wait for the walls
 to melt and the plasma to escape before finding the attempt at fusion
 ruined. Even as the walls heat up they liberate some of their own atoms
 into the plasma and introduce impurities that will prevent the fusion
 reaction.
 
 Any material container is therefore out of the question.
 
 Fortunately, there is a nonmaterial way of confining plasma. Since
 plasma consists of a mixture of electrically charged particles, it can
 experience electromagnetic interactions. Instead of keeping the plasma
 in a material container, you can surround it by a magnetic field that is
 designed to keep it in place. Such a magnetic field is not affected by
 any heat, however great, and cannot be a source of material impurity.
 
 In 1934, the American physicist Willard Harrison Bennett (1903-    ) had
 worked out a theory dealing with the behavior of magnetic fields
 enclosing plasma. It came to be called the pinch effect because the
 magnetic field pinched the gas together and held it in place.
 
 The first attempt to make use of the pinch effect for confining plasma,
 with eventual ignition of fusion in mind, was in 1951 by the English
 physicist Alan Alfred Ware (1924-    ). Other physicists followed, not
 only in Great Britain, but in the United States and the Soviet Union as
 well.
 
 The first use of the pinch effect was to confine the plasma in a
 cylinder. This, however, could not be made to work. The situation was
 too unstable. The plasma was held momentarily, then writhed and broke
 up.
 
 [Illustration: _Plasma in a magnetic field._]
 
 [Illustration: _Enormous machines and complex equipment, such as the
 Scyllac machine shown above, are required for nuclear fusion research._]
 
 Attempts were made to remove the instability. The field was so designed
 as to be stronger at the ends of the cylinder than elsewhere. The
 particles in the plasma would stream toward one end or another and would
 then bounce back producing a so-called magnetic mirror.
 
 In 1951 the American physicist Lyman Spitzer, Jr. (1914-    ) had worked
 out the theoretical benefits to be derived from a container twisted into
 a figure-eight shape. Eventually, such devices were built and called
 stellarators from the Latin word for star, because it was hoped that
 it would produce the conditions that would allow the sort of fusion
 reactions that went on in stars.
 
 All through the 1950s and 1960s, physicists have been slowly inching
 toward their goal, reaching higher and higher temperatures and holding
 them for longer and longer periods in denser and denser gases.
 
 In 1969 the Soviet Union used a device called Tokamak-3 (a Russian
 abbreviation for their phrase for electric-magnetic) to keep a supply
 of hydrogen-2, a millionth as dense as air, in place while heating it to
 tens of millions of degrees for a hundredth of a second.
 
 A little denser, a little hotter, a little longerand controlled fusion
 might become possible.[5]
 
 
 
 
                              BEYOND FUSION
 
 
 Antimatter
 
 Is there anything that lies beyond fusion?
 
 When hydrogen undergoes fusion and becomes helium, only 0.7% of the
 original mass of the hydrogen is converted to energy. Is it possible to
 take a quantity of mass and convert all of it, every bit, to energy?
 Surely that would be the ultimate energy source. Mass for mass, that
 would deliver 140 times as much energy as hydrogen fusion would; it
 would be as far beyond hydrogen fusion as hydrogen fusion is beyond
 uranium fission.
 
 And, as a matter of fact, total annihilation of matter is conceivable
 under some circumstances.
 
 In 1928 the English physicist Paul Adrien Maurice Dirac (1902-    )
 presented a treatment of the electrons properties that made it appear
 as though there ought also to exist a particle exactly like the electron
 in every respect except that it would be opposite in charge. It would
 carry a positive electric charge exactly as large as the electrons
 negative one.
 
 If the electron is a particle, this suggested positively charged twin
 would be an antiparticle. (The prefix comes from a Greek word meaning
 opposite.)
 
 [Illustration: _P. A. M. Dirac_]
 
 [Illustration: _The first picture of the positron (left) was taken in a
 Wilson cloud chamber. On the right is C. D. Anderson, the discoverer of
 the positron._]
 
 The proton is _not_ the electrons antiparticle. Though a proton carries
 the necessary positive charge that is exactly as large as the negative
 charge of the electron, the proton has a much larger mass than the
 electron has. Diracs theory required that the antiparticle have the
 same mass as the particle to which it corresponded.
 
 In 1932 C. D. Anderson was studying the impact of cosmic particles on
 lead. In the process, he discovered signs of a particle that left tracks
 exactly like those of an electron, but tracks that curved the wrong way
 in a magnetic field. This was a sure sign that it had an electric charge
 opposite to that of the electron. He had, in short, discovered the
 electrons antiparticle and this came to be called the positron.
 
 Positrons were soon detected elsewhere too. Some radioactive isotopes,
 formed in the laboratory by the Joliot-Curies and by others, were found
 to emit positive beta particlespositrons rather than electrons. When an
 ordinary beta particle, or electron, was emitted from a nucleus, a
 neutron within the nucleus was converted to a proton. When a positive
 beta particle, a positron, was emitted, the reverse happeneda proton
 was converted to a neutron.
 
 A positron, however, does not endure long after formation. All about it
 were atoms containing electrons. It could not move for more than a
 millionth of a second or so before it encountered one of those
 electrons. When it did, there was an attraction between the two, since
 they were of opposite electric charge. Briefly they might circle each
 other (to form a combination called positronium) but only very
 briefly. Then they collided and, since they were opposites, each
 cancelled the other.
 
 The process whereby an electron and a positron met and cancelled is
 called mutual annihilation. Not everything was gone, though. The mass,
 in disappearing, was converted into the equivalent amount of energy,
 which made its appearance in the form of one or more gamma rays.
 
 (It works the other way, too. A gamma ray of sufficient energy can be
 transformed into an electron and a positron. This phenomenon, called
 pair production, was observed as early as 1930 but was only properly
 understood after the discovery of the positron.)
 
 Of course, the mass of electrons and positrons is very small and the
 amount of energy released per electron is not enormously high. Still,
 Diracs original theory of antiparticles was not confined to electrons.
 By his theory, any particle ought to have some corresponding
 antiparticle. Corresponding to the proton, for instance, there ought to
 be an antiproton. This would be just as massive as the proton and
 would carry a negative charge just as large as the protons positive
 charge.
 
 An antiproton, however, is 1836 times as massive as a positron. It would
 take gamma rays or cosmic particles with 1836 times as much energy to
 form the proton-antiproton pair as would suffice for the
 electron-positron pair. Cosmic particles of the necessary energies
 existed but they were rare and the chance of someone being present with
 a particle detector just as a rare super-energetic cosmic particle
 happened to form a proton-antiproton pair was very small.
 
 [Illustration: _The Bevatron began operation in 1954._]
 
 Physicists had to wait until they had succeeded in designing particle
 accelerators that would produce enough energy to allow the creation of
 proton-antiproton pairs. This came about in the early 1950s when a
 device called the Cosmotron was built at Brookhaven National
 Laboratory in Long Island in 1952 and another called the Bevatron at
 the University of California in Berkeley in 1954.
 
 Using the Bevatron in 1956, Segr (the discoverer of technetium who had,
 by that time, emigrated to the United States), the American physicist
 Owen Chamberlain (1920-    ), and others succeeded in detecting the
 antiproton.
 
 The antiproton was as unlikely to last as long as the positron was. It
 was surrounded by myriads of proton-containing nuclei and in a tiny
 fraction of a second it would encounter one. The antiproton and the
 proton also underwent mutual annihilation, but having 1836 times the
 mass, they produced 1836 times the energy that was produced in the case
 of an electron and a positron.
 
 There was even an antineutron, a particle reported in 1956 by the
 Italian-American physicist Oreste Piccioni (1915-    ) and his
 co-workers. Since the neutron has no charge, the antineutron has no
 charge either, and one might wonder how the antineutron would differ
 from the neutron then. Actually, both have a small magnetic field. In
 the neutron the magnetic field is pointed in one direction with
 reference to the neutrons spin; in the antineutron it is pointed in the
 other.
 
 [Illustration: _Bubble chamber photograph of an antiproton
 annihilation._]
 
 In 1965 the American physicist Leon Max Lederman (1922-    ) and his
 co-workers produced a combination of an antiproton and an antineutron
 that together formed an antideuteron, which is the nucleus of
 antihydrogen-2.
 
 This is good enough to demonstrate that if antiparticles existed by
 themselves without the interfering presence of ordinary particles, they
 could form antimatter, which would be precisely identical with
 ordinary matter in every way except for the fact that electric charges
 and magnetic fields would be turned around.
 
 If antimatter were available to us, and if we could control the manner
 in which it united with matter, we would have a source of energy much
 greater and, perhaps, simpler to produce than would be involved in
 hydrogen fusion.
 
 To be sure, there is no antimatter on earth, except for the
 submicroscopic amounts that are formed by the input of tremendous
 energies. Nor does anyone know of any conceivable way of forming
 antimatter at less energy than that produced by mutual annihilation, so
 that we might say that mankind can never make an energy profit out of
 itexcept that with the memory of Rutherfords prediction that nuclear
 energy of any kind could never be tapped, one hesitates to be
 pessimistic about anything.
 
 
 The Unknown
 
 Physical theory makes it seem that particles and antiparticles ought to
 exist in the universe in equal quantities. Yet on earth (and, we can be
 quite certain, in the rest of the solar system and even, very likely, in
 the rest of the galaxy) protons, neutrons, and electrons are common,
 while antiprotons, antineutrons, and positrons are exceedingly rare.
 
 Could it be that when the universe was first formed there were indeed
 equal quantities of particles and antiparticles but that they were
 somehow segregated, perhaps into galaxies and antigalaxies? If so,
 there might occasionally be collisions of a galaxy and an antigalaxy
 with the evolution of vast quantities of energy as mutual annihilation
 on a cosmic scale takes place.
 
 There are, in fact, places in the heavens where radiation is unusually
 high in quantity and in energy. Can we be witnessing such enormous
 mutual annihilation?
 
 Indeed, it is not altogether inconceivable that we may still have new
 types of forces and new sources of energy to discover. Until about 1900,
 no one suspected the existence of nuclear energy. Are we quite sure now
 that nuclear energy brings us to the end, and that there is not a form
 of energy more subtle still, and greater?
 
 In 1962, for instance, certain puzzling objects called quasars were
 discovered far out in space, a billion light-years or more away from us.
 Each one shines from 10 to 100 times as brilliantly as an entire
 ordinary galaxy does, and yet may be no more than a hundred-thousandth
 as wide as a galaxy.
 
 This is something like finding an object 10 miles across that delivers
 as much total light as 100 suns.
 
 It is very hard to understand where all that energy comes from and why
 it should be concentrated into so tiny a volume. Astronomers have tried
 to explain it in terms of the four interactions now known, but is it
 possible that there is a fifth greater than any of the four?
 
 If so, it is not impossible that eventually mans restless brain may
 come to understand and even utilize it.
 
 
 
 
                                FOOTNOTES
 
 
 [1]See _The First Reactor_, another booklet in this series.
 
 [2]See _Nuclear Reactors_ and _Nuclear Power Plants_, companion booklets
     in this series.
 
 [3]See _Breeder Reactors_, another booklet in this series.
 
 [4]See _Thoriumand the Third Fuel_, another booklet in this series.
 
 [5]See _Controlled Nuclear Fusion_, another booklet in this series.
 
 
 
 
                             QUOTATION CREDIT
 
 
   Inside front cover    Copyright  by Abelard-Shuman, Ltd., New York.
                         Reprinted by permission from _Inside the Atom_,
                         Isaac Asimov, 1966.
 
 
 
 
                               READING LIST
 
 
 Basic Books
 
   _Basic Laws of Matter_ (revised edition), Harrie S. W. Massey and
   Arthur R. Quinton, Herald Books, Bronxville, New York, 1965, 178 pp.,
   $3.75. Grades 7-9. A nontechnical presentation of atoms and the laws
   governing their behavior.
 
   _Biography of Physics_, George Gamow, Harper & Row, Publishers, New
   York, 1961, 338 pp., $6.50 (hardback); $2.75 (paperback). Grades 9-12.
   A history of theoretical physics.
 
   _Discoverer of X Rays: Wilhelm Conrad Roentgen_, Arnulf K. Esterer,
   Julian Messner, New York, 1968, 191 pp., $3.50. Grades 7-10. This
   interesting biography includes a brief, but very helpful, pronouncing
   gazetteer of the German, Swiss, and Dutch names in the text.
 
   _Ernest Rutherford: Architect of the Atom_, Peter Kelman and A. Harris
   Stone, Prentice-Hall, Inc., Englewood Cliffs, New Jersey, 1969, 72
   pp., $3.95. Grades 5-7. A well-done biography of this famous atomic
   scientist. Many of the drawings illustrate theoretical ideas very well
   for the elementary grades. A glossary is included.
 
   _Enrico Fermi: Atomic Pioneer_, Doris Faber, Prentice-Hall, Inc.,
   Englewood Cliffs, New Jersey, 1966, 86 pp., $3.95. Grades 5-8. A
   biography of the man who built the first reactor.
 
   _Giant of the Atom: Ernest Rutherford_, Robin McKown, Julian Messner,
   New York, 1962, 191 pp., $3.50. Grades 7-12. The life and
   accomplishments of a great physicist.
 
   _The History of the Atomic Bomb_, Michael Blow, American Heritage
   Publishing Company, Inc., New York, 1968, 150 pp., $5.95. Grades 5-9.
   This sumptuously illustrated history provides an informative
   explanation of nuclear physics in addition to comprehensive coverage
   of the bombs development and use.
 
   _Inside the Atom_, Isaac Asimov, Abelard-Schuman, Ltd., New York,
   1966, 197 pp., $4.00. Grades 7-10. This comprehensive, well-written
   text explains nuclear energy and its applications.
 
   _Madame Curie: A Biography_, Eve Curie, translated by Vincent Sheean,
   Doubleday and Company, Inc., New York, 1937, 385 pp., $5.95
   (hardback); $0.95 (paperback). Grades 9-12. This superb biography,
   which won the 1937 National Book Award for Nonfiction, illustrates
   dramatically the full spectrum of Marie Curies life.
 
   _Men Who Mastered the Atom_, Robert Silverberg, G. P. Putnams Sons,
   New York, 1965, 193 pp., $3.49. Grades 7-9. Atomic energy history is
   told through the work of pioneer scientists from Thales to present-day
   researchers.
 
   _The Neutron Story_, Donald J. Hughes, Doubleday and Company, Inc.,
   New York, 1959, 158 pp., out of print. Grades 7-9. A substantial and
   interesting account of neutron physics.
 
   _Niels Bohr: The Man Who Mapped the Atom_, Robert Silverberg, MacRae
   Smith Company, Philadelphia, Pennsylvania, 1965, 189 pp., $3.95.
   Grades 8-12. An exciting, suspenseful, and humorous biography of one
   of the pioneers in atomic energy. Includes a glossary and references.
 
   _The Questioners: Physicists and the Quantum Theory_, Barbara Lovett
   Cline, Crowell Collier and MacMillan, Inc., New York, 1965, 274 pp.,
   $5.00 (hardback); available in paperback with the title _Men Who Made
   A New Physics: Physicists and the Quantum Theory_, New American
   Library, Inc., New York, $0.75. Grades 9-12. An exceptionally
   well-delineated and personable account of the development of the
   quantum theory by physicists in the first quarter of this century.
 
   _The Restless Atom_, Alfred Romer, Doubleday and Company, Inc., New
   York, 1960, 198 pp., $1.25. Grades 9-12. A stimulating nonmathematical
   account of the classic early experiments that advanced knowledge about
   atomic particles.
 
   _Roads to Discovery_, Ralph E. Lapp, Harper and Row, Publishers, New
   York, 1960, 191 pp., out of print. Grades 10-12. Historical survey of
   nuclear physics beginning with Roentgens discovery of X rays and
   concluding with the discoveries of the rare elements.
 
   _Secret of the Mysterious Rays: The Discovery of Nuclear Energy_,
   Vivian Grey, Basic Books, Inc., Publishers, New York, 1966, 120 pp.,
   $3.95. Grades 4-8. This outstanding history of nuclear research from
   Roentgen to Fermi is dramatically presented. The uncertainty of the
   unknown, the accidental discovery and the often lengthy and tedious
   research are woven in this story of scientists from around the world
   who pooled their knowledge and experience to unlock the secrets of
   the mysterious rays.
 
   _Wilhelm Roentgen and the Discovery of X Rays_, Bern Dibner, Franklin
   Watts, Inc., New York, 1968, 149 pp., $2.95. Grades 5-8. This detailed
   biography, illustrated with line drawings, historical photographs, and
   papers, is a fine addition to Watts Immortals of Science Series.
 
   _Working with Atoms_, Otto R. Frisch, Basic Books, Inc., New York,
   1965, 96 pp., $4.95. Grades 9-12. Dr. Frisch presents a history of
   nuclear energy research and provides experiments for the reader. He
   gives a personal account of the pioneering work in which he and Lise
   Meitner explained the splitting of uranium and introduced the term
   nuclear fission.
 
 
 Advanced Books
 
   _An American Genius: The Life of Ernest Orlando Lawrence_, Herbert
   Childs, E. P. Dutton and Company, Inc., New York, 1968, 576 pp.,
   $12.95. This well-written, scientifically accurate, and very
   interesting biography captures the excitement of Lawrences life.
   Ernest Lawrence was the inventor of the cyclotron, a major member of
   the wartime atomic energy development, and the director of the
   Lawrence Radiation Laboratory.
 
   _The Atom and Its Nucleus_, George Gamow, Prentice-Hall, Inc.,
   Englewood Cliffs, New Jersey, 1961, 153 pp., $1.25. A popular-level
   discussion of nuclear structure and the applications of nuclear
   energy.
 
   _Atomic Energy for Military Purposes_, Henry D. Smyth, Princeton
   University Press, Princeton, New Jersey, 1945, 308 pp., $4.00. A
   complete account of the wartime project that developed the first
   nuclear weapons and of the considerations that prompted their use.
 
   _Atomic Quest_, Arthur H. Compton, Oxford University Press, Inc., New
   York, 1956, 370 pp., $7.95. A personal narrative of the research that
   led to the release of atomic energy on a useful scale by a scientist
   who played a principal part in the atomic bomb project during World
   War II.
 
   _The Atomists_ (_1805-1933_), Basil Schonland, Oxford University
   Press, Inc., New York, 1968, 198 pp., $5.60. This book, which can be
   understood by anyone who has had a high school physics course,
   presents atomic theory development from Dalton through Bohr. It
   achieves a good balance between popular treatments and highly
   technical works without slighting the technical aspects.
 
   _Atoms in the Family: My Life with Enrico Fermi_, Laura Fermi, Chicago
   University Press, Chicago, Illinois, 1954, 267 pp., $5.00 (hardback);
   $2.45 (paperback). Laura Fermi writes about her husband, Enrico Fermi,
   the physicist who led the group that built the first nuclear reactor.
 
   _The Born-Einstein Letters: The Correspondence Between Albert Einstein
   and Max and Hedwig Born from 1916 to 1955_, commentaries by Max Born,
   translated by Irene Born, Walker and Company, 1971, 240 pp., $8.50.
   These interesting letters reveal the scientific and personal lives of
   these two atomic scientists.
 
   _Einstein: His Life and Times_, Philipp Frank, Alfred A. Knopf, Inc.,
   New York, 1953, 298 pp., $6.95. A brilliant biography that reveals the
   richness of Einsteins life and work and the tremendous impact he made
   upon physics.
 
   _Enrico Fermi, Physicist_, Emilio Segr, Chicago University Press,
   Chicago, Illinois, 1970, 288 pp., $6.95. This biography tells of
   Enrico Fermis intellectual history, achievements, and his scientific
   style. The scientific problems faced or solved by Fermi are explained
   in laymans terms. Emilio Segr was a friend and scientific
   collaborator who worked with Fermi for many years.
 
   _An Introduction to Physical Science: The World of Atoms_ (second
   edition), John J. G. McCue, The Ronald Press Company, New York, 1963,
   775 pp., $9.50. This textbook was written for college humanities
   students.
 
   _J. J. Thomson: Discoverer of the Electron_, George Thomson, Doubleday
   and Company, Inc., New York, 1966, 240 pp., $1.45. This biography,
   written by J. J. Thomsons son, describes his research at the famed
   Cavendish Laboratory in Cambridge, England.
 
   _John Dalton and the Atom_, Frank Greenaway, Cornell University Press,
   Ithaca, New York, 1966, 256 pp., $7.50. A biography for the general
   reader and the high school science student. Dalton is famous for his
   development of chemical combinations based on atomic theory. This
   provided the basis for modern structural theories of chemistry.
 
   _John Dalton and the Atomic Theory: The Biography of a Natural
   Philosopher_, Elizabeth C. Patterson, Doubleday and Company, Inc., New
   York, 1970, 320 pp., $6.95 (hardback); $1.95 (paperback). The drama of
   Daltons lifehis rigorous self-teaching, scientific work, and
   struggle to overcome class barriers in 19th century Englandis well
   presented. Quotations from letters, diaries, and published works give
   a clear picture of Daltons atomic theory research and his time.
 
   _Man-made Transuranium Elements_, Glenn T. Seaborg, Prentice Hall,
   Inc., Englewood Cliffs, New Jersey, 1963, 120 pp., $6.95 (hardback);
   $2.95 (paperback). The discovery, properties, and applications of
   elements heavier than uranium are considered in this book, which is
   designed as an introduction to the subject. Glenn Seaborg was
   co-discoverer of nine of the twelve transuranium elements.
 
   _The Nature of Matter: Physical Theory from Thales to Fermi_, Ginestra
   Amaldi, translated by Peter Astbury, Chicago University Press,
   Chicago, Illinois, 1966, 332 pp., $5.95. A nontechnical history of
   atomic energy.
 
   _Niels Bohr: His Life and Work as Seen by His Friends and Colleagues_,
   S. Rozental (Editor), John Wiley and Sons, Inc., New York, 1967, 355
   pp., $5.95. An articulate and scholarly biography by the friends and
   co-workers of this outstanding atomic pioneer.
 
   _Niels Bohr: The Man, His Science, and the World They Changed_, Ruth
   Moore, Alfred A. Knopf, Inc., New York, 1966, 436 pp., $7.95. An
   interesting biography of one of the pioneers in the study of the
   internal structure of the atom.
 
   _Otto Hahn: My Life_, Otto Hahn, translated by Ernest Kaiser and
   Eithne Wilkins, Herder and Herder, Inc., New York, 1970, 240 pp.,
   $6.50. Autobiography of the man who discovered that the atom could be
   split.
 
   _Otto Hahn: A Scientific Autobiography_, Otto Hahn, Willy Ley, editor
   and translator, Charles Scribners Sons, New York, 1966, 320 pp.,
   $9.95. Otto Hahn, winner of the 1944 Nobel Prize for his work in
   atomic fission, reviews the pioneer days in which a new science was
   created, and the role he played in its development.
 
   _Physics and Beyond: Encounters and Conversations_, Werner Heisenberg,
   translated by Arthur J. Pomerans, Harper and Row, Publishers, New
   York, 1970, 247 pp., $7.95. Werner Heisenberg, a Nobel Prize
   physicist, presents his autobiography in the form of conversations
   with such men as Max Planck, Albert Einstein, Niels Bohr, Ernest
   Rutherford, Otto Hahn, and Enrico Fermi.
 
   _Physics for Poets_, Robert H. March, McGraw-Hill Book Company, New.
   York, 1970, 302 pp., $7.50. A physics textbook for nonscience
   students. The book covers certain developments of classical mechanics,
   relativity, and atomic and quantum physics. With this book the author
   won the 1971 American Institute of PhysicsU. S. Steel Foundation
   Science Writing Award in Physics and Astronomy.
 
   _Sourcebook on Atomic Energy_ (third edition), Samuel Glasstone, Van
   Nostrand Reinhold Company, New York, 1967, 883 pp., $15.00. An
   excellent standard reference work, written for both scientists and the
   general public.
 
   _The Swift Years: The Robert Oppenheimer Story_, Peter Michelmore,
   Dodd, Mead and Company, New York, 1969, 273 pp., $6.95. Oppenheimers
   complex personality is delineated in this well-written biography. In
   the bibliography is a list of books that Oppenheimer felt had done
   the most to shape his vocational attitude and philosophy of life.
 
   _The World of the Atom_, 2 volumes, Henry A. Boorse and Lloyd Motz
   (Eds.), Basic Books, Inc., Publishers, New York, 1966, 1873 pp.,
   $35.00. Contains the actual text of landmark documents in the history
   of atomic physics, each preceded by commentary that places it in the
   context of the discoverers personal life and in the conditions
   prevailing in science and in society in his time.
 
 
 
 
                              Photo Credits
 
 
   Page facing inside    The Horsehead Nebula in Orion. Hale
   cover                 Observatories.
   Authors Photo        Jay K. Klein
   Contents page         Lick Observatory
   116                   Samuel A. Goudsmit
   118                   From _Atoms in the Family: My Life With Enrico
                         Fermi_, Laura Fermi, 1954. Copyright  by the
                         University of Chicago Press.
   120                   Top row, left, Institut fur Radium-forschung und
                         Kemphysik, right, Lotte Meitner-Graff, middle
                         row, left, Nobel Institute, right, Ernest Orlando
                         Lawrence Berkeley Laboratory; bottom row, right,
                         Ernest Orlando Lawrence Berkeley Laboratory,
                         left, P. H. Abelson.
   123                   Addison-Wesley Publishing Company
   130                   Top, Ike Verne; bottom, Oak Ridge National
                         Laboratory.
   132 & 133             Letter and Roosevelt picture from the Franklin D.
                         Roosevelt Library; Johan Hagemeyer.
   136 & 137             Argonne National Laboratory
   141                   U. S. Navy
   143                   Right, Westinghouse Electric Corporation
   145                   Argonne National Laboratory
   152                   Lick Observatory
   155                   Gulf Energy and Environmental Systems
   156                   Los Alamos Scientific Laboratory
   158                   Nobel Institute
   159                   Left, C. D. Anderson; right, Nobel Institute.
   161                   Ernest Orlando Lawrence Berkeley Laboratory
 
                      U. S. GOVERNMENT PRINTING OFFICE: 1972 - 747-189/2
 
 
 The U. S. Atomic Energy Commission publishes this series of information
 booklets for the general public. These booklets explain the many uses of
 nuclear energy.
 
 The booklets are listed below by subject category.
 
 
 General Interest
 
   WAS-009 Atomic Energy and Your World
   WAS-002 A Bibliography of Basic Books on Atomic Energy
   WAS-004 Computers
   WAS-008 Electricity and Man
   WAS-006 Nuclear Terms, A Glossary
   WAS-013 Secrets of the Past: Nuclear Energy Applications in Art and
           Archaeology
 
 
 The Environment
 
   WAS-414 Natures Invisible Rays
   WAS-204 Nuclear Power and the Environment
 
 
 Biology
 
   WAS-102 Atoms in Agriculture
   WAS-105 The Genetic Effects of Radiation
   WAS-107 Radioisotopes in Medicine
   WAS-109 Your Body and Radiation
 
 
 Physics
 
   WAS-401 Accelerators
   WAS-403 Controlled Nuclear Fusion
   WAS-404 Direct Conversion of Energy
   WAS-416 Inner Space: The Structure of the Atom
   WAS-406 Lasers
   WAS-407 Microstructure of Matter
   WAS-411 Power from Radioisotopes
 
 
 Chemistry
 
   WAS-303 The Atomic Fingerprint: Neutron Activation Analysis
   WAS-302 Cryogenics, The Uncommon Cold
   WAS-306 Radioisotopes in Industry
 
 
 Nuclear Reactors
 
   WAS-502 Atomic Power Safety
   WAS-513 Breeder Reactors
   WAS-503 The First Reactor
   WAS-505 Nuclear Power Plants
   WAS-507 Nuclear Reactors
   WAS-508 Radioactive Wastes
 
 
 Members of the general public may obtain free, single copies of six
 titles of their choice. Librarians and teachers may obtain free a
 complete set of the booklets. These requests should be made on school or
 library stationery. Those wishing to obtain larger quantities may
 purchase them if stocks are available. Orders for booklets and inquiries
 on prices and availability should be directed to:
 
 USAECTechnical Information Center, P. O. Box 62, Oak Ridge, TN 37830
 
 Comments are invited regarding this booklet and others in the series.
 
    [Illustration: UNITED STATES OF AMERICA ATOMIC ENERGY COMMISSION]
 
                      U. S. ATOMIC ENERGY COMMISSION
                      Office of Information Services
 
 
 
 
                           Transcribers Notes
 
 
 --Retained publication information from the printed edition: this eBook
   is public-domain in the country of publication.
 
 --Some captions describing separately placed images were split, removing
   redundant relative clauses like Above or To the right is...
 
 --In the text version only, underlined or italicized text is delimited
   by _underscores_.
 
 --Where possible, UTF superscript and subscript numbers are used; some
   e-reader fonts may not support these characters.
 
 --In the text versions only, other superscript text is preceded by caret
   and delimited by ^{brackets}.
 
 --In the text versions only, other subscripted text is preceded by
   underscore and delimited by _{brackets}.
 
 --The Table of Contents lists pages and illustrations in all three
   volumes:
 
 --Volume 1
 
 --Volume 2
 
 --Volume 3
 
 --These links can be made to function on local copies of the files.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 End of the Project Gutenberg EBook of Worlds Within Worlds: The Story of
